#https://www.learn-english-have-fun.com/idiom-site.html

A

from A to Z:  to include everything.  Example:  Our travel agent planned our vacation from A to Z, including hotels, transportation, meals and sightseeing... read more



ABLE

able to do (something) with one’s eyes closed / shut:   to be able to do something easily and effortlessly.  Example:  She’s such a good cook she can  practically cook.... read more



able to do (something) blindfolded:  to be able to do something easily and effortlessly.  Example:  I’ve been driving a motorcycle so many years I could.... read more


ABOUT

about time:  a moment that should happen now or that should have happened previously (before).  Example:  It’s about time  for dinner so please go and wash.... read more


about to (do something):  to be ready or planning to do something.  Example:  I was about to raise my hand in class when Sally shouted out the answer.... read more


ABOVE

above all (else):  the most important thing.  Example:  He loves to drink milk above all else, even more than juice or soda.... read more


above the law:  not having to obey the law or rules.  Example:  Our manager thinks he’s above the law, coming in late every morning but yelling at us if we’re even.... read more


above suspicion:  not believed to have done something wrong.  Example:  My parents always think my sister is above suspicion because she’s the oldest but usually.... read more


none of the above:  all of the items or factors listed before something else.   Example:  Do you want coffee, tea, juice or none of the above?... read more



ABSENT

absent-minded:  not carefully remembering or paying attention.  Example:  My mother’s so absent-minded she not only loses her keys but she also forgets where... read more


ACCOUNT

take (something) into account:  to carefully think about or consider something.  Example:  We thought we could drive to the beach in two hours but we didn’t take Friday ... read more


ACT

act one’s age:  to behave in a way that is right or appropriate for a particular age.  Example:  Our 12-year old refuses to act her age and continues to suck her thumb... read more



act out:  to behave badly, especially when angry.  Example:  My younger brother always acts out  when he doesn’t get to watch cartoons in the morning... read more


act up:  (1) to behave badly; (2) to activate or start (especially describing illnesses or problems).  Example:  My daughter always acts up at the supermarket when... read more


a tough act to follow:  to be so good that the next thing after it doesn’t seem as good in comparison.  Example:  I hope the teacher lets me give my speech first because ... read more


catch someone in the act:  to see or discover someone at the moment they are doing something wrong.  Example:  I tried to quietly walk in the back door to the office because ... read more


clean up one’s act:  to start behaving well or better than before.  Example:  My parents said if I don’t clean up my act and get better grades I won’t be able to continue... read more


get one’s act together:  to improve poor or bad behavior.  Example:  After skipping class and playing video games my first year in college, I got my act together and ... read more


ACTION

in action:  working or in progress.  Example:  This Italian restaurant has an open kitchen so you can see the chef in action throwing pizza dough in the air... read more



take action:  to do or start something.  Example:  After years of complaining, the secretary finally took action and quit her job... read more


a piece of the action:  to share part of the advantages or profits of something important that’s happening.  Example:  When my brother saw how much money I was ... read more


actions speak louder than words:  what someone does is more important than what they say.  Example:  If you love me, show me—actions speak louder than words... read more


ADD

add up / add up to (something):  to signify or result in something.  Example:  Studying just a few new words a day will add up to a huge vocabulary in just a year... read more


ADO

without further ado:  without talking more about something.  Example:  Without further ado, close your books and let’s begin the test... read more


ADVANTAGE

take advantage (of something or someone):  to use an opportunity or circumstance to get or achieve something.  Example:  My roommate takes advantage of my dislike ... read more


AFRAID

afraid of one’s own shadow:  to be very frightened (so frightened that the individual would jump if they saw their own shadow in the sun).  Example:  My German Shepard may ... read more


AFTER

after all is said and done:  after everything has finally happened or been said.  Example:  After all is said and done, it was a great holiday even though the airline lost our luggage... read more


after the fact:  after something has already happened.  Example:  We had to write to the airline after the fact because we forgot to bring our frequent flyer membership ... read more



AGAINST

against one’s will:  without someone’s agreement.  Example:  My father wants me to marry someone he chooses but I will never get married against my will... read more


against the clock:  in a hurry or trying to complete something before a specific time.  Example:  We worked against the clock to finish the report before the end of the day... read more


against time:  trying to finish something before a certain time or deadline.  Example:  I hate rushing against time but my manager never gives me the information I need ... read more


AHEAD

ahead of time:  early or before something is required.  Example:  I always arrive ahead of time to all of my appointments to prevent stress... read more



ahead of the game:  in a position in front of others or in an advantageous position.  Example:  I am always taking new training courses so I can stay ahead of the game... read more


AIR

clear the air:  to explain something to remove doubts or misunderstanding about something.  Example:  I asked my supervisor for a meeting so I could clear the air... read more


disappear / vanish into thin air:  to be gone quickly and completely.  Example:  When I asked my roommates to help me clean our apartment everyone vanished into thin air... read more


in the air:  everywhere; able to be noticed or felt.  Example:  Spring is in the air, the birds are chirping and the trees are blooming... read more


off the air:  not currently being broadcast on the radio or television.  Example:  The television announcers seemed to be happy colleagues but off the air they were bitter ... read more


on the air:  broadcasting on the television or radio.  Example:  There are several Spanish television programs on the air on AM radio... read more


air one’s dirty laundry (in public):  to talk about something that should be kept private.  Example:  I hate going to family reunions because my uncle always airs his ... read more


out of thin air:   from nowhere, from nothing.  Example:  When my students are late for class they make up excuses out of thin air... read more


up in the air:  not decided, developed or finalized.  Example:  Our plans for the summer holiday are still up in the air  because my boss hasn’t approved my vacation request... read more


AISLES

rolling in the aisles:  laughing loudly or uncontrollably.  Example:  We went to the comedy club last night and one of the comedians had everyone rolling in the aisles... read more


ALIVE

alive and kicking:  alive and well (healthy), in working condition.  Example:  I’ve been driving my car every day for fifteen years but it’s still alive and kicking... read more


ALL

all along:  the entire or whole time.  Example:  I got divorced because my husband was cheating on me all along with his old girlfriend... read more



all at once:  happening suddenly or at one time.  Example:  It was really sunny when we started our walk but all at once the sky turned dark grey and it started raining really hard...read more


all ears:  to listen carefully and attentively.  Example:  Everyone on the plane was all ears when pilot said we had to make an emergency landing... read more


all eyes are on something / someone:  everyone is carefully watching something to see what will happen.  Example:  Whenever I go out with my friend Sally all eyes are on us ... read more


all thumbs:  clumsy or awkward in doing or using something.  Example:  I’m all thumbs with arts and crafts but my daughter is great at it... read more


all very well:  good but not good enough.  Example:  It’s all very well that you’re eating better but you also have to exercise if you want to lose weight... read more


at all:  (1) in any condition or way; (2) to any degree or extent.  Example:  My adviser was not at all happy with my research paper... read more


ALTER

leave someone at the alter:  to leave someone just before the marriage is supposed to happen. Example:  What a jerk! I cannot believe he left her at the alter. How humiliating!... read more



ANTS

ants in one's pants:  to be so excited, nervous or anxious about something that it's hard to be still and calm.  Example:  It's been raining for five days in a row and my kids really... read more

BACK

back away from (something / someone):   to move away from something or stop supporting something. Example:  Our supervisor wanted us to start working on Sundays but...read more



back down (from something / someone):  to not continue with a threat to do something.  Example:   The workers backed down from their plan to go on strike...read more



back off:  to not do something you planned on doing.  Example:  I worked really hard on the project for the past two weeks but my boss told me to back off it until the client... read more



back on one’s feet:  to be healthy again after sickness.  Example:  I couldn’t do anything for two weeks while I had the flu but now I’m back on my feet... read more



back out (of something):  to not completely finish something one promised to do. Example:  My friend and I were supposed to go on holiday together but she backed out at the...read more



back to back:  one thing immediately happening after another thing.  Example:  On Wednesdays, I’m really busy because I have four classes back to back... read more



back to square one:  to be back at the starting point of something. Example:  I picked up all the leaves and branches from my lawn yesterday but there was a storm last night and...read more



behind one’s back:  something happening when someone is not present.  Example:  My colleague is really nice to me but I don’t trust him because I know he talks negatively about me...read more



stab someone in the back:  to cause someone harm or do something negatively to someone.  Example:  I cannot believe my friend stabbed me in the back by telling my teacher...read more



watch your back:  to be careful to notice what’s happening around you.  Example:  I have to watch my back at this office because people are unfriendly and competitive... read more



BAD

not (half) bad:  good enough or reasonably good.  Example:  Let's eat in the university cafeteria. The food is not half bad  and the price is great... read more



bad blood (between people):  bad or unfriendly relationships between people or groups of people.  Example:  There’s been bad blood between two of my best friends since...read more



bad hair day:  a day when everything isn’t going well (such as when it’s hard to groom your hair the way you want it to be).  Example:  Sorry I can't go out—I’m having a bad hair day...read more



bad mouth (someone):  to say bad things about someone.  Example:  I heard you were bad mouthing me  so if you have a problem tell me right now... read more



BAGS

have bag’s under one’s eyes:  to have dark puffy circles under the eyes. Example:  I have bags under my eyes because I was watching the football game last night and only slept...read more



pack someone’s bags:  to permanently leave or go away from a place. Example:  If your roommates never clean up, eat all your food and make a lot of noise, maybe it...read more



BALL

ball in someone’s court:  the moment when someone needs to take the next action, move or get an answer from someone else. Example:  I filled out the application and provided...read more



drop the ball:  to stop working on something before a goal or project is completed. Example:  We lost the contract when I went on vacation because my coworkers dropped the ball... read more



start / get the ball rolling:  to begin or start something. Example:  I want to have a nice garden this summer so I started the ball rolling by planting some seeds in little pots near the... read more



have a ball:  to have a fun or enjoyable time. Example:  I used to hate exercise but I started taking dance lessons and now I’m exercising and having a ball at the same time... read more




on the ball:  to be alert, focused and able to react to something quickly.  Example:  The students in my advanced placement classes are really on the ball so I have to be careful...read more



BANG

bang for the buck:  to have good value for money spent. (note: in English the word "buck" is slang for a dollar).  Example:  I recommend you buy this television because it has the.... read more



bang one’s head against the wall:  to feel frustrated trying to do something that’s not possible.  Example:  I try to suggest new projects each week at the staff meeting... read more



BANK

bank on something:  to depend on or trust something.  Example:  When your baby is born you can bank on  me for advice and babysitting help... read on



break the bank:  to be too costly or expensive.  Example:  These days you can easily buy a smart phone without breaking the bank... read on



BARGAIN

drive a hard bargain:  to be good at negotiating a beneficial arrangement.  Example:  I was able to drive a hard bargain and get a higher salary and an extra week of vacation... read on



more than someone/something bargained for:  to get something in addition to what was expected.  Example:  I tried to have a baby for three years but when I got pregnant... read on



BARK

bark is worse than one’s bite:  someone is not as bad or as difficult as they seem to be.  Example:  My girlfriend told me her father’s bark is worse than his bite and not to worry... read on




bark up the wrong tree:  trying to achieve something but doing it in the wrong way or believing an explanation for something that isn’t true.  Example:  My sister wanted a loan from... read on



BASE

off base:  wrong, not correct.  Example:  You're way off base if you think you can graduate from college without studying.  Example:  Unfortunately, the financial projections were... read on



touch base (with someone):  to contact someone. Example: When you return from holiday let’s touch base  so we can set up our next appointment... read on




BASKET

(don't) put all your eggs in one basket:  having all of your resources or efforts in just one possibility is very risky.  Example:  You need to get a financial adviser who can help... read more




BATTERY

recharge one's battery:  to rest or relax in order to get energy back to do things again.  Example:  We just returned from our cabin in the woods—no smart phones, television... read more



BE

be-all and end-all:  something really important or good.  Example:  Getting accepted into an Ivy League university is the be-all and end-all for me... read on



be game:  to be ready to participate in something. Example:  I’m game for whatever you want to do this weekend... read on



be into something / someone:  to be really interested or active in something or someone.  Example:  My boyfriend is really into shopping and fashion but I hate it... read on


be off:  to depart, leave, or go away.  Example:  Are you leaving so soon? Yes, I’m off to the grocery store before it closes... read on



be over:  to be finished.  Example:  I’m so glad final exams are over and summer is here... read on




BEAN

spill the beans:  to tell someone a secret or tell someone information before you were supposed to.  Example: My colleague spilled the beans that I had found a new position... read more



BEAR

bear (hold) a grudge (against someone):  to continue to be angry and not forgive someone.  Example:  I apologized many times for calling my sister fat when... read on



bear fruit:  to produce a result.  Example:  I started to eat yogurt instead of donuts for breakfast and after three months my new diet is bearing fruit — I’ve lost five pounds already... read on



bear (something) in mind:  to consider or think about something.  Example:  Before you book your vacation bear in mind that many flights get delayed during the winter due... read on



bear out something / bear something out:  to prove or confirm that something is true.  Example:  My own experience bears out  research that shows drinking diet soft... read on



BEAUTY

beauty is only skin deep:  a person's inner beauty (not their outer appearance) is the most important factor.  Example:  I really believe that beauty is only skin deep—my wife may be average in looks but she's kind, gentle and super smart.

Although beauty is only skin deep, Queen Rania is gorgeous on both the inside and outside.
My brother says beauty is only skin deep  but then he only dates fashion models.
My parents always tell me that I'm wonderful and beauty is only skin deep  but the guys at school only like the pretty girls.
* Click here for a lesson on this idiom.




BELT

Tighten one's belt:  to spend less than usual in order to save money.  Example:  We had to tighten our belts after my wife left her job but it's worth it to have her home with our baby... read on




BIRD

a little bird told me:  this is used to say that you got information from someone but you are not going to say who that person is.  Example:  A little bird told me that that we are having a pop quiz today in Mrs. Green's class...read more



BLIND

blind as a bat:  not able to see or to not see well.  Example:  I keep an set of emergency eye gasses in my desk drawer because sometimes I misplace my regular eyeglasses in the house and can't find them because I'm blind as a bat... read on



blind date:  a date (social meeting) where two people have never met before.  Example:  I did not want to go on a blind date that my mother arranged but I'm really glad I did because... read on



BORE

bore the pants off:  to be extremely boring or uninteresting to someone else.  Example:  This story is really boring the pants off me — Can you please get to the point?...read more



BOX

box in:  Feeling restricted or stuck due to one's limited options.  Example:  We decided to rent for a year until we got to know the city so we wouldn't be boxed in to living in a neighborhood we don't like... read more



think outside the box:  to think creatively to find new ways of doing things or solving problems.  Example:  Sometimes drawing a picture of something can help you think outside the box and solve a problem since it uses the more creative right-brain processes... read more



BREAD

best thing since sliced bread:  this describes a new person or thing that's really great or amazing.  Example:  The new iPhone is the best thing since sliced bread—I absolutely have... read more



BREATHE

breathe easy / easier:  to become more calm or relaxed.  Example:  You'll breathe easier after your mid-term exams are over... read more



BRIEF

in brief:  something that is said with very few words or details.  Example:  In brief, he didn't get the job and doesn't want to talk about it... read more




BUCKET

a drop in the bucket:  a very small or unimportant amount when compared to something else. Example:  The bake sale raised only a drop in the bucket of what's needed to buy...read more


CAKE

have one’s cake and eat it too:  to do or have two desired things at the same time.  Example:  Working at the library lets me have my cake and eat it too: I can study and... read more 



(something) takes the cake:  an extreme example of something.  Example:  All of her boyfriends are rich but the millionaire businessman she’s dating right now takes the cake... read more



icing on the cake:  an extra good thing in addition to something else.  Example:  He was so excited to get accepted into an Ivy League school that getting a scholarship was just... read more



CALL

call for (something):  to demand or require something.  Example:  When the actor was found dead in his apartment the police called for an investigation... read more



call in sick:  to telephone one’s office or workplace to say you can’t come in because you are sick.  Example:  She’s called in sick again today. I think she must be pregnant... read more



call it quits:  to stop doing something.  Example:  I tried and tried to learn speak French but now I’m calling it quits... read more



call off something (call something off):  to decide not to do a planned activity. Example:  It’s sad they called off the wedding after they sent the invitations... read more



call on (someone):  to ask someone for help or to do something.  Example:  It’s great to have a boyfriend to call on  when you need help around the house... read more



close call:  1) An event that almost happened;  2) A difficult decision or a result that’s hard to determine.  Example:  She had several close calls before she had the accident so... read more



on call:  available and ready to work.  Example:  My father is a doctor so he’s on call a lot and sometimes goes to the hospital at night... read more



something to call your own:  something that you own.  Example:  I have rented an apartment for 20 years but I’m getting a loan to buy a house. It's a big responsibility but I really... read more



too close to call:  something difficult to determine in advance (especially a competition or political race).  Example:  The race for the governor is too close to call  but I think our... read more




CAN

(open / open up) a can of worms:  a situation or issue that becomes even more complicated as you try to deal with it or solve the problem.  Example:  The investigation of donations made to the winning candidate during the election has really opened a can of worms... read more



CANDLE

burn the candle at both ends:  to be exhausted and get very little sleep because one goes to sleep very late and wakes up very early and works a lot in between.  Example:  During midterm examinations all the students burn the candle at both ends...read more



(someone / something) can’t hold a candle to (someone / something):  to not be as good in comparison to something else.  Example:  He may have the most beautiful girlfriend but she can’t hold a candle to mine Maggie is kind as well as beautiful and smart!... read more



CARDS

hold all the cards:  to be in complete control of something.  Example:  He may be the new manager but his secretary holds all the cards—she’s been working here for... read more



in the cards:  to be expected to happen.  Example:  I think a promotion will definitely be in the cards if you continue to make your sales targets... read more



play one’s cards right:  to do the correct things to get a desired result.  Example:  Play your cards right in college and you’ll get a great job after you graduate... read more



lay all one’s cards on the table:  explain everything that you know truthfully and completely.  Example:  If you lay all your cards on the table maybe she'll give you a... read more



CARE

someone couldn’t care less (someone could care less):  to not care about something.  Example:  I could care less if all of my friends smoke. I’ll never do it because it’s bad for my... read more



take care (of yourself):  used in spoken English to say goodbye.  Example:  It was great to see you, take care... read more



take care of (someone/something):  to handle a situation or be responsible for something or someone.  Example:  If you don’t take care of your health you'll get sick... read more



who cares?:  Used in spoken English to say you don’t care about something/are not interested in something because it’s not important.  Example:  Who cares what day you do the... read more



CARRY

carry on:  to continue doing something.  Example:  When my husband lost his job he was brave and carried on as if everything was okay... read on



carry someone through (something):  to give support to something/someone so they can achieve a desired result.  Example:  I need some temporary employees to help carry me through... read more



CASE

get off someone’s case:  to stop criticizing or bothering someone.  Example:  Your dad will get off your case when you finish your homework... read more



in any case:  in whatever event happens or results.  Example:  It’s supposed to rain this weekend but we’re going to clean the house in any case,  even if it’s the most beautiful... read more



in case:  if this situation happens.  Example:  In case I’m not home by seven o’clock, please start cooking dinner... read more



in case of something:  if something that’s not expected happens.  Example:  In case of any problems with the kids, please call us immediately... read more



just in case:  only in a particular situation that something happens.  Example:  I always have an extra clean shirt and tie at work, just in case a client stops in unexpectedly... read more



make a case for something:  to make an argument for something or explain why it should be done.  Example:   I’m meeting with my boss this morning and I’m going to make a... read more



on someone’s case: to repeatedly tell someone what to do or criticize them. Example:  My wife is always on my case about keeping the garage clean and tidy... read more



on the case:  doing the things that need to be done.  Example:  Don’t worry I’m already on the case and ordered extra supplies two days ago... read more




CAT

cat / cat's got someone’s tongue:  a situation where someone is not speaking or is having difficulty trying to say something. Example:  I wanted to say something at the meeting but the cat got my tongue...read more



let the cat out of the bag:  to tell something that is a secret.  Example:  I’m getting your father new golf clubs for his birthday but please don’t let the cat out of the bag... read more




cat and mouse:  a series of planned actions involving pursuit, captures and repeated escapes.  Example:  My boyfriend said he was going to the game with friends last night and then he said his car broke down so he never made it. As I was getting upset, flowers he sent arrived at my office... it's just a game of cat and mouse with him.  Read more....




raining cats and dogs:  to rain very hard without stopping. Example:  I look like I took a shower with my clothes on! It’s raining cats and dogs outside and I forgot to bring my ....read more






while the cat's away the mice will play:  people will behave badly or as they like when a supervisor or other authority figure is not present.  Example:  I'd be careful if I were you leaving your kids home for the weekend... as you know, while the cat's away the mice will play.  Read more...


CATCH

catch someone off guard:  to surprise someone. Example:  When my boss told me he was raising my salary he really caught me off guard... read more




catch someone with their pants down:  1) to surprise someone in an embarrassing situation;  2) to find someone while they're doing something wrong. Example:  We caught our nanny with her pants down sleeping during the day when she was supposed to be watching the kids...read more



catch up on something:  to complete things that you didn’t have time to finish before. Example:  Since it was raining all weekend I caught up on my laundry and ironing... read more



would not/never be caught dead:  to never do (or wear) something.  Example:  My girlfriend bought me this tie and it's so ugly I’d never be caught dead  wearing it... read more



(get) caught up in something:  to be completely busy or absorbed in something.  Example:  I got so caught up in reading this book that I didn’t notice how late it was and didn't get... read more



CHANCE

fat chance:  having little or no possibility of happening.  Example:   Fat chance I’m going out tonight because I have to work late... read more



give half a chance:  to give someone an opportunity.  Example:  If my parents only gave me half a chance I could show them I’m responsible but they never trust me to do anything... read more



have a fighting chance:  to have a reasonable possibility or opportunity to do something.  Example:  Without chemotherapy she won’t have a fighting chance of... read more



not a chance/no chance:  not having any possibility.  Example:  I wish that man would stop asking because there’s no chance I’ll ever go on a date with him... read more



not have a snowball’s chance in hell/no chance in hell:  to not have any possibility.  Example:  There’s no chance in hell that I can finish this report by... read more



on the off chance:  in the unlikely possibility.  Example:  On the off chance you get home before I do, can you please order us a pizza for dinner?... read more



stand a chance:  to have the possibility for something to happen or be successful.  Example: I’m sorry to say that you don’t stand a chance of becoming a professional basketball... read more



take one’s chances:  to allow luck to decide on an outcome.  Example:  I know it’s unlikely I’ll become a pop singer but I don’t care—I’m taking my chances anyway... read more




COFFEE

wake up and smell the coffee:  be more realistic about a situation, no matter how unpleasant it is.  Example:  You failed another test? Wake up and smell the coffee before you lose your scholarship... read more



CRACK

crack someone up:  to make someone suddenly laugh a lot.  Example:  My girlfriend told me a few jokes that cracked me up before I took my test and it really relaxed me... read more.



crack up:  to suddenly laugh a lot, to burst into laughter.  Example:  I couldn't help cracking up when my boss walked onto the stage with toilet paper attached to her shoe... read more.



CRY

cry over spilled milk:  to be upset, worried or unhappy about something that cannot be changed.  Example:  I know you're upset the airline lost our luggage but let's enjoy this holiday anyway. What's the use of crying over spilled milk?...read more




CUCUMBER

as cool as a cucumber:  calm and relaxed (especially in a difficult or stressful situation).  Example:  I highly recommend you hire Jessica. One of her best strengths is that she's as cool as a cucumber whenever we have large conferences...read more


DAGGERS

shoot daggers at someone:  to look at someone in a very angry way.  Example:  When my daughter told everyone I was celebrating my 70th birthday I shot daggers at her... read more



DARK

keep someone in the dark:  to not tell someone something or give them information they need.  Example:  I wish my boss would stop keeping me in the dark and be clear about... read more



DATE

bring someone up-to-date:  to give someone the most recent information about something. Example:  If you have time later I’ll bring you up-to-date  about the... read more



bring something up-to-date:  to make changes to something so that it includes the most recent information. Example:  Please add these new figures to the proposal to bring it... read more



keep (someone/something) up-to-date:  to continue giving or adding the most relevant information. Example:  I’d appreciate it if you'd keep me up-to-date on your... read more



to date:  to or until this time. Example:  To date we haven’t received any complaints about our new service... read more



DAWN

dawn on someone:  to suddenly understand, to be clear to someone. Example:  It finally dawned on my wife that our youngest child was taking money from her purse... read more.



DAY

a day late and a dollar short:  not enough and too late to be of use. Example:  My boyfriend’s promises to finally spend more time with me were a day late and a dollar short so... read more



as plain as day:   very clear and easy to understand. Example:  If you don’t know how to use the machine read the directions. The manual is as plain as day...read more



call it a day:  to finish something. Example:  We’ve been working for five hours and everyone's tired. I say let’s call it a day...read more



day after day:  several days continuously repeated. Example:  Day after day I went to the Apple Store to try to get the new iPhone. After two weeks, I decided to order one online...read more



day and night (night and day):  all of the time. Example:  I haven’t slept all week because my neighbor’s new baby cries day and night...read more



day by day:  each day. Example:   Day by day he’s getting better but it will be several months before his leg is completely healed...read more



day in and day out:  every day repeatedly. Example:   He works day in and day out so I never see him anymore...read more



from day one:  from the beginning. Example:   My husband hated my father from day one so spending time with my family is difficult...read more



in this day and age:  at this time. Example:  In this day and age spending several dollars for a cup of coffee is not unusual but no one would do that 30 years ago...read more



just another day:  a day like every other day. Example:  It was just another day at school; the teachers were boring and the students didn’t listen...read more



late in the day:  happening almost too late. Example:  It was late in the day but we got to the store just before it closed...read more



make someone’s day:  to make someone very happy. Example:  My father sent my mother flowers and it really made her day...read more



not someone’s day:  a difficult day with a lot of problems. Example:  It’s not my day.  There was lots of traffic, I was late for work, my boss yelled at me and I got a parking ticket...read more



one day (some day):  a time in the future. Example:  One day you’ll make enough money to buy your own home and move out of here...read more



save something for a rainy day:  to keep something for a future time when it will be needed.  Example:  I got a gift card for my birthday but I’m not going to use it now,...read more



save the day:  solving a big problem for someone. Example:  I was really sick and couldn’t study last night but my girlfriend saved the day  and wrote my English essay for me...read more



the other day:  a recent time ago. Example:  The other day I saw my high school teacher and she’s doing great...read more



at the end of the day:  after everything else has been considered, in the final analysis; finally. Example:  I can give suggestions but at the end of the day it's your decision...read more

.

in broad daylight:  in a way or place that anyone can see what’s happening. Example:  The kids threw eggs at the car in broad daylight  but surprisingly no one saw them...read more



someone’s / something’s days are numbered:  someone or something will not exist or function in a short time from now. Example:  I’ve had these boots for three years and I love...read more



has seen better days:  something is no longer in good condition. Example: My computer has seen better days so I’m thinking about getting a new one...read more



one of those days:  a bad or difficult day. Example:   It’s not a good time to talk to her; she’s having one of those days...read more



those were the days:  looking fondly at or happily remembering a time in the past. Example:  I really wish people would still send letters through the post—those were the days...read more



DEAD

dead set against something:  determined not to do or support something. Example:  I wanted my daughter to go to an Ivy League school but she was dead set against it...read more



in the dead of winter:  during the coldest part of the winter. Example:  I hate waking up in the dark in the dead of winter  and having to get out of my warm bed...read more



DEAL

a done deal:  a decision that has been reached. Example:  I thought going to the movies this evening was a done deal but now you say we're not going?...read more



a great deal (of something):  a large amount of something. Example:  I have a great deal of respect for my supervisor because she’s very honest and supportive...read more



big deal:  something very important. Example:  Your lying to me is a big deal  and I’m not going to forget it...read more



cut a deal:  to make a special agreement with someone. Example:  Let’s cut a deal. If you do my homework, I’ll clean your room...read more



DEATH

bore someone to death:  to not be interesting or be very boring to someone. Example:  The movie bored me to death  so I fell asleep in the theater...read more



love someone to death:  to care for someone very strongly. Example:  I loved him to death but he didn’t love me the same way so I stopped dating him...read more



scare someone to death:  to really frighten someone. Example:  My husband’s drinking every single night is really scaring our kids to death...read more



scared to death:  to be very frightened. Example:  My boyfriend is scared to death that my mother won’t like him but I know she will...read more



tickled to death:  to be very amused or think something’s very funny. Example:  Our new puppy tickles us to death because he’s always doing something naughty...read more



DECK

deck someone / something out:  to decorate something in a special way. Example:  Makeup, jewelry and a dress? Why are you all decked out tonight?...read more



Hit the deck:  to drop to the ground and lay down to avoid some type of danger. Example:  When we heard gunshots at the shopping mall everyone hit the deck...read more



stack the deck against someone:  to make arrangements so it’s very difficult for somebody to achieve something. Example:  I wanted to succeed at my new job but my boss...read more



clear the decks:  finish up less important tasks so that a more important project can be started. Example:  Our boss asked us to clear the decks because we have a new...read more



DEMAND

in demand:  something that is needed or desired. Example:  What kinds of new graduates are in demand with private companies these days?...read more



on demand:  at any time something is needed. Example:  On international flights most movies are on demand  stays so it’s easy to be entertained when you travel...read more



DENT

make a dent in something:  to make some progress in something. Example:  I have to read a 653-page book for English and after reading for three hours, I hardly made a dent in it...read more



DEPTH

in depth:  in great detail or completely. Example:  There are lots of guided bus tours that go to five or six different countries but I prefer to see one country in depth...read more



out of one’s depth:  not knowing a lot about something. Example:  I took several yoga classes at my gym but when I went to the yoga retreat I was out of my depth...read more




DOG

dog eat dog:  ruthless competition where people will do anything (even harm other people) to succeed at doing something. Example:  Good luck working in sales—I hear it's a...read more




rain cats and dogs:  to rain heavily without stopping. Example:  I forgot my umbrella so I'll wait here at the office until it stops raining so hard—it's raining cats and dogs right now...read more




DOGHOUSE

in the doghouse:  in trouble or in a situation where someone is upset or angry with you for some reason. Example:  I forgot our anniversary so now I'm really in the doghouse...read more




DRINK

drink like a fish:  to drink too much alcohol at one time. Example:  We're really concerned because Sam's been drinking like a fish  at least 4-5 nights each week...read more




DROP

a drop in the bucket:  a very small or unimportant amount when compared to something else. Example:  The number of sit ups and pull ups you did today are just a drop...read more




DUCK

get / have one's ducks in a row:  get well prepared or organized for something that's going to happen.  I highly recommend we get our ducks in a row before we travel to Africa... read more.



DUMP

down in the dumps:  sad, unhappy, discouraged and/or depressed. Example:  We flew across the country for sunny weather but it's been raining the entire holiday and we all... read more


blow up in one's face:  your plans fail completely, suddenly and cause more problems.  Example:  My plan to surprise my wife for our anniversary blew up in my face when she found the gift and thought I bought it for another woman... read more



face to face (with something):  being directly in front of and facing someone or something.  Example:  My boyfriend broke-up with me over the phone because he was too afraid to do it face to face... read more



in someone's face:  rudely bothering someone.  Example:  My older sister is always in my face about doing my chores and homework... read more



(let's) face it:  the need to look at the real solution and accept it.  Example:  Let's face it—my test scores are not good enough to get a scholarship to college... read more



(let's) face facts:  it's necessary to look at the real situation and accept it.  Example:  It's time to face facts—this marriage is over and I'm leaving... read more



lose face:  to lose the respect of others.  Example:  You're going to lose face with your boss if you keep pretending to be sick... read more


from/off the face of the earth:  completely gone or disappeared.  Example:  I tried to find my favorite earrings but they disappeared from the face of the earth... read more



put on a brave face:  to pretend or act brave or confident in a situation where one doesn't feel that way.  Example:  Our company is doing so badly I think everyone will lose their jobs but I'm putting on a brave face for my team... read more


save face:  to keep the respect of others.  Example:  Telling the truth to your parents about your failing grades will help you save face... read more


stare someone in the face:  to be obvious and clear.  Example:  You wouldn't believe the truth if it was staring you in the face... read more


stuff one's face:  to eat a lot of food.   Example:  You're going to gain a lot of weight if you keep stuffing your face late at night... read more


to tell someone (something) to their face:  directly to someone (especially in person).  Example:  I wish my girlfriend could tell me what the problem is to my face but she only talks to her girlfriends or mother... read more


(until someone is) blue in the face:  to talk or argue for a very long time.  Example:  I could've argued with my parents until I was blue in the face but they'd still never let me go to the party... read more


written all over someone's face:  when one's expression shows their real feelings.  Example:  When I arrived at the hospital I asked to see my dad but his death was written all over my mother's face... read more


keep a straight face:  to keep one's face expressionless and not smile or laugh.  Example:  When the speaker kept criticizing my professor it was hard for us to keep a straight face... read more


take something at face value:  to accept something the way that it appears or looks.  Example:  This guy seems very sweet but be careful of taking people at face value... read more


Idiom list with: FAIL(S)

without fail:  something that is certain, it always happens.  Example:  My husband is amazing—he takes me out to dinner twice a month without fail... read more



if all else fails:  if nothing else succeeds or occurs.  Example:  I want to be an actor but if all else fails I'll join the Army... read more


FAIR

fair and square:  honestly.   Example:  This time I won my match fair and square but no one believed me because I often cheat... read more


Idiom list with "FALL"

fall apart:  everything goes wrong and completely fails or stops working.  Example:  This sweater is so cheap—the first time I washed it it started to fall apart... read more


fall back on (something):  something else to support someone after problem, failure, etc.  Example:  Life insurance gives your family something to fall back on if something happens to you... read more


fall flat on one's face:  to fail completely.  Example:  I didn't practice my dance moves at all during the summer so I fell flat on my face at tryouts... read more


fall for someone:  to fall in love with someone.  Example:  Ugh, my little sister falls for a new guy every month and we have to listen to her talk about him for hours... read more


fall for something:  to believe something that isn't really true.  Example:  When you shop for a new car don't fall for those "no money down" offers—they are a total scam... read more


fall through:  to not occur as planned.  Example:  Our babysitter fell through so I stayed home with the kids while my wife went to the concert... read more


take the fall for (someone/something):  to take responsibility for something that happened.  Example:  My boss didn't finish the report and then wanted me to take the fall for it... read more


Idiom list with "FAMILY"

run in the family:  something (e.g., quality, behavior) that is common in the family.  Example:  Good looks run in that family, at least among the girls... read more


Idiom list with "FAR"

as far as:  to the degree or extent that.  Example:  As far as I can see it looks like it's a great day for a picnic... read more


by far:  a large degree.  Example:  My brother is my father's favorite child by far... read more


far and wide:  to a great extent or area.  Example:  I looked far and wide for new apartment in the city but everything was too expensive... read more


far from it:  far from the real situation; about the opposite of something (used especially to respond to something you think isn't true).  Example:  This is the best band I've ever heard. Oh my God, far from it!.. read more


so far:  at/until this time.  Example:  I just started working here two days ago but so far everything's been great... read more


so far, so good:  at (until) this point the situation is alright/satisfactory.  Example:  "How's your new car running?' "So far, so good".... read more


FARM

bet the farm:  to risk everything one has on something.  Example:  I've got investments with two companies because I'm afraid of betting the farm with one broker... read more


Idiom list with "FATE"

seal someone's/something's fate:  something that makes a decision (usually for an unwanted outcome) for someone or something.  Example:  My terrible grades have sealed my fate—I'll have to join the military... read more


tempt fate:  to take a risk because of a foolish idea or belief.  Example:  Luckily, I passed the test without studying but I'm not going to tempt fate next time... read more


Idiom list with "FAULT"

to a fault:  more than is necessary (used to describe a person's good qualities).  Example:  My mom is helpful to a fault and everyone takes advantage of her... read more



FEATHERS

ruffle someone's feathers:  to make someone upset or bothered.  Example:  When I go to a party and talk to other guys it always ruffles my boyfriend's feathers... read more


Idiom list with "FED"

fed up (with someone/something):  to be bothered and angry by someone/something.  Example:  My assistant was so fed up with driving through rush-hour traffic to the office she quit... read more


Idiom list with "FEEL"

a / the feel for something:  to know how or have the ability to do something.  Example:  Don't worry—after a few months you'll get the feel for driving... read more


feel for someone:  to feel sympathy or empathy for someone.  Example:  My sister has been trying to get pregnant for seven years and I really feel for her... read more



feel free to do something:  to have permission to do something.  Example:  I'm putting the keys to my car here—feel free to drive it whenever you want... read more



(not) feel like oneself:  to feel (not feel) as happy and healthy as usual.  Example:  Ever since I got pregnant, I haven't felt like myself... read more


Idiom list with "FEELINGS"

no hard feelings:  to not be angry about something.  Example:  We decided to use a different supplier and I hope there will be no hard feelings... read more



Idiom list with "FEET"

drag one's feet:  to procrastinate or do something very slowly (or not complete it) because you don't want to do it.  Example:  I've asked my boss to give me a raise but he keeps dragging his feet... read more


one's / both feet on the ground:  to have a clear, realistic understanding of one's situation.  Example:  My daughter's boyfriend is in a rock band but surprisingly he's got both feet on the ground... read more



find one's feet:  to become used to or familiar with a new situation or place.  Example:  It can take months to find your feet in a big city like New York... read more


get one's feet wet:  to try it or experience something different or risky (especially for the first time).  Example:  I finally decided to get my feet wet and registered for acting classes... read more



jump in with both feet:  to start something quickly and enthusiastically.  Example:  The wedding will be in two months so everyone has to jump in with both feet and help plan everything... read more



knock someone off their feet:  to make someone very happy or surprised.  Example:  When I first met Jennifer she completely knocked me off my feet... read more


 land on one's feet:  to survive a difficult situation in good condition.   Example:  I'm so glad I was able to land on my feet after losing my job... read more



put one's feet up:  to relax and not do anything.  Example:  I'm exhausted but when I go to the beach this week I'm going to put my feet up... read more


six feet under:  dead and buried.  Example:  When I worked for John I was on the receiving end of his cruel criticism too many times... read more


stand on one's own (two) feet:  be able to take care of and provide for oneself.  Example:  If you don't want to do chores, move out and stand on your own two feet... read more


sweep someone off their feet:  to make someone fall quickly and completely in love with him.  Example:  My brother has perfected the art of sweeping girls off their feet—and then dumping them a few months later... read more



think on one's feet:  to be able to think and handle a situation quickly.   Example:  Lawyers need to be able to think on their feet when they're in the courtroom... read more



FISH

drink like a fish:  to drink too much alcohol at one time  Example:  Drinking like a fish is bad for your health and bad for your wallet... read more  




FRUIT

bear fruit:  to produce a positive or desired result.  Example:  I really hope that giving up drinking alcohol and desserts will bear fruit in my weight loss efforts... read more

GAME

ahead of the game:  doing well in a situation and making progress.  Example:  I’m always taking training courses so that I can get ahead of the game... read more



back in the game:  to become involved or active in something again.  Example:  After six months of maternity leave, my wife is finally back in the game and returned to work... read more



someone has got game:  to be really good at doing something, especially sports.  Example:  My sister not only plays basketball but she’s got game too... read more



play the game:  to act in the way everyone expects.  Example:  If you want to get promoted in this company, you have to play the game and work really long hours... read more



the only game in town:  there is only one of its type.  Example:  I hate my phone company but they’re the only game in town that offers accounts without a contract... read more



play games:  to lie or behave dishonestly.  Example:  I know my boyfriend is playing games with me because my friend saw him talking to another girl last night but he said he... read more



GANG

gang up on someone:  when several people unite against another person.  Example:  Those girls used to be my friend and then one day they started ganging up on me... read more



GAS

run out of gas:  to completely lose the energy to finish something or continue.  Example:  By the time John reached mile five of the marathon, he’d already run out of gas... read more



step on the gas / step on it:  to work quickly or hurry to complete something.  Example:  You better step on it  if you want to mail the letter by 5 PM... read more



GEARS

shift gears / switch gears:  to suddenly stop what you’re doing and do something else.  Example:  She’d been working in accounting for several years but decided to switch gears... read more



GENIE

the genie is out of the bottle:  information is now known to everyone.  Example:  I tried to keep my pregnancy a secret but my secretary found out and now the genie is out of... read more



GET

get something across / get across something:  to make something understood.  Example:  Could you please let me finish speaking? I’m trying to get my point across... read more


get ahead:  to achieve success in something.  Example:  If you want to get ahead  you’re going to have to work smarter not harder... read more



get along (with someone):  to have a good relationship with someone.  Example:  Luckily, my cat and my dog get along very well with each other... read more



get around something:  to find a different way to avoid a problem or difficult situation.  Example:  I’m going to turn here and drive down the side road to try to get around traffic... read more



get around to doing something:  to find and take the time to do something.  Example:  When you get around to doing the grocery shopping can you also pick up my dry cleaning?... read more



get away from it all:  to go to a different place than the usual place (to a place that's less stressful or more peaceful).  Example:  Many people go to the beach to get away from it all... read more



get away with something:  to avoid being punished or blamed for doing something wrong.  Example:  Since my little sister is the baby, she gets away with everything... read more



get back at someone:  to retaliate against someone who did something to you.  Example:  My boss got back at me for telling his boss he was late... read more



get by:  to have just enough to survive.  Example:  He couldn’t get by as an artist so he also waits tables at the restaurant... read more



get in:  to arrive somewhere.  Example:  I’d like to take the train that gets in  at 3: 50 PM on Wednesday... read more



get something in /get in something:  to find the time to do something.  Example:  I have to find the time to get a workout in at the gym this afternoon... read more



get it together:  to become organized or prepared.  Example:  Get it together  quickly or you're going to lose your job!... read more



get lost (slang):  go away.  Example:  I wanted to play with my brother but he told me to get lost... read more



get off easy / lightly:  to not be punished as much as expected.  Example:  My boss stole $50,000 from the company but he got off easily—they simply fired him rather than... read more

 

get on with something:  to start or begin something.  Example:  I don't want to do my homework but I have to do it so I may as well get on with it... read more



get out of something / get out of doing something:  to avoid having to do something you are supposed to do.  Example:  I pretended I forgot my swimsuit so I got out of swim... read more



get real:  to be realistic; to see things the way the really are not pretend something else is happening.  Example:  If you want to be the quarterback of the football team you... read more



get something out of someone:  to cause someone to tell you something or provide information.  Example:  The police interrogated the murderer for two days until they... read more



get something over with:  to finish something that you don't want to do.    Example:  I'm going to get my homework over with so I can watch TV tonight... read more



get somewhere / anywhere:  to make progress.  Example:  You've got to work 80 hour weeks if you want to get  somewhere in corporate law... read more



get through to someone:  1) to connect a call and speak to someone on the phone;  2) to make someone understand you.  Example:  I keep trying to get through to the airlines but... read more 



from the get-go:  from the beginning or start.  Example:  I hated my roommate from the get-go... read more



GIVE

give and take:  a situation where a person(s) give something in order to get something from someone else.  Example:  Finding a language partner is a give and take.  You can't... read more 



give in (to someone / something):  to agree to something you previously didn't agree to.  Example:  My parents always give in if I keep asking them the same thing over... read more



give it to someone straight:  to tell someone bad or difficult information honestly and directly.  Example:  I'm glad that the doctor gave it to you straight  so you can... read more



give or take:  approximately a certain amount.  Example:  It will take an hour, give or take,  to drive downtown during rush hour traffic or just 20 minutes if we wait until this... read more



give out:  1) to be completely finished or not of use anymore; 2) to stop working.  Example:  After three years, my favorite pair of boots finally gave out  and I had to throw them...read more



give up:  to stop trying to achieve something and accept failure.  Example:  Winners never give up until they succeed... read more



give up something / give something up:  to stop doing or having something.  Example:  After I got pregnant I had to immediately give up smoking... read more



GLASS(ES)

see the glass half full:  to see a situation as more positive than negative.  Example:  I hate people who always see the glass half full—they're so annoying!... read more



see the glass half empty:  to see a situation as more negative then positive.  Example:  I don't know how they stay together! My mom is cheerful and positive about everything... read more



through rose-colored glasses:  to see things as better than they really are.  Example:  My son has a terrible habit of seeing his singing career possibilities through rose-colored glasses... read more



GLUED

glued to something:  concentrating and giving something one's full attention.  Example:  My dog is always glued to the door at 6:30 because that's when my father usually arrives ... read more



GO

go all out:  to put all one's energy and resources into something.  Example:  When I throw a party, I go all out:  I serve great food and drinks, put up decorations and even give out... read more



go along with (someone / something):  to agree to something someone else wants.  Example:  I didn't want to move again but I went along with it  because I know my wife really... read more



go around in circles / go around and around:  1) to move around in a circle;  2) to talk about something without reaching an agreement or decision.  Example:  I hate going to management meetings! They always last two hours and the discussions go around in circles... read more



go back on something:  to fail to keep a promise.  Example:  I'm so angry! My parents said I could go to the party Saturday but now they've gone back on their promise... read more



go easy on someone:  to be gentle and mild with someone.  Example:  My daughter is starting her first job tomorrow and I hope they will go easy on her... read more



go for something: 1) try to obtain or achieve something; 2) to choose something.  Example:  There's a new position that opened up in our department and I'm definitely going... read more




GOLD

heart of gold:  A person who is kind, caring and generous. Example:  My son has a heart of gold  and does everything he can to help us out around the house but my daughter is...read more




GRAVE

dig one's own grave:  doing something that will cause you to have problems in the future.  Example:  I dug my own grave by skipping so many classes this semester... read more

HABIT

kick the habit:  stop (quit) smoking cigarettes or doing other bad habits.  Example:  She kicked the habit  a year ago but then she gained 20 lbs, which is common when smokers stop smoking... read more



HACK

can’t hack it:  to not be able to do something or handle a situation successfully.  Example:  I tried going to law school but I couldn’t hack it... read more



HAD

have had it (with someone / something):  not willing to continue doing or experiencing something (often because you’re tired).  Example:  Don’t talk to me like that again I’ve had it with your attitude... read more



had better:  must or should do something.  Example:  You had better get good grades or you’ll lose your scholarship... read more



HEAD

have / bury one's head in the sand:  not willing to look at a situation because it is unpleasant while also hoping the situation or problem will go away without doing anything about it.   Example:  Here are three overdue bills! I can't believe you're burying your head in the sand  again... read more




keep one's head above water:  1) to have just enough to live or survive (especially having enough money); 2) to manage to do all of your work.  Example:  Now that I'm working in the office I'm just keeping my head above water  with all of the housework, cleaning and shopping... read more



HAIL

hail from somewhere:  come from a place (city/state/country, etc.).  Example:  I hail from the great state of New York... read more



HAIR(S)

let one’s hair down:  to feel relaxed and comfortable enough to act and do what you want.  Example:  The only time my mom lets her hair down at parties is if she has had several drinks... read on



make one’s hair stand on end:  to be really scared or frightened.  Example:  When Sandy went camping, the noises outside the tent made her hair stand on end... read more



pull / tear one’s hair out:  to be extremely upset about something.  Example:  When my assistant forgot to give me the director’s message I was pulling my hair out... read more



split hairs:  to argue about small details or differences.  Example:  Although we both agreed to divorce, my husband is splitting hairs  about our settlement... read more



HALF

half the battle:  a major part of the work that needs to be done.  Example:  When trying to lose weight, eating healthy is only half the battle... read more



half a mind to do something:  considering doing something.  Example:  My dog had half a mind to eat the steak but she jumped off the table when she heard me coming... read more



how the other half lives:  the way people who have a lot more or a lot less money live.  Example:  She’s never lived anywhere except Beverly Hills so she has no idea how the other half lives... read more



not half bad:  not that bad, okay, almost good.  Example:  My mom’s pasta dishes are not half bad but she makes terrible desserts... read more



(not) the half of it:  not the crucial or most important part of something.  Example:  The money is not the half of it—the real issue is that you lied to me... read more



HALT

grind to a halt:  to slowly and completely stop.  Example:  After two days of snow, the city ground to a halt... read more



HAMMER

hammer something home (hammer home something):  to repeat an idea or opinion to make it persuasive and understood.  Example:  My colleague mentioned his Ivy League education all day to try to hammer home his superior intelligence... read more



hammer out something (hammer something out):  to create an agreement to solve a problem or situation.  Example:  The most important thing is that we agreed to work together—we can hammer out the details at our next meeting... read more



HAND(S)

at hand:  happening now or present at this time.  Example:  We will have four nurses at hand to give flu shots to attendees who want them... read more


bite the hand that feeds you:  criticize the person or thing that helps you or gives you money/benefits.  Example:  Your parents are strict but you’re 25 years old and still getting money from them so be careful about biting the hand that feeds you... read more



by hand:  something hand-made or done without the help of the machine.  Example:  This furniture was made by hand so it’s very unique and carefully crafted... read more


change hands:  to move from one owner to a new owner.  Example:  This old house has changed hands 15 times since it was built 200 years ago... read more



do something with one hand (arm) tied behind one’s back:  to be able to do something very easily.  Example:  I’m so good at building model airplanes I could do it with one hand tied behind my back... read more


force someone’s hand:  to make someone do something before they want to do it.  Example:  I wanted to wait three months before I told my boss I was pregnant but morning sickness forced my hand and I had to explain why it was always late... read more


get one’s hands dirty:  to get personally involved in doing the basic work for something.  Example:  My boss is great because she’ll get her hands dirty and help us with mailings and phone calls whenever we get really busy... read more



give (lend) someone a hand:  to help someone.  Example:  You’ve got both arms full of groceries, can I give you a hand opening the door?.. read more



go hand in hand:  to work well together.  Example:  Try these headphones—they go hand in hand with that MP3 player... read more



hand down something (hand something down):  to give a used item to another person (especially to a younger person in a family).  Example:  I’m the fourth girl in the family so almost all my clothes are handed down to me... read more


hand out something (hand something out):  to give something to people present at a meeting or event.  Example:  Could you please hand out these brochures to each person?.. read more


hand over someone / something (hand someone/something over):  to give someone or something to someone else.  Example:  The policeman stopped the car for speeding and asked the driver to hand over his driver's license and insurance... read more


have the upper hand:  to have an advantage or power over someone or a situation.  Example:  The spouse who earns money outside the home often has the upper hand in the marriage... read more


have one’s hands full (one’s hands are full):  to be very busy.  Example:  During registration we have our hands full with many different tasks... read more


have someone / something on one’s hands:  to be responsible for someone or something.  Example:  Unfortunately, I’ve got a serious problem on my hands with the new factory in Thailand so I’ve got to travel there tomorrow... read more


in good (safe) hands:  being taken care of or managed very carefully.  Example:  When I leave my dog at the kennel, I know he’s in good hands because I can see him on videocam and there’s always someone with him... read more


keep one’s hands off something:  to not touch or be involved in something.  Example:  Keep your hands off the antiques—I don’t want to have to buy something because you break it... read more


lay a hand on someone:  to physically hurt someone.  Example:  If my husband ever lays a hand on me, I will leave him immediately and never return... read more


on hand:  something that is immediately available.  Example:  The new fire station has two fire trucks on hand to handle any emergencies... read more


on the other hand [on the one hand… on the other (hand)]:  the other thing to think about and consider.  Example:  We can go to see your mother a Christmas or on the other hand, we could invite her to join us for a holiday trip to the mountains... read more


one’s hands are tied:  someone is unable to act or do something.  Example:  I wish I could sell you a ticket to the game but the system is down right now so my hands are tied... read more


out of hand:  1) not controlled, 2) without additional consideration.  Example:  The party got out of hand and they had to call the police... read more


shake someone’s hand (shake hands):  a form of greeting (and often on departing) where two people grasp hands and move them up and down.  Example:  I’m sorry I can’t shake your hand today because I broke my finger... read more


show your hand:  to tell other people information or what you’re going to do.  Example:  Now I’m careful not to show my hand to my colleague because he stole two of my ideas and proposed them to the director... read more


try your hand at something:  to try to do something.  Example:  Normally I don’t like to exercise but I’m going to try my hand at golf... read more


wash one’s hands of someone / something:  to stop being involved or responsible for someone/something.  Example:  When my kids became 18 years old I washed my hands of doing their laundry... read more


wait on someone hand and foot:  to do everything to help someone else.  Example:  When I broke both of my legs my mother had to come and wait on me hand and foot... read more



HANG

get the hang of something:  learn how to do something.  Example:  I got the hang of ice-skating the first time I tried it... read more


hang around:   1) to stay in a place; 2) to be with another person.  Example:  The kids that hang around the library always do well in school... read more



hang in there:   to continue to do something despite difficulties.  Example:  Hang in there—it usually takes six months to find a good job... read more


hang it up:  to stop doing something.  Example:  You’ve been working for 12 hours!  Why don’t you hang it up  and go to sleep?.. read more


hang on:  1) to wait; 2) to hold something tightly.  Example:  Hang on, I’ll be right back... read more


hang onto:  to keep something.  Example:  I’m going to hang onto your passport until we check you into the hotel and then I’ll return it to you... read more


hang someone out to dry:  to refuse to help or support someone.  Example:  I can’t believe you’re hanging me out to dry when you promised to drive me to work!.. read more


hang out (with someone):  to spend time with someone.  Example:  Sorry I can’t go with you. I like to hang out with my parents on Sundays... read more


hang tough:  to keep doing something despite pressure to stop.  Example:  Even though we were 20 points behind, we hung tough and played hard the whole game... read more


hang up:  to end a telephone connection.  Example:  Before we hang up, I want to tell you about my vacation plans next month... read more


hang up on someone:  end a telephone conversation before it is finished.  Example:  I can’t believe my mother just hung up on me when I asked her for some money... read more



HEAD

Head in the sand:  to ignore or refuse to think about a problem or something unpleasant.  Example:  I developed a bad habit about burying my head in the sand  regarding my finances and finally I had no choice but to file for bankruptcy... read more




HEART

heart of gold:  A person who is kind, caring and generous.   Example:  That doctor has a heart of gold—he listens to his patients and always calls us later to make sure we are feeling better... read more



HEAVEN

a match made in heaven:  a perfect couple or combination of things.  Example:  Even though my grandparents are very different they are still a match made in heaven... read more



HIT

hit it off:  to immediately become friends (or very friendly) with someone.  Example:  My parents actually didn't hit it off when they first met but luckily for me they met again two years later and had a better meeting... read more




hit the road:  to leave (especially to go home); to depart on a journey (especially to travel to a place by car).  Example:  As soon as we hit the road we got into an accident so we never went camping last weekend... read more



HITCH

to get hitched:  to marry. (informal)   Example:  I thought I'd never get hitched  but after your mom got pregnant there wasn't really any other choice in those days... read more




HOOK

off the hook:  1) not in a difficult situation anymore; no longer in trouble. 2) when a telephone receiver is not put correctly on the phone and it prevents calls from coming in.  Example:  You're off the hook!  Sandy called to say she's sick so you don't have to go over and clean her house today... read more




HORSE

straight from the horse's mouth:  directly from the person who knows the most about the matter; someone who knows the facts.  Example:  Be careful about the rumors that float around this school—so many of them are wrong that I only believe what I hear straight from the horse's mouth... read more




hold one's horses:  1) slow down;  2) wait a moment;  3) be patient... Honey, you better hold your horses—we're driving through a school zone... read more




HOOP(S)

go / jump through hoops:  to do a series of difficult or unpleasant things in order to get something you want or do something you need to do.  Example:  I hate having to go through so many hoops driving, parking and then taking the subway every day just to get to my job in the city—so I'm thinking about finding something new... read more



HOUR

eleventh hour:  the last moment or almost too late.  Example:  I waited until the eleventh hour to submit my application but luckily I finished it on time... read more



happy hour:  a period of time in the early evening when drinks are sold cheaply in a bar.  Example:  I met a really nice girl at happy hour yesterday so I'm going back this evening to meet her for another drink... read more



lunch hour:  the period in the middle of the day when people stop work to have lunch.  Example:  I hate my job so my lunch hour is my favorite part of the day... read more



rush hour:  a busy time when people are traveling to or from work.  Example:  There's so much traffic that it takes me 45 minutes to get to work by bus during rush hour and only 15 minutes to walk... read more

ICE

break the ice:  to start a conversation with someone that you meet for the first time. Example:  At the conference will have several activities to help people break the ice... read more




(skating / walking) on thin ice:  to be in an uncertain, risky situation.  Example:  If you keep arriving late to work, soon you’ll be skating on thin ice... read more


put something on ice:  to delay something.  Example:  We decided to put the project on ice until we hire a new project manager... read more



ICING

icing on the cake:  an extra benefit or additional good thing added to something.  Example:  I wanted to go see that LA Lakers play for so long, the great seats were just icing on the cake... read more


IDEA

float an idea:  to propose an idea just to see if people are interested.  Example:  I’d like to stop by your office today to float some ideas about promoting the conference... read more


not have the faintest idea:  to have no understanding about something.  Example:  I don’t have the faintest idea how I got home last night from the bar... read more


IF

if worst comes to worst:  in the worst possible situation.  Example:  If worst comes to worst, we can take a taxi home from the concert... read more



IN

in a bad mood:  feeling sad or depressed.  Example:  Why are you always in a bad mood these days?... read more



in a bad way:  in a very serious condition; very ill.  Example:  My grandma’s been in a bad way since my grandfather died last month... read more


in a bind:  in a difficult situation.  Example:  Could you lend me $20? I’m in a bind because I forgot my wallet at home... read more


in a family way:  pregnant; expecting a baby.  Example:  How can I say this politely? Are you in a family way?... read more


in a hurry:  rushing or moving around quickly.  Example:  I wish we could leave home earlier and not always have to drive to school in a hurry... read more


in a jam:  in trouble or in a difficult situation.  Example:  If you get in a jam, here’s my phone number so you can reach me... read more


in a jiffy:  quickly or very soon.  Example:  I’m late for a party so could you wrap that gift in a jiffy?... read more


in a little bit:  in a short period of time; soon.  Example:  Let’s go find our seats; the game's going to start in a little bit... read more


in a mad rush:  extremely hurried.  Example:  I left my house in a mad rush this morning and forgot my lunch on the kitchen counter... read more



in a nutshell:  in summary.  Example:  “The dog ate your homework?” “In a nutshell,  yes".... read more



in a pickle:  in a difficult situation  Example:  When you decided not to call and tell us you were coming in to work today you really left us in a pickle... read more



in a pinch:  something that will work if what’s needed isn’t available.  Example:  In a pinch you can use molasses instead of brown sugar in this recipe... read more



in a rush:  in a hurry, moving around quickly.  Example:  I was in such a rush I forgot to turn off the iron and had to go back home so I was really late for work this morning... read more


in a rut:  doing the same thing again and again.  Example:  I was in a rut at the gym doing the same cardio exercises but when I added weight training, I really started to lose weight... read more


in and of itself:  without considering anything else.  Example:  I love the balcony in and of itself so I’ll rent the apartment... read more


in a sense:  in a way, sort of.  Example:  In a sense, talking with my parents through video chat is almost like being there with them... read more


in a split second:  very quickly.  Example:  In a split second a dog ran in the road in front of my car and I almost hit it... read more


In a stew (about something):  upset and bothered about something.  Example:  My husband sat on the sofa all day in a stew because I asked him to help me do some housework... read more


in a stupor:  in a confused condition.  Example:  After I took some cold medicine I was in such a stupor I couldn’t do any more work or even drive home... read more


in a tight spot:  in a very difficult situation.  Example:  I wish I could lend you some money but I’m in a tight spot myself... read more


in a word:  in summary, in brief.  Example:  In a word—Yes, I’d love to go with you... read more


in a world of one’s own:  1) In such deep thought you don’t notice anything around you;  2) caring about oneself and not about others.  Example:  I’m sorry I wasn’t listening a moment ago—I was in a world of my own... read more


in advance:  before something happens.  Example:  In order to attend the event you need to pay all the fees in advance... read more



in all likelihood:  most likely, the most probable outcome.  Example:  In all likelihood, I’ll get married and have kids when I’m in my 30's... read more


in all shapes and sizes:  in a variety of types and forms.  Example:  Our store has fashion styles for people in all shapes and sizes... read more


in any case:  regardless, no matter what happens.  Example:  In any case, if you forget to pack anything you can buy it during the trip... read more



in any event:  regardless, no matter what happens.  Example:  In any event, we’ll arrive sometime during the afternoon on Sunday and then take a taxi to your house... read more


in arrears:  to be late with a payment, overdue.  Example:  Sir, your account is three months in arrears and we will close it if we don’t receive full payment by Friday... read more


in bad faith:  intending to cause harm or be dishonest.  Example:  The company offered me the job in bad faith—I did not get an office or parking space as promised... read more



in bad taste:  not proper or suitable; offensive to others.  Example:  Wearing jeans and sneakers to the wedding was really in bad taste... read more


in black and white:  in writing.  Example:  Thanks so much for the verbal offer but I also need to receive it in black and white... read more


in broad daylight:  publicly so anyone can see.  Example:  The thief stole my car in broad daylight  but no one noticed... read more


in bulk:  in large quantity.  Example:  We always buy cereal, toilet paper and cleaning supplies in bulk to save money... read more


in charge of (someone / something):  responsible for someone or something.  Example:  This is Maria. She’s in charge of ordering supplies  so please let her know what you need... read more


In conjunction with (someone / something):  working together with someone/something.  Example:  We’re doing this conference in conjunction with our local trade association... read more


in deep water:  in serious trouble.  Example:  I was supposed to finish the report two hours ago but I haven’t even started so I’m in deep water... read more


in depth:  complete and in detail.  Example:  This report examines the past 40 years of economic growth in this city in depth... read more



in flux:  constantly changing.  Example:  My company has transferred me to new offices three times in three years so my private life is also in flux... read more


in on something:  to participate in doing something with others.  Example:  Who is in on the planning for the holiday party?... read more


INCH

every inch of something:  every part of something.  Example:  I’ve lived here for 50 years so I know every inch of the city... read more


give an inch:  to partly agree to something.  Example:  I had to divorce my husband because he never gave an inch about anything... read more



INFLUENCE

under the influence:  feeling the effects of alcohol or drugs.  Example:  Don’t drink and drive—there are severe penalties for people who are under the influence when they drive... read more



INITIATIVE

take the initiative:  to be the first one to make an effort to do something.  Example:  To succeed in this large company you have to take the initiative and volunteer for projects... read more


INS

ins and outs of something:  the details of something.  Example:  I suggest you watch that guy carefully—he knows the ins and outs of how to get requests approved around here... read more


INSIDE

know something inside out:  know something completely (everything about it).  Example:  I’m going to ace this exam—I know the material inside out... read more


turn something inside out:  to completely change something.  Example:  Having a baby has turned my life inside out... read more


INSULT

add insult to injury:  to make a bad situation even worse.  Example:  Breaking up with me was bad enough but doing it by email added insult to injury... read more


INTENTS

for all intents and purposes:  almost completely, nearly something.  Example:  When you write a blog, you’re a “published” writer for all intents and purposes... read more


IRON(S)

iron something out (iron out something):  to solve the remaining problems.  Example:  We need to iron out the travel details for our trip by this weekend... read more


several irons in the fire:  to have several different activities or projects in progress at the same time; having several possibilities at the same time.  Example:  I have several irons in the fire to make sure I’ll have a job when I graduate... read more


ISSUE

to take issue with someone / something:  to disagree with someone or something.  Example:  I take issue with fanatics who disrupt events... read more


EACH

to each one's own:  each person has his or her own opinion and/or way of doing something.  Example:  I don't understand how people can still smoke cigarettes—well, to each their own... read more


EAR(S)

grin (smile) from ear to ear:  to make a huge smile.  Example:  He's smiling from ear to ear  because he just bought a new car... read more



have an ear for something:  to be good at hearing and repeating sounds in speech or in music.  Example:  Your accent in French is so good—you really have an ear for languages... read more



have someone's ear:  to have access to speak to someone and express one's opinion.  Example:  Don't worry, I've got the ear of the director so I'll make sure he knows what happened... read more



in one ear and out the other:  when a person hears something and doesn't remember it.  Example:  I have to repeat everything to my kids several times; everything I say goes in one ear and out the other... read more



keep an ear out (for someone/something):  to actively try to hear something.  Example:  I'm looking for a new job so please keep an ear out for any positions that may become available... read more



play it by ear:  to handle a situation as it happens without making a plan in advance.  Example:  I don't know exactly what I'm going to do this weekend; I'm going to play it by ear... read more



turn a deaf ear (to something):  to not listen to what someone is saying.  Example:  When my manager started talking about the holiday party, everyone turned a deaf ear... read more



get an earful:   to have to listen to someone talk a long time about something.  Example:  When I politely said hello and asked my neighbor how she was doing I didn't expect to get an earful... read more



all ears:  ready and eager to listen to what someone is saying.  Example:  When my teacher said there was an easy way to pass the test I was all ears... read more



not believe one's ears:  to be very surprised about something you hear.  Example:  When the doctor said I was four month's pregnant, I couldn't believe my ears... read more



fall  on deaf ears:  when something someone says is completely ignored.  Example:  My work performance has been great, but I'm still worried my request for a raise will fall on deaf ears... read more




EARLY

early on:  a short time after something has started.  Example:  Early on in the day I had a terrible headache but now I'm feeling fine... read more



it's early days (yet):  it's too soon to decide about something or make a judgment.  Example:  I think the chemotherapy has killed the cancer but it's early days yet... read more



wet behind the ears:  young, immature or not experienced.  Example:  I will ask the new intern to try to write the report but she's wet behind the ears  so I don't know if she can do it... read more



music to someone's ears:  information that someone is glad to hear.  Example:  My son's decision to move home was music to my ears... read more



EASE

at ease:  feeling relaxed and comfortable.  Example:  The little girl felt very at ease with her new playmates at school... read more



ill at ease:   feeling anxious and uncomfortable.  Example:  I felt very ill at ease waiting for the results of my final exams... read more



EAT

eat someone alive:  to make someone feel pain, guilt or suffer.  Example:  Lying to my wife about our finances really ate me alive, so I finally told her I've been using the credit cards... read more



eat away at something:  to make something a little smaller and smaller over time.  Example:  Every cigarette your smoking is slowly eating away at your health... read more



eat something up:  to really like or enjoy something.  Example:  My best friend has a really fake laugh and I hate it but all the guys eat it up... read more



eat crow:  to admit in front of other people that you were wrong about something.  Example:  Jane had to eat crow when the actual results of the ad campaign were announced... read more



eat like a horse:  to frequently eat a large amount of food.  Example:  My daughter is super skinny but you'd never believe she eats like a horse... read more



eat like a pig:  to eat with poor manners (e.g., chew with one's mouth open, make loud noises with one's lips, put a lot of food at one time in one's mouth).  Example:  My boyfriend eats like a pig so I'm afraid to take him to my parent's for dinner... read more



eat someone out of house and home:  to eat a lot of food when you're at someone's home.  Example:  I have to go to the supermarket again because my grandchildren are eating me out of house and home... read more



eat one's words:  to admit being wrong about something.  Example:  I was sure that my girlfriend was going to say yes but sadly, I'm eating my words... read more



EDGE

(keep someone) on/at the edge of their seat:  to remain interested and excited about something because they don't know what's going to happen.  Example:  I was at the edge of my seat for the entire five sets of the Australian open's finals last night... read more



lose one's edge:  to no longer have the skills or ability to be as successful as before.  Example:  He used to be the best golfer but after he got married he lost his edge... read more



on edge:  nervous, worried or agitated.  Example:  He's on edge because his daughter was supposed to be at home two hours ago... read more



on the cutting edge (of something):  something that is the first of a new technology, etc.  Example:  Apple's products are always on the cutting edge, then everyone tries to copy them... read more



live on the edge:  1) to be very poor; 2) to be in a difficult and uncertain situation that could be dangerous.  Example:  Since he lost his job he's been living on the edge and has decided to move back to his parents'... read more



take the edge off:  to minimize the effect of something that's uncomfortable or unpleasant.  Example:  Happy hour is for people who want to take the edge off a stressful week of work... read more




EGGS

put all one's eggs in one basket:  to risk everything you have in a situation (e.g., money, reputation, chances) by putting everything into that one idea or plan. Example:  My son put all his eggs in one basket by only applying to Harvard University, but luckily he was accepted... read more



walking on eggshells:  being very careful not to anger or upset someone.  Example:  Whenever my mother-in-law visits I'm walking on eggshells in my own home... read more



ELEMENT

in one's element:  comfortable doing something one likes and is good at.  Example:  Susie hates talking to strangers at parties but when she gets on the dance floor she's in her element... read more



EMPTY

running on empty:  having little energy and will to do something. (Like a car that has an almost empty gas tank.)   Example:  By the end of the two week camping trip everyone was running on empty... read more



END

at the end of the day:  finally, at the end of something.  Example:  At the end of the day we missed our flight because there was a long line at airport security... read more



at one's wit's end:  so completely frustrated and upset that you're unsure what to do.  Example:  I've tried to do my math homework for more than three hours and now I'm at my wit's end... read more



end of / end of story (spoken in informal English):  there is no more discussion about an issue.  Example:  Go upstairs now and clean up your room, end of story... read more



end up:  to reach a final place or situation.  Example:  I never thought I'd end up divorced with four kids at age 33... read more



get the short end of the stick:  to get the inferior or less favorable result of a situation compared to someone else.  Example:  I definitely got the short end of the stick after my divorce... read more



go off the deep end:  to be so upset that one cannot control one's emotions and actions.  Example:  When dad finds out you bent his golf club he's going to go off the deep end... read more



in the end:  finally, the final result.  Example:  In the end, we stayed home and watched TV instead of going to the party... read more



ever/never hear the end (of it):  to have to listen to someone talk about something annoying for a long period of time.  Example:  If I don't remember to put down the toilet seat, my wife never lets me hear the end of it... read more



(to) no end:  a lot, very much.  Example:  I love my dogs no end... read more



no end in sight:  it seems impossible for a situation to change or stop.  Example:  I've been cleaning the garage for two days with no end in sight... read more



not the end of the world:  not the worst possible thing or situation.  Example:  If you don't get into business school it won't be the end of the world... read more



on end:  continuously for a period of time (e.g., hours, days, weeks, years).  Example:  When you're deployed in the military you can be away from your family for months on end... read more



on the receiving end:  getting the undesired or unpleasant effects of something.  Example:  When I worked for John I was on the receiving end of his cruel criticism too many times... read more



end of the line/road:  the final part of something.  Example:  Our marriage really reached the end of the road  during our honeymoon — but we didn't divorce until 10 months later... read more



to the bitter end:  to continue doing something (that's often unpleasant) until you reach the very end.   Example:  The book was so boring but I kept reading to the bitter end... read more

JACK

jack of all trades:  someone who can do many different types of things.  Example:  My mom’s a jack of all trades—she learned how to do the repairs around the house; does all the housework and cooking; and can even fix our computers... read more



jack up something (jack something up):  to instantly increase something very much.  Example:  Credit card companies wait until their customers have high balances on their accounts and then they jack up their interest rates... read more


JACKPOT

hit the jackpot:  to achieve great success (like winning the jackpot—a large amount of money in gambling games).  Example:  Lady Gaga hit the jackpot with her first two CDs... read more


JAM

jam on the brakes:  to quickly and strongly use the brakes to stop a vehicle or car.  Example:  I had to jam on the brakes to avoid hitting a dog this morning and I was shaking for the rest of the ride to work... read more



jam packed:  very crowded or full.  Example:  The concert was jam packed with so many people it was hard to see anything... read more


jam on it:  hurry or move.  Example:  We'd better jam on it  or we'll be late to our appointment... read more



JAW

one’s jaw drops (open):  to show great surprise.  Example:  When our son saw that we bought him a new car for his birthday, his jaw dropped open... read more


JAZZ

jazz up something (jazz something up):  to make something more interesting, exciting.  Example:  The barista jazzed up my hot cocoa with a cute spider web... read more




and all that jazz:  and all those other similar things.  Example:  On the first day of class they’ll give you the syllabus, book list, tell you about tests and grading, and all that jazz... read more



be jazzed about something:  to be excited about something.  Example:  I’m so jazzed about my new bike I’m going to ride it to work every day... read more


JEOPARDY

in jeopardy:  in danger.  Example:  You’re putting your scholarship in jeopardy by partying and not studying... read more


JERK

jerk someone around:  to lie and try to deceive someone about something.  Example:  I thought my boyfriend was serious about our relationship but he was just jerking me around and he never planned to marry me... read more


JEST

in jest:  joking.  Example:  When I said I quit my job it was only in jest... read more


JOB

do the job:  to get the same result as another method.  Example:  If you don’t have lemon juice, lime juice will do the job... read more


on the job:  while working.  Example:  We have a strict rule that there’s no checking Facebook on the job... read more


JOCKEY

jockey for position:  to try to move around to get the best position or advantage.  Example:  After my boss said she was leaving the company, everyone started jockeying for position to run the department... read more


JOG

jog one’s memory:  to try to cause someone to remember something.  Example:  Does this empty pack of cigarettes jog your memory about your promise to quit smoking?.. read more


JOIN

join forces (with someone):  to unite with someone or work together.  Example:  We should join forces and go running every day after school to lose weight... read more


join hands (with someone):  to clasp hands, hold hands with others.  Example:  I love it at church when we join hands and wish each other peace... read more


join in:  to participate in an activity.  Example:  Could I join in on your support group this evening?.. read more


join the fray:  participate in a fight or argument that had already started.  Example:  My son always looks for any opportunity to join the fray whenever a fight breaks out at school... read more


joined at the hip:  together with someone all the time, closely connected.  Example:  My son and our little puppy have been joined at the hip ever since we brought him home from the shelter... read more



JOKE

no joke:  it’s a serious matter.  Example:  I’m sorry but this is no joke—I suggest you stop laughing and listen to me carefully or I’ll call your parents... read more


play a joke on someone:  to do something to make someone feel embarrassed or dumb.  Example:  My friends played a joke on me pretending that they forgot my birthday and I was almost in tears... read more


take a joke:  to keep good humor when someone makes fun of you.  Example:  There are five boys in my family and I’m the only girl. Luckily, I can take a joke because they’re always tormenting me... read more



JOT

jot something down (jot down something):  write something quickly.  Example:  Grab a pencil and jot down this number for me... read more


JOY

jump for joy:  to be very excited and happy about something.  Example:  When the number of my YouTube subscribers grew to 1,000 people I was jumping for joy... read more


JUDGE

you can’t judge a book by its cover:  it's not good to decide about something based on its outward appearance only.  Example:  In Los Angeles, you can’t judge a book by its cover because some of the richest people shop in jeans and a T-shirt... read more


judge someone / something on its own merits:  evaluate something by its own achievements and accomplishments.  Example:  I really hope this company will judge each applicant by his or her own merits but I think it’s more about who you know... read more


JUDGMENT

against one’s better judgment:  making a decision that isn’t the best one for you.  Example:  A year ago, I decided to lend my friend $2,000 against my better judgment and now she hasn’t paid me back a penny and avoids me... read more


pass judgment on someone / something:  to make a strong opinion about something.  Example:  Dad, before you pass judgment on my boyfriend, I want to tell you he’s a straight-A student and his father’s a doctor... read more


sit in judgment of someone / something:  to decide if someone is guilty/innocent, or good/bad.  Example:  You have no right to sit in judgment of who I date—you’re supposed to be my friend and support me... read more


JUMP

get a jump on someone/something:  to act before someone/something to get an early advantage.  Example:  We left an hour early for the beach to get a jump on weekend traffic... read more


jump all over someone:  to severely criticize, blame or accuse someone.  Example:  When I was 15 minutes late coming home my dad jumped all over me and searched my purse... read more



jump at something:  to quickly and eagerly take an opportunity.  Example:  I jumped at the first opportunity to work so that’s how I started mowing lawns when I was 10 years old... read more


jump down someone’s throat:  to severely criticize someone.  Example:  Don’t jump down his throat just because you disagree or he’ll stop talking to us... read more



jump in / jump right in:  to quickly get involved in something.  Example:  Don’t try to jump in when your mother and I are talking... read more


jump in with both feet:  to quickly and completely get involved with something.  Example:  Whenever I start a new sport, I jump in with both feet and buy all the equipment, clothing and lessons... read more


jump off the deep end:  to take immediate and drastic action.  Example:  Don’t jump off the deep end and move from this apartment just because you saw one little mouse... read more



jump off the shelves:  to sell very quickly.  Example:  Sorry, we don’t have any more of those phones left—when they went on sale last Friday they jumped off the shelves... read more


(almost / nearly) jump out of one’s skin:  to be suddenly very frightened.  Example:  When I was walking to my car, a rat ran out in front of me and I almost jumped out of my skin... read more


jump the gun:  to start before it’s time to begin.  Example:  Last year we jumped the gun with our sales promotion, so this year we better find a better date and make sure everyone is ready... read more



go / jump through hoops:  to do a series of difficult or unpleasant things in order to get something you want or something you need to do.  Example:  My husband jumped through hoops to get my son into private school and he got expelled the second day!.. read more



jump to conclusions:  to assume something or make a decision without carefully thinking about it.  Example:  We found these condoms in your purse—but before we jump to conclusions we wanted to talk to you... read more


JURY

the jury is still out:  a decision still hasn’t been made.  Example:  “Are you going to Europe the summer?” “The jury's still out but I’ll find out if my holiday request is approved very soon.”.. read more



JUST

just in case:  if something happens.  Example:  Just in case I’m late this evening, please take the dog out for a walk... read more


just now:  a short time ago.  Example:  Just now on the news they announced there was a terrible earthquake in Japan... read more



just what the doctor ordered:  the exact thing that is needed.  Example:  Thanks so much for the scented candles—it’s just what the doctor ordered... read more

KEEP

keep abreast of something:  to get the most recent information about something.

When you decide what countries you are going to visit, please let me know because I'd like to keep abreast of your travels.
For my work it's really important for me to keep abreast of new things happening in Africa.

keep after someone:  to repeatedly remind someone to do something.

If your boss doesn't approve your request for a raise, keep after him until you get it because you deserve it.
It's very frustrating to have to keep after you every evening until your homework is done so if things do not improve I'm going to disconnect the internet.


keep at something:  to continue to do something.

If you keep at it and practice the guitar every evening, you're going to play very well at the end of the year.
Stop bothering me! If you keep at it I'm going to be very angry.

keep someone down:  to discourage someone or prevent them from doing something.

No one can keep you down if you are determined to do something.
Sadly, it's common that when people start to lose weight, some of their closest friends and family will try to keep them down by giving them sweets and fatty foods..

keep something down (keep down something):  1) to eat or drink something and not vomit afterwards. 2) to stop something from increasing.

When I was very sick it was difficult for me to keep any food down and I lost a lot of weight.
The first three months of my pregnancy I couldn’t keep anything down  and threw up all day long.
The government is trying to keep inflation down but it’s not working.
Excuse me, if you cannot keep your voices down you’ll have to leave the library.

keep someone posted:  to update or tell someone whatever new is happening about a situation.

Please keep your mother and I posted during your trip and send us text messages each time you travel to a new city.
I will keep everyone posted about the event through Twitter and Facebook.

keep quiet about something:  to not talk about something.

Yes, I knew they were getting divorced months ago but they asked me to keep quiet about it.
Since this is very personal, promise that you will keep quiet about it.

keep to something:  to continue to do something.

How can you keep to a low calorie diet during the holidays? I always wait until after New Year’s to diet.
I hope you will keep to your studies this evening after we leave.

keep to oneself:  to stay by oneself and avoid other people.

At conferences I usually keep to myself because I’m very shy about meeting new people.
I’m not sure why but our neighbors keep to themselves and don’t socialize with the other people on the street.

keep something to oneself:  to not tell someone about something.

If that’s your opinion I wish you would keep it to yourself next time instead of ruining the party.
I’m going to keep this information to myself until the company has made an announcement.

keep up something (keep something up):  to continue to do something.

Keep up that negative attitude and no one’s going to want to be around you.
I hope you keep your hopes up about the future because I’m sure things will change soon.
If everyone keeps up the pace, we’re going to finish the project ahead of the deadline.

for keeps:  to have something forever.

“Are you loaning this to me?” “No, it’s yours for keeps.”
When we got married, I gave my heart to my wife for keeps.

KEYED

keyed up:  excited or nervous about something.

My kids have been keyed up for Halloween ever since we bought their costumes.
I’m really keyed up about my presentation this afternoon.
You’re really keyed up, why don’t you try some deep breathing?

KICK

get a kick out of something:  to really enjoy something.

I really get a kick out of watching my two-year-old nephew — he’s so naughty.
You’re really getting a kick out of that new iPad, aren’t you?

kick in: 1) to start to operate or become effective; 2) to contribute something (especially money)... read more

If you can kick in even 30% of the cost, I'll pay the rest.
It took weeks for the antidepressant to finally kick in but I started to feel much better when it did.
Ugh! My allergies have kicked in and I'm so congested that I can hardly breathe.

kick oneself:  to be angry and/or annoyed with oneself.

I could kick myself for not investing more into my retirement account when I was younger.
If you don’t stay home and work on your paper tonight you’re going to kick yourself tomorrow.

kick something around (kick around something):  to discuss something.

We’re going to have an informal meeting this afternoon and just kick around ideas for the holiday party.
We didn’t make any decisions yet; we need to kick a few more ideas around first.

kick back:  to not do much of anything.

When I go on vacation I prefer going around to see things but my husband only wants to kick back on the beach and relax.
Thanks for watching the safety demonstration. Now kick back, relax and enjoy the flight.


kick off something:  to start something.

They kicked off the meeting with a fun ice-breaking activity so everyone could get to know each other.
We’re going to kick off the festival with a 10K race to benefit charity.

KID

kid around:  to joke with someone.

I really like my boss because he’s not that serious and likes to kid around with the rest of us.
Put your toys away and go to bed! I'm not kidding around!

the new kid on the block:  someone who’s recently arrived.

I can’t wait until the next intern starts working on Monday — I’m tired of being the new kid on the block.
Did you see the new kid on the block?  He'sin my accounting class and he's really cute.

KILL

kill time:  to do something while waiting for something/someone.

When I was waiting for my number to be called I killed time on Instagram and Facebook.
When my kids’ bus is late arriving, I do push-ups and jumping jacks to kill time.

kill someone with kindness:  to be so nice to someone that they allow you to do or have something.

Whenever I check in at the airport, I kill the customer service representatives with kindness and often I get upgrades on my flights.
If you want to get ahead at this company, you have to kill the receptionist with kindness because she controls a lot of things around here.

KILLING

make a killing:  to earn a lot of money very quickly.

My brother thought he could make a killing selling CDs on the Internet but MP3 digital downloads became popular and no one wanted CDs anymore.
You could make a killing selling your artwork at the Ann Arbor Art fair.

KILTER

out of kilter:  not working properly.

Our coffee machine was out of kilter this morning so I had to have tea instead.
Is the photocopier still out of kilter?  I need to make copies of the report.


KIND

in kind:  in the same manner, with the same thing.

Even when the kids at school are mean to you shouldn’t respond in kind.
Whatever gift I buy for my mother-in-law, she always responds in kind.

one-of-a-kind:  the only item of its type (there isn’t another item like it).

My engagement ring was handcrafted so it’s one-of-a-kind.
The imperfections in these leather purses is what makes them one-of-a-kind.

KINDLY

not take kindly to something/someone:  to not be pleased by something/someone.

I don’t take kindly to young people who speak to me by my first name at the grocery store.
He doesn’t take kindly to anyone who criticizes him even when their comments can help him.

KISS

kiss and make up:  to be friendly again after having an argument for disagreement.

The best part of an argument is kissing and making up.
I wish you would stop arguing and kiss and make up—life is too short to be mad at each other for stupid little things.

kiss and tell:  to talk about someone’s private information in public.

She’s not my friend anymore—I didn’t think she was the type that would kiss and tell but that’s exactly what she did.
I hate it when celebrities kiss and tell after they get divorced.

kiss something goodbye (kiss goodbye something):  to end or lose something.

After your baby is born, you can just kiss a good night's sleep goodbye.
I can’t wait till we can kiss this winter snow goodbye; I’m ready for spring weather to come.
When we broke up, unfortunately I had to kiss goodbye a lot of our common friends.

KNEES

bring one/something to its knees:  to defeat or stop someone/something.

A heart attack will bring a workaholic to their knees.
You better stop drinking and driving or an accident or arrest will bring you to your knees!

KNIFE

twist the knife:  to make a situation worse by saying or doing something.

It was one thing to fire me, but to do it in front of everyone really twisted the knife.
Please don’t say anything else—you can see she feels terrible about what she did so there’s no need to twist the knife.

(go) under the knife:  to have an operation or medical surgery.

In Hollywood, it’s completely normal for women to go under the knife for cosmetic surgery after the age of 20.
I’m so scared because my husband is going under the knife this afternoon and I don’t want anything to happen to him.


KNOCK

knock it off:  to stop doing something annoying. (Used in spoken English)

Knock it off!  You’re making so much noise I can’t concentrate.
If you don’t knock it off I’m going to leave — you’re teasing was fun for the first hour but now I’m tired.

knock someone out (knock out someone):  1) to hit someone so hard they become unconscious;  2) to make someone go to sleep.

Did you see the boxing match last night? Pacman knocked out Ricky Hatton in the second round.
Yesterday, at 7 PM I took some cold medicine and it knocked me out until 7 AM the next morning.

knock someone up (knock up someone) (rude, slang):  to get someone pregnant.

My brother knocked up his wife again—they already have six kids.
I always use protection because I’m terrified of knocking my girlfriend up.

KNOT

tie the knot:  to get married.

We got engaged last year but we're not going to tie the knot until we graduate from school.
My best friend tied the knot yesterday and today she’s going to Bali for her honeymoon.

KNOW

before you know it:  in a very short period of time.

Before you know it, summer will be over and it will be time to go back to school.
Last night I decided to get on the Internet to check email really quickly and before I knew it, three hours passed by.

in the know:  knowing more about something than other people.

I recommend you contact my travel agent—she’s always in the know about last minute specials.
My hair stylist is in the know because everybody tells him their personal business.

know better (than to do something) / not know any better:  to be smart enough to do the right thing or behave in an appropriate way.

I can’t believe that you took all of these office supplies from your office—you should know better!
Don’t yell at him. He’s only five years old and he doesn’t know any better.
You know better than to invite your friends over when we're not at the house.

know where one stands:  to have a clear understanding of a situation or what someone thinks.

I hate working for my new boss because I never know where I stand with him.
This program is amazing because it tracks all the calories you consume each day so you know exactly where you stand.

not know what hit you:  to be shocked and confused about something surprising that happens to you.

When my husband left me two weeks after we got married I didn’t know what hit me.
My mother came into my room and grabbed my phone so quickly that I didn’t know what hit me.

not know where to turn:  to not know what to do in a situation.

After I lost my job and my unemployment benefits ended, I didn’t know where to turn.
If you ever get lonely and don’t know where to turn,  just remember you can always call me.

not know whether to laugh or cry:  to be very upset and frustrated about something.

When the doctor’s office told me the first available appointment was five months later, I didn’t know whether to laugh or cry.
When I dropped my iPhone in the toilet, I didn’t know whether to laugh or cry.

KNUCKLE

knuckle down:  to work very hard.

It’s final exam week so I’ve got to knuckle down and finally start studying.
I didn’t do anything all morning but I was able to knuckle down and finish my report this afternoon.

LABOR

a labor of love:  work that you do because you really enjoy it.  Example:  Most people hate it but organizing my closet is a labor of love for me... read more



LAG

lag behind (someone/something):  to be behind the level or progress of someone/something else.  Example:  During the entire race Stacy lagged behind the leaders but she drew even at the last 500 meters and passed everyone at the finish line... read more


land on one’s feet:  to be in a good or better situation after going through a difficult experience.  Example:  Since I lived in a very small town my whole life, I was surprised how quickly I landed on my feet after... read more


LANGUAGE

speak the same language:  to share the same beliefs, ideas and opinions.  Example:  I hate going to family reunions because no one speaks the same language and everyone... read more


LAP

fall into one’s lap:  to obtain or achieve something without working for it.  Example:  I spent six months looking everywhere for a job and couldn’t find anything and then the week after I stopped looking a great job just fell into my lap... read more


LARGE

by and large:  mostly, generally.  Example:  By and large, most of the kids at my school come from extremely conservative families but there are a few very liberal-minded kids like me... read more


LASH

lash out (at someone/something):  to angrily criticize or yell at someone/something.  Example:  My coach lashed out at me today for being five minutes late to practice and I was shocked at how angry he was... read more


LAST

at (long) last:  after a long delay.  Example:  At last spring is here—I thought winter was never going to end... read more


hear the last of someone/something:  to not have to deal with or interact with someone / something again.  Example:  I decided to give the customer a full refund so I hope we’ve heard the last of her... read more


last but not least:  something that’s equally as important as other things even though it’s the last thing mentioned.  Example:  And last but not least,  I want to thank my assistant for helping to organize this conference... read more


LATCH

latch on to someone/something:  to closely follow or be connected to someone or something.  Example:  Whenever we go to the grocery store, my daughter latches onto me  because she got lost once before and is really scared of getting separated again... read more


LATE

better late than never:  it’s good that something happened now even though it would have been better if it happened earlier.  Example:  The dress arrived after the dance but better late than never—I’ll wear it to the next event... read more


late in the day:  something that’s delayed a long time or almost too long.  Example:  Don’t you think it’s a little late in the day to tell your ex-girlfriend you’re sorry?.. read more


LATEST

at the latest:  not later than a specified time.  Example:  I will send the report to you at 5 o'clock today at the latest... read more


LAUGH

have the last laugh:  to be successful at something others thought you wouldn’t be able to do.  Example:  No one believed I could become famous when I was in high school but I had the last laugh... read more


laugh at someone:  to tease or ridicule someone.  Example:  All of the kids laugh at my friend  because she’s fat so I’m very protective of her... read more


laugh off something (laugh something off):  to act or pretend as if something isn’t important or doesn’t bother you.  Example:  When the kids make fun of you, I suggest you just laugh it off and they’ll get bored of teasing you and bother someone else... read more


laugh all the way to the bank:  to be happy about earning a profit doing something.  Example:  Most kids don’t want to babysit but it's good money and I’m laughing all the way to the bank... read more



LAUNCH

launch into someone:  to severely criticize someone.  Example:  My parents launched into me  after I came home an hour late Saturday night... read more


launch into something:  to start doing something with a lot of energy and enthusiasm.  Example:  We bought the kids some puzzles and they launched into them right after they open the boxes... read more


LAW

above the law:  not having to obey laws or rules.  Example:  Many police officers think they are above the law even when they're off-duty... read more


lay down the law:  to instruct people about what they have to do in an authoritative way.  Example:  My parents finally laid down the law and now none of us can use the Internet or telephones after 7:00 PM in the evening... read more


take the law into one’s own hands:  to punish someone based on one’s own idea of what’s right (often doing something illegal to punish someone).  Example:  In this country we’re lucky that very few people try to take the law into their own hands... read more



LAY

lay into someone:  to yell at someone or attack them physically.  Example:  Last night, I laid into my roommate for eating all my cookies... read more


lay off (something):  to stop doing or using something.  Example:  If you’re on a diet, I suggest you lay off the potato chips... read more


lay somebody off (lay off someone):  to end a worker’s job (usually because of economic difficulties).  Example:  I heard General Electric is going to lay off 1,000 workers this week... read more


layover (noun or verb):  to make a stop somewhere during travel.  Example:  I’m just about to board a plane for the Philippines but I have a six-hour layover in Singapore and I’ll check email when I’m there... read more


LEAD

lead someone astray:  to negatively influence someone or cause him to make a mistake.  Example:  My parents don’t want me to go away to college because they’re terrified someone will lead me astray... read more


lead off (something) / lead something off:  to start something.  Example:  We’re going to lead the meeting off with a prayer and the first panel discussion will follow afterwards... read more


lead someone on:  to deceive someone and be dishonest (often to get something from them).  Example:  My girlfriend was leading me on when she accepted my marriage proposal—in fact, she was only trying to make her old boyfriend jealous... read more


LEAF

leaf through something:  to turn the pages of a book, magazine or other written material briefly looking at the pages.  Example:  When I was waiting for the doctor, I leafed through several magazines and found an interesting article about traveling by train through Switzerland... read more


take a leaf out of someone’s book:  to copy what someone else has done.  Example:  I should take a leaf out of your book and lose 25 pounds... read more



turn over a new leaf:  to behave in a different way (usually an improved or better way).  Example:  Every year on January 1st people try to turn over a new leaf and then stop trying after a week... read more


LEAGUE

in the same league (with/as someone or something):  having the same abilities, qualities or achievements as someone or something else.  Example:  My girlfriend isn't in the same league as a supermodel but she's pretty close... read more


out of one’s league:  trying to do something that one isn’t prepared or qualified for or that isn’t right for the person.  Example:  I tried to train for a marathon but it was out of my league—I’ve decided to start with the 10K race instead... read more


LEAN

lean on someone/something: 1) to depend on someone/something; 2) to try to pressure or force someone to do something.  Example:  Good friends are people you can lean on when you’re sad and lonely... read more


lean over backwards:  to try very hard to do something.  Example:  I leaned over backwards this semester to get good grades but I didn’t improve as much as I wanted... read more


LEAPS

(grow) by leaps and bounds:  to grow a lot very quickly.  Example:  This summer it’s rained so much that our grass is growing by leaps and bounds... read more


LEASE

a new lease on life:  a new chance to be happy or successful after going through difficulties or hardships.  Example:  Since he recovered from surgery he’s had a new lease on life and seems to be doing very well... read more


LEASH

keep someone on a tight leash (keep someone on a short leash):  to closely control someone’s actions and allow them very little freedom to do the things they want.  Example:  It’s amazing she stays with that man when he always keeps her on a tight leash... read more


LEAST

at (the very) least:  1) at a minimum, no less than;  2) any way.  Example:  At least 50 people will be at the conference but let’s make a reservation for 60 to be safe... read more


not in the least:  not in any way.  Example:  Since we moved, our children have not been in the least happy because they miss their friends... read more


the least you can do (the least you could do):  something you should do.  Example:  Even if you don't like the dinner your mother cooks, the least you can do is recognize the effort she made to prepare the food and thank her for that... read more


LEAVE

leave someone alone:  to not bother or annoy someone.  Example:  Your daddy is in the study right now so please leave him alone and let him work... read more


leave something alone:  to not touch something; to not interact or get involved with something.  Example:  Please leave the cake alone—after it cools I’m going to decorate it with icing... read more


leave someone hanging:  to keep someone waiting for information, a response, or a decision.  Example:  I really wanted that job but they left me hanging for two months after the interview so eventually I accepted another offer... read more


leave someone high and dry:  to be in a difficult situation without any help or support.  Example:  When I missed the last bus home I was left high and dry and had to walk home in the dark... read more



leave it at that:  to say or do nothing more about a situation.  Example:  He broke off our engagement two days before the wedding, let’s leave it at that... read more


leave something open:  to keep something possible or available.  Example:  Can you please leave the 15th-16th of December open for a possible management meeting?.. read more


leave out someone / something (leave something / someone out):  to not include someone or something.  Example:  Do you realize you left your brother out of the rehearsal dinner before the wedding?... read more


leave something to be desired:  to not be as good as you want it to be.  Example:  It’s a beautiful apartment but the neighborhood leaves a lot to be desired... read more


take leave:  to have approved time off from work.  Example:  I’m trying to finish all of my work because I’m going to take leave next week... read more



LION

the lion's share:  the largest part (or share) of something... read more

I have to do the lion's share of my paper this weekend because I've also got a big exam next week to study for.
I gave my daughter her monthly allowance and I'm sure she'll spend the lion's share on new clothes.


LOG

sleep like a log:  to sleep very soundly (deeply)—so well that noises don't even wake you up.  Example:  I sleep like a log everywhere: at the hospital, on the bus, even on the sofa while the tv's on and my kids are playing... read more




LOOK

look down on someone / something:  to see something or someone as inferior.  Example:  It's really sad how some people look down on others simply because of the amount of money they have... read more



look down one's nose at something:  to disapprove of someone or something or look at them as inferior.  Example:  Many people do not marry outside their culture because they look down their noses on others and think their way of life is superior... read more


LUCK

get lucky:  1) to come into good fortune or luck; 2) to meet someone to have a casual sexual or romantic encounter with.

If I get lucky the washing machines downstairs will be empty and I'll be able to finish my laundry quickly.
My roommate buys drinks for girls at clubs every weekend but never gets lucky.
Watch out for that girl. She's not interested in dating you, she just wants to get lucky tonight.


third time lucky:  the third time you try to do something you succeed.  Example:  I’m hopeful our team will be third time lucky because they've been practicing a lot and also learned a lot from the previous two losses against this team...  read more

Have you signed-up for my free newsletter? I include an audio magazine article every month that's choc full of new vocabulary and idioms.

You can also find many idiom definitions with the different online learner's dictionaries.

MADE

made for each other:  a perfect match;  things that go very well together.  Example:  Mmm, I think bread and cheese are made for each other... read on


MAKE

make believe:  to pretend.  Example:  When I was a kid I used to make believe I was a dog and I even ate from my dog’s dish a few times... read more



make do:  to use the things that you have even though it is not what you want or need.  Example:  The photocopier jammed so we will just have to make do with the copies that we have... read more


make for something:  to produce a result.  Example:  Upgrading to business class makes for a completely different experience than traveling in economy class... read more


make good on something:  to keep a promise;  to do what you say you’re going to do.  Example:  Thankfully, my sponsors all made good on their pledges of support for my 10k race... read more


make it:  1) to be successful;  2) to go to an event or place.  Examples:  1) When my first book proposal was accepted by a publisher, I knew I’d made it as a writer. 2)  Can you make it to my party Saturday?.. read more


make it big:  to achieve great success at something;  to become famous.  Example:  I wonder if we will still be friends when you make it big in Hollywood... read more


make it up to someone:  to do something nice or good to compensate for something you did wrong or failed to do.  Example:  I'm sorry I missed your softball game. I'll make it up to you by taking your team out for ice cream after your next game.


make light of something:  to consider something as less important or serious than it actually is.  Example:  My mom tried to make light of my breaking her china bowl but I know that it was really special to her... read more



make off with something:   to steal something.  Example:  I had a party Friday night and one of the guests made off with several of my bracelets... read on



make or break something:  to cause something to succeed or fail.  Example:   This internship at the law firm this summer will make or break my opportunity to join a big firm after graduation... read on


make over someone / something (make someone / something over):  to improve the way someone or something looks.  Example:  They made me over at the shopping mall today and I ended up spending $250 on cosmetics that I don’t need... read more




make someone sick:  to make someone appalled, shocked or disgusted.  Example:  I can’t believe you ate that entire bucket of fried chicken—you make me sick... read on




make something out of nothing:  make something more important or serious than it really is.  Example:  My stomach really hurts but I don’t want to tell my mom because she always makes something out of nothing and will insist I go to the doctor’s office... read on


make something up (make up something):  1) to create a story or tell a lie about something;  2) to take time to do something you should have done earlier... read on

I had no idea what the answer was for the test so I just made something up.
My parents are taking us on a trip so my math teacher is letting me make the math test up  on the following Wednesday.

make up:  to become friendly after an argument or dispute.  Example:  I’m really happy my best friend and I made up after our argument last week—I really felt lonely and sad the past week... Read on


make up something:  to form part of something or a group.  Example:  The four of us make up a string quartet and we play at area hospitals, nursing homes and private parties... read on



make up for something:  to take the place of something else.  Example:  I’m really sorry I can’t be there for your birthday. I will make up for it by taking you out to dinner this weekend... read on


what makes someone tick:  the reasons for someone’s behavior.  Example:  I wonder what makes my father-in-law tick.  He never says anything and shows little emotion... read on



MAKING(S)

in the making:  in progress; in the process of creating something.  Example:  I went to President Obama’s inauguration because I wanted to see history in the making... read on


of one’s own making:  something caused by one’s own actions.  Example:  Yes, your boss is a tyrant but the things that led to your dismissal were of your own making... read on


have all the makings of something:  have all the qualities of something that could happen.  Example:  This beautiful weather and the gorgeous sunset have all the makings of a romantic evening... read on



MAN

a man of few words:  a person who does not talk a lot, only when he has something important to say.  Example:  My father isn’t shy at all—he’s just a man of few words... read on



a man of his word:  a person who is honest and does what he says he will do.  Example:  I hated being married to my ex-husband but he is a good father and a man of his word... read on


every man for himself:  each person does what is best for himself.  Example:  There is no team spirit in this office; it’s definitely every man for himself... read on


man enough (to do something):  to be strong or brave enough for something.  Example:  If you were man enough to tell your boss you are worth more money he’d give you a raise... read on


MAP

map out something (map something out):  to create a detailed plan for something.  Example:  During the next hour we need to map out the topics and production schedule for the newsletter for the rest of the year... read on


put something on the map:  to make something famous.  Example:  This is the song and video that put Britney Spears on the map... read on


MARK

hit the mark:  to be correct, to reach a goal or be successful.  Example:  I hope to hit the mark with this new technology for water purification... read on


leave one’s / it’s mark (on someone / something):  to have a positive effect on something that is memorable.  Example:  I’m hoping to leave my mark on this school by creating a great drama department... read on


make one’s mark:  to be successful and famous doing something.  Example:  I plan to make my mark by writing the next great American novel... read on



mark down something (mark something down):  to lower the price of something.  Example:  I actually bought two pairs of shoes because they were marked down to $49.99 from $129.00.


mark up something (mark something up):  1) to raise the price of something. 2) to make corrections or changes to a document... read on

These are not real sales. They simply mark up the price, cross it off and write in something lower that they call the “sale” price.
I’ve marked up this report with my changes so please try to make the corrections in the next few hours.

off the mark:  not accurate or wrong.  Example:  His comments were off the mark—or else recent studies have proven his theory wrong... read on


MARKET

in the market for something:  interested in or looking to buying something.  Example:  I’m in the market for a different apartment so please let me know if you hear of anything... read on



on the market:  available to have or purchase.  Example:  I heard your ex-girlfriend is on the market again after her latest boyfriend dumped her... read on


MARRIAGE

a marriage made in heaven:  a perfect marriage.  Example:  If I can't have a marriage made in heaven, I prefer to get divorced than stay in an unhappy relationship... read on


MATCH

a match made in heaven:  a perfect match, something that goes perfectly with something else.  Example:  Your grandparents were a match made in heaven,  weren’t they?.. read on


meet one’s match:  to find someone who is equal in ability, skill, etc.  Example:  My brother always thought girls weren’t as smart but when he met his girlfriend he finally met his match... read on


MATTER

a matter of doing something:  something that must be done.  Example:  Organizing this house is a matter of throwing away most of the things that you don’t use anymore... read on



a matter of life and death:  something that is very serious and important.  Example:  Your father is in an important meeting. Is it a matter of life and death or can he call you back in an hour?.. read on


a matter of time:  something will eventually happen or become true.  Example:  Your paintings are incredible. It’s only a matter of time before you become famous... read on


as a matter of fact:  actually, in reality, in truth... Example:  As a matter of fact, I am going to see that movie tonight so please don’t tell me any more about it and spoil the ending... read on



for that matter:  besides, in addition.  Example:  If you don’t like school then why are you enrolling in college and taking out student loans for that matter... read on




no laughing matter:  something that is serious and not a joke.  Example:  Throwing a pencil at your teacher is no laughing matter and therefore we’ve decided to give you a 3-day suspension... read on


no matter (what/how/when, etc.):  without considering.  Example:  I will be there on Sunday no matter what the weather... read on



MAX

max out (max something out):  to reach the limit of something.  Example:  I think I’ll just read a book; I’m maxed out on watching television for a while... read on


to the max:  to the largest or highest degree of something.  Example:  I love One Direction to the max... read on


ME

me neither:  and I also am not, I also would not.  Example:  “I don’t think I have time to go home and change clothes before the party.” “Me neither.”  Read on...


me, too:  and I am also, I would also.  Example:  “I ride my bike to work every day evening when it’s raining.” “Really? Me, too!”  Read on...


MEAN

mean well:  to have a good or helpful intention.  Example:  I’m sure your daughter meant well when she tried to wash your phone... Read on


mean business:  to be serious about something.  Example:  My father threatened so many times to take away my phone and nothing happened but last night he meant business and confiscated my phone... Read on



MEANS

a means to an end:  something that is done to obtain or achieve something else.  Example:  Going to college used to be a means to an end for young girls to find their future husbands... Read on


(live) beyond one’s means:  more than one’s budget or the amount of money that they have.  Example:  Credit cards make it possible for so many people to live beyond their means... Read on


by all means:  definitely, certainly.  Example:  By all means, stop by to see us—we will be around all weekend... Read on


by no means:  not in any way.  Example:  By no means am I going to my ex-boyfriend’s wedding—why did he invite me?... Read on


(live) within one’s means:  within a person’s budget or the amount of money that they have.  Example:  After my husband lost his job, we learned the hard way how to live within our means... Read on


MEANTIME

in the meantime:  at the same time something is happening or during the interval between things that are happening.  Example:  I have to get dinner ready so please do your homework in the meantime... Read on

We will have your car fixed by Tuesday evening and in the meantime you can use one of our courtesy cars free of charge.

MEASURE

for good measure:  something added to something else that has already been done.  Example:  I’ve cooked a pork roast for our dinner tonight as well as grilled stuffed portobello mushrooms for good measure in case anyone’s vegetarian... Read on


measure up (to someone / something):  to be as good as someone or something else.  Example:  My father never thought I’d measure up as a businessman because I was so shy and timid but I’ve been more successful than he is.  Read on...



MEET

meet someone halfway:  to compromise with someone by doing half or a good part of what they want.  Example:  My roommates would never meet me half way with cleaning so I finally got my own place.  Read on...


meet up (with someone):  to see someone in person or join someone for an activity.  Example:  I’m going to meet up with some of my old classmates after work if you want to join me.  Read on...


make ends meet:  to have enough money to pay for the basic necessities.  Example:  After I lost my job I didn’t have enough to make ends meet so I had to sleep on my sister’s couch and eat lots of spaghetti.  Read on...


MELT

melt away:  to disappear or fade away as if it is melting.  Example:  The moon melted away into the thick clouds.  Read on...



MONEY

money doesn't grow on trees:  it requires effort to earn money and it is limited so you must be careful how you spend it.... read more

If you want to buy a new Michael Kors purse you'll have to pay for it yourself. Money doesn't grow on trees,  you know.
When young people get their first credit cards they have to often learn that money doesn't grow on trees.


a money pit:  something that costs a lot of money over time (more money than was first expected)... read more

This old car is a money pit so I'm saving my money to buy a new car in the fall.
We joined the country club and it's a real money pit.  There are fees for everything but we wanted our kids to have the right social connections and opportunities to swim, and play tennis and golf.



MOON

(be) over the moon:  to be extremely happy or pleased... read more

I'll be over the moon when you get a job and move into your own apartment.
I was over the moon when I received the invitation to your wedding. I'm so excited for you!


MOUTH

foam at the mouth:  to be extremely angry... read more

I recommend you let him foam at the mouth for a few hours then try to talk to him when he's calmed down.
My ex-husband constantly foamed at the mouth and I finally had to leave him because it was frightening and stressful.


straight from the horse's mouth:  directly from the person who knows the most about the matter; someone who knows the facts... read more

I won't believe she's leaving the company until I hear it straight from the horse's mouth.
Yesterday, I had a meeting with Professor Jones so I heard that no one passed the macroeconomics exam straight from the horse's mouth.

NAIL

hit the nail on the head:  to do or say something exactly right.  Example:  You hit the nail on the head with your proposal at the staff meeting yesterday.  Read on...



nail something down (nail down something):  to determine or fix something.  Example:  We’ve got to nail down the dates for our vacation and start making hotel and airline reservations this weekend.  Read on...


(a) nail in someone / something’s coffin:  to help bring the end or death of something more quickly.  Example:  My latest injury put another nail in the coffin of my collegiate football career.  Read on...


NAILS

tough as nails (hard as nails):  very strong, determined, persistent.  Example:  She may be the smallest pup but she’s as tough as nails.  Read on...



NAME

clear one’s name:  to prove innocence about something (that you did not do something wrong or illegal).  Example:  Even though they jury found him innocent and cleared his name, many people still believe he’s guilty.  Read on...


give something a bad name:  to cause something to not be respected anymore.  Example:  It’s a few egocentric, bigoted and intolerant Americans that give the rest of us a bad name around the world.  Read on...


in name only:  have a title but not the power or duties required for the role.  Example:  Our boss is the director in name only—it’s really my colleague who's running the department.  Read on...


in someone’s name:  representing someone (often in honor of someone).  Example:  After my father died, I created a scholarship in my parents name at the university where they met.


make a name for oneself:  to become famous and known for doing something important or well.  Example:  One day I am going to make a name for myself by finding a cure for cancer.  Read on...



one’s name in lights:  to be famous for some important work (in reference to the brightly lit marquees in front of theaters that have the actors' names in a performance).  Example:  Every actor's dream is to see his name in lights on Broadway.  Read on...


the name of the game:  the most important thing or activity.  Example:  In language learning, actually using the language by speaking is the name of the game.  Read on...


NAMES

drop names:  to mention one’s connection to someone famous or influential to try to make oneself also feel important.  Example:  Her father is an accountant for several pop stars so she always drops names but she’s never actually met any of these singers.  Read on...


call someone names:  to describe someone with rude or insulting words.  Example:  It’s really childish to call your wife names when you disagree, and it’s going to harm your relationship over time.



name names:  to say the exact name of the person who is doing something wrong.  Example:  I don’t know who was smoking in the house this afternoon while I was out but if someone doesn’t name names soon you’re all going to be punished.  Read on...


NEAR

near and dear to someone:  something that is very special to someone.  Example:  It may not look important but this dirty old stuffed bear is very near and dear to me.  Read on...


NECK

break someone’s neck:  1) to make a huge effort, to try very hard: 2) to threaten to harm someone.  Example:  Our director broke her neck finishing the report over the weekend. For more examples, read on ...


breathe down one’s neck:  to pressure someone by watching them closely.

I cannot fix your phone with you breathing down my neck like this. Please come back in 30 minutes.
If you don’t finish your homework early, I will breathe down your neck all evening long until it is done.

neck and neck:  at the same position or equal.

The horses are neck and neck as they come around the last turn to the finish line.
We’re still neck and neck after playing this video game for the past four hours but we’re going to keep going until someone wins.


one’s neck of the woods:  an area or location where you live.

I’ll be our near your neck of the woods on Friday so I was thinking I’d stop by and say hello.
The next time you’re going to your mother’s neck of the woods can you please give this casserole dish back to her?

a pain in the neck:  someone or something that's is difficult or annoying... read more

My boss is such a pain in the neck.  He makes me stay late waiting for him to finish his work because he's afraid of being alone at the office after hours.
I'm glad we're best friends now and I'm sorry I was a pain in the neck when we were little.

risk one’s neck:  to do something risky or dangerous.

Please get down from that chair and get a ladder—you’re risking your neck trying to hang the lights that way.
When you drive drunk you’re not only risking your own neck but you also could hurt someone else.

stick one’s neck out:  to take a risk.

We can wait until tomorrow to return this, I’d rather pay a late fee than stick my neck out driving in this snow.
Thank you for sticking your neck out and bringing this to me—I hope no one saw you take it.

up to one’s neck in something:  to be very busy doing something.

I’m up to my neck in laundry and ironing this weekend.
You’re always up to your neck in work—why don’t you hire someone to help you?

NEED

if need be:  if necessary.

Just invite everyone. We can take two cars to the restaurant if need be.
I hope the repairs won’t cost too much but I’ll put the charges on my credit card if need be.

(something) is all one needs:  something that you do not want or need at all.

Oh, great a parking ticket. All I need is another bill!
Please tell her I’m in a meeting for the next few hours—all I need is to listen to my mother complain about something stupid.



NEEDLE

a needle in a haystack:  something that is very difficult to find.

I looked everywhere for my earring at the beach but it was like trying to find a needle in a haystack.
We've been looking for an apartment in Geneva for six weeks and it's like finding a needle in a haystack.

NEIGHBORHOOD

(somewhere) in the neighborhood of something:  approximately.

He must be doing very well. I heard the salary for a partner in his firm is in the neighborhood of $450,000 and that's not including the annual bonus.
The drive to New York will take somewhere in the neighborhood of five hours if there’s no traffic.

NERVE(S)

get on one’s nerves:  to annoy or bother someone.

When our neighbor talks on the phone for hours it really gets on my nerves because we can hear everything he says.
That song gets on my nerves—can you change the radio station?


lose one’s nerve:  to be afraid of doing something;  to lose the courage to do something.

I was going to ask Sarah to dance but I lost my nerve and now some other guy is talking to her.
I signed-up for the competition the first day because I was afraid I’d lose my nerve and never practice if I didn’t have a serious reason to do it.

touch a (raw) nerve:  something that is especially irritating or annoying to someone.

Please don’t mention Sarah’s name tonight—you know that touches a raw nerve for Steve.
Anytime they talk about how all poor people are lazy and don’t want to work it really touches a nerve with me.

NEWS

break the news:  to inform someone of something bad that has happened.

I hate to be the one to break the news but I heard they gave the position you wanted to a guy from the marketing department.
When I broke the news that I was moving to Japan, my wife cried for hours and said she wasn’t coming with me.

(that’s) news to someone:  this is the first time the person has heard this information.

It was news to me that my parents had divorced when I was five and remarried two years later.
“Did you know I used to sell photocopier machines when I was in college?” “No, that’s news to me.”

NEXT

next to:  almost, nearly.

Uh-oh, the next few days will be difficult. I have next to nothing in my bank account and don’t get paid for another week.
The traffic was so bad it took us next to two hours to drive three miles.

next to nothing:  almost nothing, very little.

Before my grandmother died, she weighed next to nothing and they had to feed her with a tube.
You won’t believe this but this purse cost me next to nothing—it was on sale for 60% off.


NICK

(just) in the nick of time:  before the very last moment or deadline.

You got here just in the nick of time, the movie’s about to start.
I stayed up all night but I managed to finish my term paper in the nick of time.

NIGHT

night and day (day and night):  all the time.

You’re on Facebook night and day, why don’t you take a break?
Our neighbors play loud music night and day and just laugh at us when we ask them to turn it down a little.
I’ve been working day and night to try to complete the project by the deadline but I still think I’ll need two more weeks to finish it.

NOD

get the nod:  to get approval for something.

Yes! I got the nod from my parents to get my ears pierced.
Let’s hope we get the nod on this project’s funding within the next two weeks so we can get started.

nod off:  to fall asleep.

Pull over and let me drive—you look like you’re about to nod off.
My husband comes home, eats dinner and nods off in front of the television every evening and that’s it.


NOSE

a nose for something:  have a talent or ability for finding something.  Example:  You have a real nose for finding bargains whenever we go shopping... read more


follow one’s nose:  to follow one’s intuition or move forward.

I don’t have directions but I’ve been to this place before and usually I can just follow my nose.
When my girlfriend followed her nose and looked in my backpack, she discovered a love note her sister wrote to me.


keep one’s nose clean:  to not get into trouble.

Try to keep your nose clean tonight when you go out.
When I was younger I always wanted to fight, but I’ve kept my nose clean since I started college.

keep one’s nose out of something:  to not get involved in something.

I wasn’t talking to you—just keep your nose out of this.
I wish my mother-in-law would keep her nose out of our marriage but she always tries to talk about really personal things with my husband.

keep one’s nose to the grindstone:  to work very hard without taking a break or being distracted.

I promise I’ll spend more time with you after tax season is over but for now I’ve got to keep my nose to the grindstone.
This is the first semester that I don’t have to keep my nose to the grindstone since I only had term papers to write and I finished them early.


look down one’s nose at someone / something:  to see something or someone as inferior.

I hate to say this but my father looks down on anyone who doesn’t come from a wealthy background.
Don’t look down on these jeans just because they don’t have a designer label on them. If you like them, buy them.

nose around:  to try to find information about something.

Try to nose around and find out what your brother would like to do for his birthday.
There’s something very serious going on at the office and everyone’s trying to nose around  to find out if there will be layoffs.


powder one’s nose:  to go use the toilet (an expression used by women).

Excuse me sir, I need to powder my nose.  Could you tell me where the restroom is?
We’ll be back. We’ve got to powder our noses.

stick / poke one’s nose into something:  to intentionally try to find information or get involved in something that is private.

Just because were married doesn’t give you the right to stick your nose into my business  and read my private emails.
I’ve asked to be moved to a new department.  I can’t say anything without my colleague trying to poke his nose into every conversation I have and I’m tired of it.

turn one’s nose up at something:  to not like something because you think it’s not good enough for you.

You always turn your nose up to different ethnic foods but you have no idea what you’re missing.
Before you turn your nose up at volunteering, read about how it changed these people’s lives.

under one’s nose:  to be very close but not noticed.

I was looking for my keys all morning but they were right under my nose the whole time.
Many times the solution to our problems is right under our noses.

NOT

not oneself:  to not feel the way one normally feels;  to feel strange.

Since I started to take this medication I haven’t been myself, so I may have to stop using it.
My sister hasn’t been herself since her last child went to college this fall.

NOTCH

a notch above / below (someone / something):  something is slightly superior or inferior to someone / something else.

I really love the cover of this song but it’s still a notch below the original.
Both of my children are great at swimming but my youngest is a notch above my oldest.


NOTE(S)

make a mental note:  to make an effort to remember something you don’t write down on paper.

You might want to make a mental note for the future that we also offer free delivery.
I made a mental note to pick up my dry cleaning on my way home tonight.

take note of (someone / something):  to pay attention or give attention to something.

Please take note of the requirements for completing this course—they're listed right here on the syllabus.
If you’re traveling to the beach this weekend, take note of the construction on I-95 and plan your travel accordingly.

compare notes:  to exchange information and opinions about something.

We should get together and compare notes about babysitters, parks, child-friendly restaurants and stuff like that.
Last night I compared notes with my coworker and discovered she makes a lot more money than me.

NOTHING

nothing much:  very little.

Oh, it was nothing much.  I’m always happy to help.
There’s nothing much left to do so just sit down and relax until dinner is ready.


there’s nothing to it:  it’s easy to do.

Don’t worry about taking the bus to New York, there’s really nothing to it except showing up on time for departure.
You’re going to love yoga—there’s nothing to it.

NOTICE

at a moment’s notice:  almost immediately.

My husband works for the military so it’s common for him to get deployed at a moment’s notice.
Do you have your ticket ready? I want to be ready to board the train at a moment’s notice  so we can get a good seat.

(on / with) short notice:  with a brief amount of warning.

I told my boss that I was really sorry but I wouldn’t be able to work this weekend on such short notice.
You can’t expect me to always be able to help you with short notice like this.
Luckily, although it was short notice, I got the message in time to get here.

take notice (of someone / something):  to give attention to something.

A year ago I started to take notice of what the successful salespeople were doing and now I’m one of the top sellers for my company.
Now that my daughter has started to wear makeup and style her hair, the boys have definitely begun to take notice.

NOW

(every) now and again:  once in a while;  sometimes.

Every now and again I see my ex-boyfriend at the gym and I still feel really nervous.
Now and again you should stop by and say hello, we miss seeing you.

(every) now and then:  once in a while; sometimes.

Every now and then, Apple offers discounts but normally their prices are set and don’t change.
Now and then I like to have a nice glass of wine but usually I don’t drink alcohol.


(it’s) now or never:  something needs to be done or the opportunity may never happen again.

Next year were going to try to start a family so I feel it’s now or never to backpack through South America.
Don’t ever say it’s now or never about traveling overseas.  You can always take your children with you!


NUT

a hard nut to crack:  1) something that is difficult to do, solve or enter;  2) someone who is difficult to know or understand... read more

I've almost finished the problem set but this last equation is a hard nut to crack—can you take a look and try to help me?
Getting into Harvard isn't impossible but it's a hard nut to crack.
Your sister is a hard nut to crack.  Sometimes she's really nice and other times she's really quiet so I don't know if she likes me or thinks I'm an idiot.


NUTSHELL

in a nutshell:  a quick summary of something... read more

In a nutshell,  it was the worst trip of my life but I’m not going to torture you with all the boring details.
It will cost, in a nutshell, about $15,000 and take three months to complete the repairs. The proposal includes the full information about the work we would do.

OCCASION

rise to the occasion:  to do what is needed at a particular time.

She’s a good tennis player but she never rises to the occasion at the grand slam tournaments.
I was very impressed with how you rose to the occasion today and chaired the meeting during the director’s absence.


OCCUR

occur to someone:  to come to someone’s mind, to think of something.

It didn’t occur to me that when you said you’d be home “late” last night that you actually wouldn’t come home until 7 AM!
Did it ever occur to you that I might want to choose the TV show sometimes?


ODDS

against the odds:  despite a lot of difficulty or challenges.

Against the odds, I beat the number one ranked player today.
I really admire how Lindsey Vonn came back against the odds to win another skiing championship.

odds and ends:  a variety of things (often left-over things).

I made this quilt out of some odds and ends from the linen closet.
I’ve got to finish a bunch of odds and ends before I leave the office tonight.

at odds with something:  not in agreement.

Suddenly my best friends are at odds with each other so now I have to see them separately.
I’ve been at odds with the board of directors regarding salaries for months.

OF

of course:  certainly, naturally.

Of course you can stay with us whenever you come to town.
Of course my girlfriend would call as soon as the game started.

of late:  lately, recently.

I’ve been going to bed really early of late and I feel so much better.
Of late, I haven’t traveled very much so I’ve been able to go to my son’s baseball games.

OFF

off and on (on and off):  working or existing sometimes but not at other times.

The electricity has been off and on for the past five hours since the storm hit.
My boyfriend and I were dating off and on for five years but this time it’s over and we’re never getting back together.
Doctor, the pain in my stomach has been on and off for two months now but it’s becoming more frequent so I’m worried.

off and running:  started doing something and it’s going well.

Our fundraising campaign is off and running and we’ll definitely surpass last year’s donations.
The Facebook ad is off and running now so be sure to check how it's going tomorrow.

OFFENSE

no offense:  this is not meant to insult or offend anyone.

No offense but I only date guys who share my religion.
No offense, however we’re looking for a candidate with better speaking skills.


OLD

the same old same old:  something that has stayed the same as before.

It’s the same old same old boring office as when you left a year ago.
My life is the same old same old: study, practice, eat and sleep.

ON

on a diet:  eating particular types and/or amounts of food (especially to lose weight or for medical reasons).

I’m on a low sodium diet since my doctor said my blood pressure is very high.
Sorry I can’t eat any of your birthday cake—I’m on a diet again.


on and on (and on):  continuously without stopping.

These management meetings just go on and on and on and I can never get any work done.
This rain has gone on and on for days—I wonder when it will stop.

on a shoestring:  with very little money or a very small budget.

I got a second job because the stress of living on a shoestring was killing me.
My dad thinks all artists live on a shoestring so he was surprised when my first painting sold for $4,500.

on the wait/waiting list:  on a list of people waiting for something.

We were on the waiting list for a two-bedroom apartment in our building for a year and a half and finally decided to move.
I got on the wait list  at the University of Maryland but there’s a good chance I will get accepted in June.

ONCE

all at once:  suddenly, at the same time

All at once the sofa caught on fire and we were barely able to leave the apartment in time.
Everything happened so fast and all at once so I can’t really remember much about it.


at once:  right away, immediately

Sheila, please come into my office at once!
Call your mother at once. It sounds like an emergency.

once again:  another time.

Once again we see each other at the grocery store.  This is really unusual.
If you’re absent once again you’ll need to bring a doctor’s note.

once and for all:  finally and completely.

After doing crash diets during my entire 20s, I lost the weight once and for all when I started to eat sensibly.
I’m happy to say that your grandfather and I got together today and settled our differences once and for all.

give someone / something the once over:  to make a decision or judgment after very quickly looking at someone / something.

When you’re finished with that letter I’ll give it the once over before you mail it.
You should always give your emails the once over  before sending them.
My dad always gives my outfits the once over before I go to school.

ONE

one after the other:  one thing is followed by the next person or thing.

We need to solve this problem quickly because the complaints are coming in one after another.
She dates new guys one after the other because she only likes the excitement of falling in love.
We've had one problem after the other with this new car.

one and only:  only

This is my one and only photo of your great-grandmother so be careful with it. 
The one and only race I won happened on the day my dad wasn’t there to see it.

one and the same:  the same thing.

FaceTime and Skype are practically one and the same except you don’t need an Apple device to use Skype.
These two brands are one and the same but this one is a lot less expensive.

one by one:  one thing or person immediately after another.

Everyone please line up at the entrance one by one and then I’ll give you the tickets.
The models came out one by one wearing incredibly skimpy underwear.


one up (on something / someone):  to have an advantage over someone / something.

This information is going to give me a one up over my competitors.
Being a lot taller gave me a one up on most of the other guys trying out for the basketball team.

the one and only:  the only person or type of thing.

My grandmother was the one and only woman in her college who graduated and became a doctor.
This is the one and only photograph of my mother as a brunette.


ONLY

only just:  recently.

It’s over already? We only just got to the party.
I only just moved here so if you have recommendations of where to shop I’d appreciate it.

only too:  very, very much.

The auto mechanic was only too happy to recommend repairs I didn’t need.
I’d be only too pleased to join you for Thanksgiving dinner.

OPEN

open to something:  willing to consider something.

I’m open to suggestions about how we divide up the work for this project.
If you’re open to seeing houses in other neighborhoods there are more properties in your price range.

open up:  to speak honestly and freely about something personal.

My sister opened up and told me she’s very unhappy in her marriage.
Everyone cried when the speaker opened up and told us how he lost his daughter to cancer.

(out) in the open:  to become known to everyone, to be visible for all to see.

I put some brochures out in the open so people can take them if they’re interested.
Now that your biggest fears are out in the open, we can try to find a solution to the problem.


wide open:  not decided or determined yet.

We haven’t even selected a venue yet so the planning is wide open.
There are five contestants left in the final round so the competition is still wide open.

OPTIONS

keep one’s options open:  to wait further before making a choice.

I made a reservation at the Hilton Hotel but we’re keeping our options open and looking for a better rate somewhere else.
I wish I’d kept my options open and didn’t take the first job offer I got.

ORDER

in short order:  very fast.

We’ll have your meal ready in short order.
I managed to get through security in short order and then relaxed in the executive lounge for two hours.

out of order:  not working, broken.

This coffee machine is out of order so don’t put any coins in it.
I cannot believe the copy machine is out of order again.

OUT

out from under (something):  not being controlled by someone else any longer.

The people are finally out from under the dictator’s rule but now the country is in chaos.
I’ve got to get out from under this credit card debt because I can hardly sleep at night.

out loud:  to voice something so others can hear it.

When I told my mother I needed a $300 per week she laughed out loud and told me to get a job.
If you want to improve your English speaking skills, read to yourself out loud for 10 minutes a day.

out of it:  1) confused/disoriented, not understanding or aware of what’s happening; 2) not a part of something.

He always looks out of it because he smokes a lot of marijuana.
I was so out of it this morning I missed my stop and rode the bus all the way to the end of the route.
You stay out of it—no one wants to hear your opinion.

on the outs:  not friendly, no longer communicating.

The director and my boss are on the outs so it’s really uncomfortable for me.
Are you on the outs with your mom again or can we ask her to babysit this weekend?

OUTSIDE

at the outside:  no more than.

We’ll need a week more to finish painting at the outside.
Don’t worry I’ll be there in an hour at the outside.

OVER



over (and done) with:  completed, finished.

I can’t wait until high school is over and done with and I can move away to college.
I got my paper over with so I could enjoy the spring break holiday.

over and over:  many times.

Shut up! You keep telling the same stories over and over and no one cares.
I’ve replayed our conversation over and over in my mind and I still don’t know what I said to offend her.

overdo it:  to do something too much.

Don’t overdo it with the champagne or you’ll have a terrible headache in the morning.
I overdid it at the gym yesterday and I now my muscles are so sore I can barely move.

into overdrive:  in a situation where things are working extra hard.

As we get close to the conference everyone has moved into overdrive.
I don’t even remember the last week of finals—I went into overdrive and wrote two papers and took four exams.


over the moon:  to be extremely happy or pleased... read more

To be honest, we were over the moon when our daughter's awful boyfriend cheated on her and then broke up with her.
I’m over the moon that I got into Stanford University's Law School!


OWE

owe it to someone to do something:  you have an obligation to do something for someone.

You owe it to yourself to take better care of your health.
My son owes it to me to tell the truth about what he spent his college tuition on.

OWN

on one’s own:  1) not having support from others;  2) alone.

When I turned 21 my parents told me I was on my own but I’m glad because now I’m self-sufficient.
You can stay out late every night if you want when you’re on your own.
I don’t like driving on my own at night so now I’m in a carpool.


own up (to something / someone):  admit you did something wrong.

If you had just owned up to taking the car it wouldn’t have been a huge problem but you lied and blamed your sister.
Ugh—I’ve got to own up to my boss that I didn’t check all the facts in the report.

own up (to something / someone):  admit you did something wrong.

If you had just owned up to taking the car it wouldn’t have been a huge problem but you lied and blamed your sister.


the world is your oyster:  you can do anything or go anywhere you want in life.

It was so nice to see how all of the graduates felt like the world is their oyster at the graduation ceremony today... read more


PACE

at a snail’s pace:  very slowly (as slow as a snail would move).

Traffic was moving at a snail’s pace so it took two hours to get home from work.
What’s wrong with the Internet? It’s working at a snail’s pace today.


keep pace (with someone/something):  to go as fast as or stay at the same level as someone or something else.

We’ve got to hire 2-3 more employees to keep pace with the orders coming in.
I kept pace with the leaders until the last lap of the race but then everyone sprinted ahead.

set the pace:  doing something that creates a standard.

Apple continues to set the pace with innovations in personal electronics.
I doesn’t matter what I try to do, my dog always sets the pace for our walks together.

a change of pace:  to do something different than before.

Why don’t we go to a museum for a change of pace?
I decided to bring my lunch today for a change of pace.

PACK

ahead of the pack:  doing something more successfully than others in your group (or people you are competing against).

I’m always reviewing my notes and reading all of the materials before class to stay ahead of the pack.
If you want to get ahead of the pack,  you should invest in the finest quality suits and accessories.

lead the pack:  to be the person in a group who is the furthest ahead or doing the best in an activity.

I’d like you to meet Samantha, who leads the pack in sales for our company.
My team is leading the pack in our regional soccer division.

pack someone off:  to send someone away.

Every summer we pack our kids off to camp and they love it.
When I was 15 years-old, my parents packed me off to Europe to live with my aunt for a year and it changed my life.

PAGE

on the same page:  to think the same way about something.

Are we on the same page about the budget for this project or do we need to discuss it further?
My parents and I are not on the same page about what college I’m going to.

turn the page:  to stop dealing with something and begin something new.

After 15 years working for a bank, I decided it was time to turn the page and became a yoga teacher.
Perhaps you should turn the page on this relationship and find someone who will treat you better.

PAIN

a pain in the neck / butt:  someone or something that is irritating or annoying.

Having to drop my kids off to baseball practice in the afternoons is a real pain in the neck.
Dealing with the IT department is such a pain in the butt but what else can I do?

it pains someone to do something:  having to make a big effort to do something.

Does it really pain you to put your dirty dishes in the dishwasher?
It pains my husband to take out the garbage but I do everything else around the house.
It pains me to call my mother every weekend but I know she really appreciates it.


take/go to great pains to do something:  to make a lot of effort to do something.

It took me great pains to make dinner so you’re going to eat it whether you like it or not.
Please don’t go to great pains to pick me up at the airport—if it’s inconvenient I’ll take a cab.

PALE

pale in comparison (to/with something):  to not be as good or important as something else.

This wine pales in comparison to what we drink in France.
The quality of these running shoes pales in comparison to my Adidas.
I think Justin Bieber pales in comparison to Justin Timberlake.

PALM

grease someone’s palm:  to give someone money to get them to do what you want.

I guess I need to grease the hostess’ palm to get a reservation at that restaurant.
I wish I could just grease someone’s palm to get accepted into Harvard.

in the palm of one’s hand:  to control someone or something.

I’ve been giving great advice to these clients for so long, now they’re in the palm of my hand and except all of my suggestions without question.
My brother has my dad in the palm of his hand so I always go to him when I need help.

palm off something (palm something off):  to persuade someone to take something.

Don’t try to palm off your chores to your little sister this time.
I haven’t been able to palm my work shift off to anyone so I won’t be at the party.

PAN

pan out:  when something happens or is successful. 

If my acting career doesn’t pan out I’m going to be a drama teacher.
The job didn’t pan out because the salary they offered was too low.

PANIC BUTTON

push / press / hit the panic button:  to respond to a situation in a frightened or panicked way.

Don’t press the panic button every time people don’t “like” your Facebook posts—it makes you look like a 14-year-old.
This time I’m not going to hit the panic button and immediately sell all my stock if there’s a downturn in the market.
When the police arrived at our house I pressed the panic button sobbing because I thought something happened to my children. Actually, they were only going door-to-door collecting donations for a charity.



PANTS

caught with one’s pants down:  to be in an embarrassing situation or be discovered doing something wrong... read more

I caught my daughter with her pants down practicing singing into her hairbrush.
We caught the manager with her pants down taking lots of office supplies home.


scare the pants off someone:  to really scare or frighten someone... read more

When I turned on the light and my cat was staring me in the face it scared the pants off me.
Agggghhhh! Don’t walk up behind us so quietly like that—you scared the pants off us!

wear the pants:  to be the person who makes all of the decisions or is in charge of a marriage (or relationship).

My grandma was a tiny little lady but she definitely wore the pants in her marriage.
We finally broke up because both of us kept fighting over who would wear the pants in our relationship.


PAPER

on paper:  in theory something looks good or possible but it may or may not be that way in reality... read more

On paper this looks like the shortest route to the cabin but I guess it will depend on traffic and the condition of the roads.
Be sure to call her employment references! Anyone can make themselves look good on paper.
On paper he looked like the perfect date.  In reality, he hadn't updated his profile or picture in twenty years and was really old.

(leave) a paper trail:  (to leave) a series of written documents that show what someone did or how something happened... read more

My wife tried to hide her store purchases by paying with cash but she left a paper trail of receipts and clothing tags in her desk drawer.
If your boss is asking you to do things against company policy leave a paper trail by confirming his instructions back to him through email.

PAR

on par with someone/something:  to be at the same level as someone or something else.

I think your performance is on par with that of my previous assistant even though she had a lot more experience.
Service on Virgin Atlantic is definitely not on par with Singapore Airlines' or Emirates’.

par for the course:  something that is normal or expected for the situation.

If you don't start shopping until Christmas Eve, waiting in long lines is par for the course.
If you want to be a model, being 10 pounds underweight is par for the course.


up to par:  at the usual and expected standard.

Their customer service is no longer up to par so we switched to another company.
I’m sorry, but your singing isn’t up to par with the rest of the group so we’ve got to find someone else.

PARADE

rain on someone’s parade:  to disappoint or prevent someone from enjoying something by criticizing their plans, goals or dreams.

Just because her score wasn’t as good as yours didn’t mean you had tell everyone you were better and rain on her parade.
Don’t tell dad your plans or he’ll rain on your parade like usual.

PARCEL

parcel out something (parcel something out):  to divide and give out portions of something to different people.

We’ve got to parcel out the supplies to each department.
When do you want to parcel the assignments out to the board of directors?

PART

do one’s part:  to do the part of the activity one is responsible for doing. 

If everyone does their part and gets $1,000 in pledges we’ll easily reach our goal.
I always do my part and then you expect me to help you do yours—it’s not fair.

part and parcel (of something):  something that goes together with something else and cannot be separated from it.

Working long hours is part and parcel of being a partner at a big law firm.
Spending an hour driving through rush-hour traffic is part and parcel for commuting into the city from the suburbs.

take part (in something):  to be involved in an activity.

I’m so sorry but I won’t be able to take part in your wedding because I’ll be in Europe all summer.
I hope I can take part in the festival as a volunteer this year.

PARTING

a parting of the ways / part ways:  the separation of people because of disagreement.

She’s so impossible to work with that there’s been a parting of ways with three different assistants in six months.
I had to part ways with my business partner because he wasn’t bringing in any clients.

PARTY

the party is over:  the ending of something successful.

We finished first in our volleyball league but sadly the party is over.

PASS

make a pass at someone:  to flirt or act in the way that shows interest in another person (especially sexual interest).

I was so embarrassed when my little brother made a pass at my best friend from college.
I ignore anyone who makes a pass at me when they’re drunk.

pass along something (pass something along):   to give something to someone.

Could you pass along this report to Janice the next time you go to the accounting department?
I heard your dog died—please pass my deepest sympathy along to your sister. 


to pass away:  to die.

If you want to be polite you should say, “I’m sorry to hear your father passed away,” and not “I’m sorry your father died.”
It’s been a hard year because both my parents passed away during the holidays.

pass for someone / something:  to look like or seem to be someone or something else.

Now that you’ve colored your gray hair, you could definitely pass for 35 or 40.
With all that makeup you could pass for a clown.

mention (something) in passing:  to briefly mention something without making it seem very important.

Your mother mentioned you were coming in passing but I wasn’t sure what time you would arrive.
Since you only mentioned it in passing, I didn’t think anything further about it.

pass judgment (on someone/something):  to give a strong opinion, especially criticizing someone or something.

You shouldn’t pass judgment on a religion you know nothing about.
Don’t pass judgment on my new girlfriend until you actually meet her.

pass the buck:  to shift one’s responsibility for doing something to someone else.

You’ll never be successful if you always try to pass the buck.
My coworker tried to pass the buck again but I told my boss how many projects I’m already working on.

pass something off as something (pass off something as something):  to pretend that something is something different from what it really is.

This annoying man at one of the markets in Rome seriously tried to pass off a fake Louis Vuitton bag as an original.
Don’t try to pass off what you said as a compliment—I know you think I look fat in this dress.

pass oneself off as someone/something:  to pretend to be someone or something else.

Those girls tried to pass themselves off as my classmates in order to get a student discount.
Can you believe she was able to pass herself off as one of Madonna’s backup dancers and actually got backstage at the concert?

pass out:  to lose consciousness.

I was so tired that I passed out in front of the TV as soon as I sat down on the sofa.
I had five glasses of wine and then passed out in the cab on the way home.

pass over someone/something:  to ignore or not choose someone or something.

For the third time, I was passed over for a promotion so I’ve decided to quit.
The teacher passed over me each time I raise my hand to answer a question—I don’t think he likes me.

pass up something (pass something up):   to not take advantage of or reject an opportunity.

Don’t pass up any volunteer opportunities in college—even though you don’t get paid, they’re great experience.
I had to pass up a great deal on airfare to Florida because I don’t get paid until Friday.

PASTURES

greener pastures:  an improved situation.

Many adults go back to college in search of greener pastures in a second career.
I hope you’ll find greener pastures when you move back to your hometown.

PAT

a pat on the back:  praise or approval.

Don’t expect a pat on the back every time you do something right.
I got a nice pat on the back for the newsletter article I wrote.

PATCH

patch up something (patch something up):  to make a relationship good again.

I hope you can patch things up with your roommate since you’ll be living together for another six months.
I patched things up with my mom and apologized for yelling at her.

PATH

cross one’s path:  to happen to someone.

If the opportunity to work on Hillary Clinton’s presidential campaign ever crosses my path, I would immediately accept it.
Nothing interesting crossed my path during the month I was in Spain so I decided to travel on to Italy a week earlier.

off the beaten path:  thinking/doing something different than the usual things people do;  going where other people normally don’t go.

Instead of backpacking through Europe I went off the beaten path and spent a year traveling through Africa.
People who go off the beaten path usually gain the most valuable experience.

the path of least resistance:  the easiest possible way.

Going to college after high school is the path of least resistance but I’ve decided to launch my own business instead.
My whole life I’ve taken the path of least resistance so no wonder I’m bored and hopeless.

PAUSE

give someone pause:  to make someone stop and carefully think about something.

Your comments that I’m always so negative really gave me pause and I realized you’re right.
I hope this performance review will give my assistant pause and get him to be more serious about his work.

PAVEMENT

pound the pavement:  to look for a job or support for something.

I’ve been pounding the pavement for six months and still haven’t had one interview.
I had to pound the pavement for almost a year before I got this job.


PIG(S)

pig out:  to eat too much of something at one time... read more

I need to get some more snacks for tonight because my boys like to pig out while watching the football game.
I gained 12 pounds on our vacation because I felt obligated to pig out at every meal since food and drinks were included in the price.


when pigs fly:  never... read more

When my boss asked me to make him coffee I told him it'd be ready when pigs fly. 
I guess I can expect you to clean your room when pigs fly?
"Do you think I'll get promoted to the senior media associate position?"  "When pigs fly!  You'll have to get a degree in media relations and speak at least two languages fluently."


POTATO

couch potato:  A very lazy person who sits on a couch watching television all day... read more

I dated a really cute guy but soon discovered he was a couch potato.  I suggested many different activities we could do together but all he wanted to do was sit and watch tv.
If you start smoking pot you'll soon be a couch potato and fat from eating snacks all day.

QUANDARY

(in) a quandary:  in a situation where you are confused and don’t know what to do.  Example:  He’s in a quandary about whether to spend $100,000 on business school or just try to start his own business and learn from experience.  Read more examples



QUARTERS

in close quarters:  being together with others in a small space.  Example:  After having my own room and bathroom my whole life it’s been challenging to live in close quarters with roommates at the dorm.  Read more examples...


QUESTION(S)

beyond question:  there is no doubt about something.  Example:  My parents’ good intention is beyond question but they’re wrong to make me come home early just because I’m a girl.  Read more examples...


call into question (call something into question):  to make something uncertain or doubtful;  to question something.  Example:  These recent test scores call into question whether you can handle working part-time and still get good grades... read more examples


in question:  1) under consideration;  2) in dispute.  Read more examples...

There are two proposals in question and we hope to select one of them by the end of today’s meeting.
There’s no problem with the product itself.  It’s the customer service that’s in question.

no question:  definitely, without any doubt.  Example:  There's no question that my boss is pregnant—she is throwing up in the bathroom every morning and is very sensitive to smells.   Read more examples...



out of the question:  impossible; not to be considered.  Example:  My parents said a trip to Europe is out of the question until I’m 18 years old.  Read more examples...


pop the question:  to propose marriage (ask someone to marry).  Example:  I need to think of a really romantic way to pop the question to my girlfriend.  Read more examples...


without question:  definitely, without any doubt.  Example:  Without question this is the best chocolate cake I’ve ever tasted — could you share the recipe?  Read more examples...


no questions asked:  not needing to provide additional information.  Example:  This store has the best return policy!  They let me return the shoes with no questions asked, even after I wore them.  Read more examples...


QUICK

quick on the uptake:  to be able to understand something very quickly.  Example:  I already explained that to her twice. This new secretary is not quick on the uptake.  Read more examples...


QUIET

quiet as a mouse:  very quiet and / or shy.  Example:  My twins couldn’t be more different:  one is a gregarious cheerleader and the other is quiet as a mouse.  Read more examples...


QUITE

quite a bit:  a lot of;  much.  Example:  She wanted to marry a man with quite a bit of money so she found someone who was 20 years older.  Read more examples...


quite a few:  many.  Example:  You have quite a few boyfriends, don’t you?  Read more examples...


quite a lot:  many, much.  Example:  I’m sorry I can’t go out tonight I’ve got quite a lot of homework to do.  Read more examples...



RACE

race against time (race against the clock):  trying to finish or do something in a short period of time... read more

It was always a race against time in the mornings trying to get the kids ready for school.
It was a race against time to find a new apartment before our lease was up.

RACK

rack up something:  1) to accumulate a lot of something; 2) to score a lot of points.

I racked up a lot of frequent flyer miles traveling to Asia for business.
Be careful.  it’s easy to rack up a lot of credit card debt on small daily purchases.


RADAR

on someone’s radar:  in someone’s awareness so they can consider it.

I’d love to ask Cindy out for a date but I’m not even on her radar.
Someone please tell me how I can get this topic on management’s radar—it’s really important.

RAGE

all the rage:  popular or in style.

Do you remember when bell bottoms and platform shoes were all the rage?
Watch this YouTube channel if you want to find out what fashions are all the rage in Paris.

RAILS

go off the rails:  to be ruined by poor management.

Everything went off the rails when the owner’s son took over the company.
Sandra's wedding plans will go off the rails if someone doesn't intervene and help her.


RAIN

raining cats and dogs:  to rain very hard... read more

It’s been raining cats and dogs for two days and now there some flooding in the coastal areas.
I love staying at home drinking tea when it rains cats and dogs outside.
When it's raining cats and dogs an umbrella really doesn't help much.


RAINBOW

chasing rainbows:  trying to accomplish something that isn’t practical.

My wife is chasing rainbows again with her idea to knit dog collars.
Everyone says I'm chasing rainbows but one day one of my business ideas is going to make millions of dollars.


RAKE

rake in something (rake something in):  to obtain a large amount of something that’s valuable.

She’s been raking in new clients now that she’s advertising on the radio.
I was raking in the money when the real estate market with strong.

RAMP

ramp up something:  to increase the volume or amount of something.

We need to ramp up security after someone broke into our neighbor’s home.
If this is a party then why can’t we ramp up the music?

RANCH

bet the ranch:  to risk everything you have to try to obtain something.

I’m pretty certain our team will win but I wouldn’t bet the ranch.
I’d bet the ranch her daughter could be a fashion model with her unique look.

RANK(S)

pull rank:  to use the power of your job or position to get what you want.

My business partner pulled rank and took the invitation to go to the Gala.
Your boss tried to pull rank and take the pen I got you but I was careful to have your name engraved on it.

join the ranks of something:  to become part of a group.

In June I’ll join the ranks of college graduates with huge student loan debt.
I hope to join the ranks of lawyers or doctors someday.

RANSOM

a king’s ransom:  a large amount of money.

It would take a king’s ransom to purchase a mansion like that.
Don’t laugh—she makes a king’s ransom selling clothing for dogs.

RAP

beat the rap:  to avoid punishment.

The victim couldn’t identify the burglar so unfortunately he was able to beat the rap.
My sister tried to beat the rap by blaming the dog for the mess on the floor.

take the rap for something:  to be blamed or punished for something you didn’t do.

I take the rap for a lot of things because I’m the oldest child.
My friend is so cool! He took the rap for cheating on the test but didn't tell the teacher that everyone else did the same thing.

RAT

smell a rat:  to have a feeling something is wrong.

I’ve got five kids so I smell a rat whenever it gets really quiet at my house.
I smelled a rat when my girlfriend said her ex-boyfriend was just calling to say hello.

RATTLE

rattle off something (rattle something off):  to quickly say something.

I love how my boyfriend can rattle off all the scores and stats for countless Super Bowl championships but can’t remember the date we met.
I can rattle off phone numbers from 20 years ago but I don’t know any of my current friends’ numbers because they’re all programmed into my phone and I auto-dial them.

RAW

a raw deal:  unfair treatment.

I got a raw deal with my desk and computer because I started a week later than the rest of the team.
Did you get a raw deal or did you just except the first offer without negotiating a higher salary?


RAY(S)

a ray of sunshine:  a sign of hope.

The inquiry from a potential client offered a ray of sunshine for my new business.
My tax refund gave me a ray of sunshine for eliminating some of my credit card debt.

catch some rays (catch a few rays):  to sunbathe, to lie outside in the sun.

Wow, it looks like you caught some rays at the beach this weekend.
I’m going to just relax this weekend and catch a few rays.

REACH

reach out (to someone):  to try to communicate with or offer help to someone.

After my mother died, a lot of friends and colleagues reached out to send kind messages and stopped by to see me.
You need to reach out to more voters if you want to win this election.

within reach:  something that is possible to do or have.

It will be a challenge but I think running a marathon is within reach if you slowly add mileage during the year and don’t get injured.
I earned a $50,000 bonus last year and think $100,000 is within reach for next year.

READ

read something into something:  to insert your own meaning into something instead of what was intended.

If your boyfriend said he’s tired and doesn’t want to go out tonight, why do automatically read more into it?
Please do not read something else into this performance review.  We were very pleased overall but would like to see improvement in this particular area.


read up on something:  to read information to learn more about something.

I was reading up on nutrition and supplements and I’m going to drink a lot more herbal teas in the future.
You should read up on that car, especially some Consumer Reports, before you decide whether to buy it.

read between the lines:  to discover hidden meaning in something someone says or writes.

I meant exactly what I said.  Why do you always try to read between the lines?
If you read between the lines you'll see she wants you to spend more time with the kids.

read something (from) cover to cover:  to read something from beginning to end.

I didn’t get any sleep last night because I was reading the last Harry Potter novel from cover to cover.
Few people sit down and read the Bible from cover to cover.

read the fine print:  the important information (and often legal information).

Does anyone really read the fine print when they load software onto their computer?
If you read all the fine print you’d never take any pharmaceutical medications.

REALITY

in reality:  actually.

I’d hoped to finish my paper today but in reality I haven’t even started.
Whatever thoughts you choose to think will determine how you feel in reality.


REAP

reap what you sow:  what you experience is a result of your actions.

What you expect when you eat lots of sweetened fattening foods? You reap what you sow.
If you want to improve your grades just remember you reap what you sow.
I learned that it’s not how many hours I work but what work I actually complete — you reap exactly what you sow.


REAR

bring up the rear:  to be at the back of a group of people going somewhere.

Whenever we go for a run I’m always the one bringing up the rear.
To make sure none of the kids get lost, I’ll stay behind and bring up the rear.

rear its ugly head:  to become a problem that needs to be resolved.

The mold in the bathroom shower is starting to rear its ugly head  again.
Can you make an announcement at the staff meeting about getting to work on time? Staff tardiness is starting to rear its ugly head.

REBOUND

on the rebound:  1) becoming stronger or better;  2) recovering from the ending of a romantic relationship.

I’m definitely on the rebound since I got the cast off my leg.
You should never date anyone seriously when you’re on the rebound from a long-term relationship.

RECORD

for the record:  something that is said publicly and officially.

Just for the record, I never intentionally took marijuana—someone had cooked it into the brownies and none of us knew about it.
The senator wanted to make a statement for the record so his views would not be taken out of context.


off the record:  not meant to be known publicly or officially.

I can only speak off the record because there’s a confidentiality clause in my contract.
Off the record, we’re launching a major new product in June.

on the record:  to make something be known officially and publicly.

We would like to hear you make that promise on the record.
The politician called the news conference to go on the record about his relationship with his assistant.

set the record straight:  to tell the true facts that haven’t yet been reported.

There have been so many rumors I’m really glad you finally set the record straight.
To set the record straight,  it’s not that you’re overweight—he’s just not interested in you because he’s gay.

RED

in the red:  to be in debt.

After two straight quarters of profits the company went in the red in the third quarter and investors started to get nervous.
I never buy on credit because I don’t like being in the red.

see red:  to be very angry.

My mom saw red when she came home and noticed we’d eaten some cake.
Uh-oh. That look means my dad’s seeing red about something.

paint the town red:  to go out and have a wild celebration (usually drinking a lot of alcohol).

We went out on New Year’s Eve and I guess I painted the town red because I can’t remember anything.
We’re going to paint the town red tonight—want to join us?

roll out the red carpet:  to give a special welcome to someone. (Like the red carpet at special events: e.g., movie premieres, award ceremonies, galas).

Whenever my parents come to visit, my sweet wife really rolls out the red carpet and they love it.
Let’s schedule a planning meeting—we need to roll out the red carpet for the speakers at this conference.

to give the red carpet treatment:  to treat someone with special care and attention.

We like to stay at the Four Seasons hotel because they give all their guests the red carpet treatment.
Thanks for a wonderful weekend and all the red carpet treatment you gave us.

REEL

reel in someone/something (reel someone/something in):  to attract or pull someone/something closer towards someone.

The coach reeled in all the players from the field for a brief talk about the next play.
We need to reel in some new customers from the surrounding cities in order to increase profits.

reel off something (reel something off):  to say or do things very quickly one after another.

She reeled the figures off so quickly everyone knew she’d prepared well for the presentation.
I used to be able to reel off all the names of the presidents and vice presidents but now I can only remember a few of them.

REFLECT

reflect on something:  to carefully think about something.

Perhaps you should stop and reflect on everything you did the past semester before blaming your “awful” professor for your terrible grade.
Whenever I board an airplane I get nervous and reflect on how precious life is.

REGARD

in regard to something:  in relation to something; in consideration of something.

In regard to this summer, we haven’t made any plans yet but we'll be going to Paris for Christmas.
Your work performance is very good but in regard to your relationship with the rest of the team, we’re very concerned.
I’m calling in regard to my appointment with Dr. Jones on April 20.

REIN

give someone / something free rein (have free rein):  allow someone / something complete freedom in action or expression.

Do you really think you should give free rein to your five-year-old in the kitchen?
His dogs have free rein at the house so there’s dog hair everywhere.

keep a tight rein on someone / something:  to restrict or control someone or something.

We’ve got to keep a tight rein on travel expenditures during the next year so we'll either travel less or fly coach class.
Until your grades improve, were going to keep tight rein on your phone and computer use.

rein in someone / something (rein someone / something in):  to restrain or control someone or something.

After I switched jobs I had to rein in my spending on clothes and eating out.
We had to rein in our children’s’ telephone usage after we discovered how many hours they were talking to friends late at night.

take over the reins:  to take over control of something.

Office morale improved drastically after the new director took over the reins.
I hope the economy will improve when the next president takes over the reins.

REST

rest assured:  to feel sure or certain that something is going to happen. (The phrase is often used to tell someone else not to worry about something).

Sir, even though we left 20 minutes late, you can rest assured that the plane is going to land on time.
I always set the alarm on my clock and on my phone when I have a test so I can rest assured I'll wake up on time.

RIGHT

Mr. Right:  the man who is the right (perfect / best) person to marry.

It's been 35 years and I'm still looking for Mr. Right.  In the meantime, I've met plenty of Mr. Wrongs.
Look, if he hit you once he's not Mr. Right and you can be sure that he will hit you again!



ROAD

Hit the road:  to leave (especially to go home);  to depart on a journey (especially to travel to a place by car)... read more

It was great to see you but I've really got to hit the road now.
You're driving to Florida? What time are you hitting the road tomorrow?

ROCK(S)

on the rocks:  when a relationship is having problems (especially a romantic relationship).

My girlfriend and I were already on the rocks when I met Janie.  Otherwise, I don't think I would have even noticed her.
Our marriage is on the rocks again but my husband refuses to go to marriage counseling.


SACK

hit the sack (hit the hay):  go to bed.

I hit the sack really early last night so I felt great this morning when I woke up.
Turn off the TV now—it’s time to hit the hay.

SADDLE

back in the saddle:  doing something that you had stopped doing for a while.

I started working out at the gym again and it feels great to be back in the saddle.
Don’t worry, it’s just an ankle sprain—you’ll be back in the saddle playing tennis in a couple of weeks.


in the saddle:   in control of something.

I prefer working on Saturdays when Sam is in the saddle because everything runs a lot more smoothly.
Finally, a female is in the saddle at our company.

saddle someone / something with something:  to give someone or something a difficult task or responsibility.

I cannot believe my boss just saddled me with another project.
Our children are very immature so it’s time to saddle them with some chores to do around the house.
After being saddled with student loan debt for the past 12 years, I finally got a second job and paid them off.

SAFE

safe and sound:  not hurt or injured.

My cat disappeared for two days and I was so worried but today she showed up safe and sound.
Drive safely, and when you get home don’t forget to call us to let us know you’ve arrived safe and sound.

better safe than sorry:  it is more desirable to be careful then to risk a bad result.

Insurance is expensive but when you’re traveling internationally it’s better to be safe than sorry.
Here take this umbrella—I know you don’t want to carry it but better safe than sorry.

in safe hands:  in a situation where someone is taking good care of you.

Don’t worry, you’ll be in safe hands with my assistant.
I thought my mother would be in safe hands at the nursing home but no one’s making sure she’s taking her medication.

play it safe:  to not take risks in a situation.

I think it was wise to play it safe and not try to drive in the snow.
He played it safe and didn’t attempt his most difficult dive during the competition.

(just) to be on the safe side:  doing something to prevent an unwanted outcome.

To be on the safe side,  let’s leave an hour early so we don’t miss the start of the game.
You might be hungry later—at least bring a sandwich or a banana just to be on the safe side.

(there is / there's) safety in numbers:  being in a group offers security and protection.

In the wild, animals travel in packs and herds because there’s safety in numbers.
I prefer to go to parties with a group of friends because there’s safety in numbers.

SAID

easier said than done:  talking about something is not as difficult as doing it.

Eating healthy foods is unfortunately easier said than done.
Sticking to a New Year’s resolution is easier said than done and most people quit soon after starting.

something to be said for something:  there are reasons why something is desirable or advantageous.

There’s something to be said for being on time or a little early.
There’s something to be said for having good manners at the table.

when all is said and done:  when everything has been considered.

When all is said and done, you did your best and you can’t ask yourself more than that.
When all is said and done, we couldn’t agree on the other’s religion so we finally broke up.

SAIL

sail through something: 1) to quickly and smoothly move through something; 2) to easily achieve something.

We sailed through customs and immigration but then got stuck in traffic for three hours coming home from the airport.
I sailed through college without any problems but had a really difficult time in law school.

set sail:  to start a trip by boat or ship.

The cruise sets sail in Istanbul on June 2.
I’d love to set sail on a romantic cruise one day.
Unfortunately, the ferry never set sail because of bad weather.

SAKE

for old times’ sake:  a way of doing something to remember something pleasant in the past.

We’re going to wear our old football jerseys to the game for old times’ sake.
Let’s play 80's music at the party for old times’ sake.

for goodness’ sake / for Pete’s sake:   an expression used in spoken English to emphasize 1) that someone is surprised or amazed by something; 2) that someone is annoyed, irritated or exasperated.


[Note: this is a polite way to express this feeling but you will often hear people say “for God’s sake,” “for Christ’s sake’” or “for f*ck sake” in English—I don’t recommend using them because these expressions can be highly offensive].

For goodness sake!  How did my dog manage to climb up on this counter to eat the cake?
Just do your homework for goodness sake and stop giving me excuses.
For goodness sake, why did you buy me another ugly tie?
You’re 35 years old Eleanor—it’s time you stopped dressing like a teenager for goodness sake!
For Pete’s sake,  when is it going to stop raining?
I said I will go to the store this afternoon; stop continually reminding me for Pete’s sake.


SALT

rub salt in someone’s wounds:  to make someone feel worse about a situation.

My brother said I’m fat just to rub salt in my wounds when I didn’t make the cheer-leading squad.
He made a huge mistake but don’t say anything more to him—you’ll only rub salt in his wounds.

SAME

(the) same to you:  (spoken) a polite way to wish the same good thing that someone has said to you.

“I hope you have a great weekend.” “Thanks, the same to you.”
“Best wishes for a healthy and happy new year.” “Same to you!”


SAND

bury (have) one's head in the sand:  to ignore or refuse to think about a problem or something unpleasant.

When his wife left him for another man he buried his head in the sand and didn't remove his wedding band for three months.
Dad I'm begging you to stop burying your head in the sand! That mole on your arm is growing and you need the doctor to have a look at it immediately!

SAY

before you can say something:  very quickly.

The restaurant service was so good that before you could say “excuse me,” the waiters were already at the table to help.
Before I could say “no thanks,” the saleswoman sprayed me with perfume.


have the final say:  to have the authority to make a decision.

I don’t have a problem with you going but your father will have the final say.
Everyone agreed—except my boss—and naturally she had the final say, which was no.

needless to say:  obviously.

The beach was spectacular—needless to say the weather was sunny and warm.
I’m broke so needless to say, I can’t join you on the trip. 

it goes without saying:  obviously.

It goes without saying that while we are away you should not have parties or invite a lot of friends over to the house.
The baby is finally asleep so it goes without saying that you should be quiet.

never say never:  you should never say you’ll never do a particular thing ever again.

I doubt I’ll ever go back to that restaurant but I’ll never say never.
I hated my first golf lesson but never say never, I may try it one more time.


say a lot about something:  to show or give a lot of information about something.

Her expensive jewelry and clothes say a lot about what she’d expect you to buy her for her birthday.
Let’s go—this dirty silverware and wine glasses say a lot about this restaurant.

sorry to say:  I regret having to tell you this.

Sorry to say this but we prefer it if you didn’t bring your dog into the store.
I’m sorry to have to say this but we have to downsize our staff and your last day at the company will be today.

to say the least:  an expression used to show there’s more you could say about something but you’re not going to say it.

Her outfit was skimpy, to say the least.
The lecture was so boring, to say the least. 

(just) say the word:  an expression used to tell someone to feel comfortable to ask if they need something from you.

If you need any help with your homework just say the word.
When you’re feeling overwhelmed just say the word and I’ll come over and babysit so you can get some rest.

need I say more:  it is not necessary to say more about something because it’s already obvious what would be said.

It’s a 3 carat diamond ring, need I say more?
I got a zero on the quiz—need I say more?

say one’s piece:  to say exactly what you want to say; to be able to express one’s opinion honestly.

I asked the manager to meet with me for 15 minutes so I could say my piece.
I really didn’t want to see her again but I knew it would never end until she had a chance to say her piece.

SCALE(S)

scale back something (scale something back):  to reduce or make the size, degree or amount of something smaller.

We scaled back on our travel this year now that we have a baby.
You’re going to need to scale back on the amount of salt you consume and increase vegetables in your diet.

scale up something (scale something up):  to increase or make the size, degree or amount of something larger.

After we hired two more employees we were able to scale up the number of clients we could serve.
The furniture store scaled up to a larger showroom so they could display more of its products.


tip the scales:  to make something more likely to happen.

If I get a big bonus it’ll tip the scales for staying at the firm another year.
I wanted to go to Stanford but the scholarship to the University of Michigan tipped the scales and I’m going there instead.

tip the scales at something:  to be a particular weight.

I got serious about dieting after I tipped the scales at 165 pounds.
Our luggage tipped the scales at 75 kg so we had to pay an extra $250!

SCARE / SCARED

scare away someone/something (scare someone/something away):  to cause someone or something to go away or stay away.

You’ll scare him away if you continue to send him text messages all day.
I got scared away when I saw how many people were at dance tryouts and decided to go home without even trying.


scare someone/something away from something/doing something:  to cause someone or something to not do something.

When I saw open-heart surgery during my first year at college, it scared me away from a career in medicine.
The long list of health and safety requirements usually scares people away from opening a restaurant.

scare off someone (scare someone off):  to cause someone or something to go away or stay away.

Try to smile a little—that scowl on your face would scare off any prospective client.
The aggressive salespeople at the store scared me off, so I went home and looked at the handbags on their website instead.

scare the hell out of someone:  to really frighten someone.

When I saw my bank balance was negative it scared the hell out of me because my rent check hadn’t cleared yet.
When my doctor told me there was a problem with my blood test it really scared the hell out of me but luckily it wasn’t anything serious.


scare the pants off someone (scare someone’s pants off):  to frighten someone.

My little brother likes to jump out from behind things and scare the pants off everyone.
I scared the pants off my dad when I tried to sneak in the house in the middle of the night.


scare someone to death:  to really frighten someone.

That movie scared me to death!
When I told my wife something happened at work I scared her to death and she thought I’d lost my job.


scared stiff:  to be extremely frightened.

I was scared stiff through the entire flight because there was so much turbulence.
My daughter was scared stiff when she got arrested for shoplifting.

SCENE

burst onto the scene:  to suddenly become famous.

When Justin Bieber burst on the scene I never thought he’d stay popular for such a long time.
I’m so old I remember when Elvis burst onto the scene.

cause / make a scene:  to be very loud in public in a way that disturbs other people.

My two-year-old has been making a scene every time we go out so we usually stay home these days.
Please don’t cause a scene at the wedding reception this time—it’s so embarrassing.
Can you please call the manager before that customer causes a scene?

on the scene:  at a place where something is happening.

Luckily, the fire department was on the scene within 10 minutes so there was minimal damage to our house.
I’m not sure what's happening but I think there are a few celebrities on the scene because everyone's screaming and taking photos.

set the scene (for something):  1) to make something more likely to happen; 2) to describe the background about a situation.

The defeat of all the top seeds in the semifinals has set the scene for an unlikely winner.
The first chapter set the scene for a suspenseful crime novel.
My date hoped the candles and flowers on the table would set the scene for a romantic dinner.

behind the scenes:  quietly and discreetly so that other people don’t notice.

The president's security team is always behind the scenes ensuring his safety.
There’s a lot that goes on behind the scenes to put on an event like this.
As you use the computer, your antivirus system is working behind the scenes to prevent attacks.

SCHEDULE

ahead of schedule:  happening in advance of a deadline, before something was supposed to happen.

My editor and the publisher were really surprised that I finished the book ahead of schedule.
Everyone will get a bonus if the project is completed ahead of schedule.
My flight left 15 minutes late but we actually arrived 10 minutes ahead of schedule.

behind schedule:  happening after a deadline, later than when something is supposed to happen.

Unfortunately, the painters did not get their work done so the entire renovation is behind schedule.
We’re running about 20 minutes behind schedule so please have a seat and the doctor will be with you as soon as possible.

on schedule:  happening on time, at the time something was scheduled to happen.

I love this bus line because it’s always on schedule.
It’s embarrassing—I don’t think any of our conferences have ever been on schedule.

SCHEME

in the (grand / overall / larger) scheme of things:  looking at the situation in a broader or more general way.

Although you didn’t get the grade you wanted in physics, in the grand scheme of things  you had a great semester.
In the overall scheme of things,  staying for one weekend with your grandma is not going to ruin your summer holiday.
We got the leather seats because its a small price to pay in the larger scheme of things when you keep a car for 8-10 years.

SCIENCE

have something down to a science:  to be able to complete a process easily and effortlessly.

My assistant has the production of our monthly newsletter down to a science and can complete it in just two days.
My husband finally has the morning routine down to a science and can get the kids up and off to school without my help.

SCORE

settle a/the score:  to retaliate or do something to someone because they did something to hurt you in the past.

We’ve got to settle a score with our rivals at the next game.
If you try to settle the score with your brother he’ll just fight back and your feud will never end.


score points:  doing something to make people like or support you.

Do you really think you’re scoring points by laughing so loudly at the boss’ jokes?
My sister always tries to score points with my dad by giving him hugs and kisses and calling him “daddy.”

score something:  1) to win something in a competitive activity; 2) to obtain something; 3) to buy drugs illegally.

Did you know that in 1962, NBA basketball player Wilt Chamberlain scored 100 points in a single game?!
I've reserved a room in a hotel but I really hope to score an apartment within the first month after I move to San Francisco.
My boyfriend used to drive all the way to the bad part of the city to score coke and marijuana but he got arrested a month ago and now his parents won't let him drive at all.

SCRAPE

scrape by:  1) to only have enough money or resources to survive; 2) to almost fail at something.

When I was a student I scraped by working part-time in the cafeteria.
It’s a terrible score but at least I scraped by with a 70% on my calculus test.

scrape together something (scrape something together):  to manage to gather or collect something.

We’re out of food but I was able to scrape something together for dinner tonight.
We scraped some used furniture together to help a young new couple at our church.

SCRATCH

from scratch:   from nothing, using basic materials.

My mother makes the best cakes and cookies from scratch.
My great-grandfather built this house from scratch in the 1920s.

up to scratch:  at an accepted standard or quality.

My teacher said my paper wasn’t up to scratch but gave me a chance to rewrite it over the weekend.
I really loved our receptionist but her attendance was never up to scratch and we needed someone more reliable.

scratch one’s head:  to be puzzled about or have difficulty understanding something.

My dad scratched his head as our dog ran in circles around the house for 20 minutes.
I was scratching my head when my girlfriend got angry at me for giving her a necklace.

scratch the surface:  to handle or complete just a small part of something.

I’ve been reading this novel all day and I still haven’t scratched the surface.
I started cleaning the house two days ago but I haven’t scratched the surface and our guests are arriving tomorrow.

SELL

sell someone / something short:  to estimate or value something as smaller or less important than it really is.

You're selling yourself short by saying you're a beginner when you've studied three years of English.
My boss sold the temporary administrative assistant short—she actually is going to law school in the evenings and was really helpful at the meeting yesterday.


SHEEP

wolf in sheep's clothing:  Someone or something that pretends to be good or friendly but is actually trying to cause damage, harm or take advantage of you... Read more

I always thought strangers were wolves in sheep's clothing but sadly I learned family members can also be trouble makers.
Students at my university are so competitive that I learned the hard way that many of my "friends" were actually wolves in sheep's clothing.


Idiom:  count sheep:  to imagine sheep and count them jumping over a fence as a way to make yourself go to sleep.

I thought my daughter was talking on her iPhone late at night but it turned out she was counting sheep.
Does counting sheep work for you? It just makes me more awake.

SHY

shy away:   to avoid something;  to keep oneself from doing something.

Normally, I shy away from speaking in public but I really enjoy the Toastmaster's speaking club because the people are so nice and understanding.
I promised myself that I wouldn't shy away anymore from wearing bold colors and prints.


SLEEP

sleep like a log:  to sleep very soundly (deeply)—so well that noises don't even wake you up.

Our neighbors had a party last night and the police were called but I slept like a log and didn't hear a thing.
I drank so much at the party that I came home and slept like a log for 12 hours.



sleep on something:  to wait until the next day (in order to think carefully) before making an important decision.

There's no need for you to sleep on it. We know it's hard to make a decision so we created a free 30-day trial where you can cancel your membership and get a full refund if you don't like it.
My boyfriend proposed to me in front of all of our friends so he wasn't very happy when I said I wanted to sleep on it.


SNAIL

at a snail's pace:  very slowly.

I'm so frustrated because, although I started exercising every day, I'm still losing weight at a snail's pace.
My youngest son does his homework at a snail's pace but as long as we are patient while helping him, he does eventually complete it.



SOCK

put a sock in it:  a rude (impolite) way of telling someone to stop talking or be quiet (stop making a lot of noise).

Hey! Put a sock in it or you'll have to leave the movie theater.
My roommate was talking to her boyfriend for almost 3 hours last night and I finally asked her to put a sock in it.

T

to a T:  perfectly.

After dieting for three months I was really excited that my jeans fit to a T again.
That’s a beautiful dress and it fits you to a T.

TAB

pick up the tab (for something):  to pay for something.

I can’t believe my date asked me to dinner but forgot his wallet so I had to pick up the tab.
My boss was so generous for picking up the tab for everyone at happy hour last night.


TABLE(S)

bring something to the table:  to add something of value.

Please don’t invite the marketing director to this meeting—she’s so negative and never brings anything to the table.
The discussion was so useful and every participant brought something to the table.

on the table:  something that’s being considered.

There are three agenda items on the table for tomorrow’s discussion does anyone need to add anything else?
We’ll leave the offer on the table until the end of the week so you can carefully consider it.

set the table:  to put dishes, flatware, glasses, etc. on the table before a meal.

clear the table:  to remove dirty dishes, flatware, glasses, etc. from the table after a meal.

My daughter sets the table and my son clears the table after dinner as part of their chores.
Could you please set the table  while I finish preparing dinner?
When I cleared the table I discovered my five-year-old had put all of her vegetables inside a napkin.

under the table:  something done secretly (and often illegally).

If you want to get a window seat at that restaurant you need to give the hostess $50 under the table.
The mayor was recently convicted of awarding construction contracts under the table.

turn the tables (on someone / something):  to change a situation to its exact opposite.

My wife turned the tables on me and started mowing the lawn and now I have to cook, clean, grocery shop, iron, do the wash…
Our opponents turned the tables on us and started playing aggressive defense in the second half of the game.
I sure hope my son will turn the tables and become serious about his studies.

wait (on) tables:  to serve customers meals as a waiter / waitress in a restaurant.

I waited tables for five years to pay expenses while I was in college.
If you work at a fancy, upscale restaurant you can make great tips waiting tables but it’s really hard work.

TABS

keep tabs on someone / something:  to monitor or carefully watch someone or something.

Since my parents are keeping tabs on me I got a second phone that they don’t know about.
This app is excellent for keeping tabs on how many calories you consume each day.

TACK

tack on something (tack something on):  to add something extra onto something.

Check your bill carefully because we noticed our phone company tacked on some extra services we didn’t order.
The report looks great but why did you tack on the statistics here? They need to go in the results section.

TAG

tag along (with someone / something):  to go somewhere with someone without being invited.

I wish her husband wouldn’t tag along with us—next time let’s officially call it “girls night out.”
My five-year-old always wants to tag along with his older sister and today, when she refused, he was heartbroken.

TAIL

tail off:  to gradually lessen.

Could you please repeat your question—your voice tailed off at the end and I couldn’t hear you.
The fastest runners sprinted ahead of the pack and the slowest runners tailed off at the halfway mark.

one’s tail between one’s legs:  to be ashamed or embarrassed about something (like a dog that’s been scolded).

When my supervisor yelled at me for being late, my colleague explained that I had taken my father to chemotherapy—then my boss walked away with his tail between his legs.
I sat at the meeting with my tail between my legs because I was the only person who hadn’t completed their part of the project.

TAILOR-MADE

tailor-made for someone / something:  to be specially made to fit or suit someone or something.

All of our private English courses are tailor-made to the individual student to help them reach their personal goals.
Each desk and chair is tailor-made for our employees to ensure an ergonomic workstation.

TAILSPIN

go into a tailspin:  to worsen very quickly.

After I lost my scholarship everything went into a tailspin:  I couldn’t afford to pay my tuition so I had to get a job which left me with no time to study and my grades plummeted, and so on.
When I got diagnosed with cancer my professional life went into a tailspin but my personal life greatly improved as family and friends rallied around me.

TAKE

hard to take:  difficult to manage, experience or believe.

At first the news that I’d lost my job was very hard to take but after a week I was actually happy about it.
Finding out my son enlisted in the military has been very hard to take and I pray nothing will happen to him.

not take kindly to something:  to not be pleased with something.

I did not take kindly to my manager’s suggestion that I wear more makeup and jewelry.
My dog did not take kindly to the new diet dog food the vet recommended.

take after someone:  to resemble, look like or have the same qualities as a relative.

My son takes after his grandfather with his musical talent.
It’s strange but I don’t really take after anyone in my family—everyone is short and has dark hair while I’m tall with blonde hair and green eyes.

take away (from something):  to reduce something.

I think all the make-up you wear really takes away from your natural beauty and makes you look cheap.
If you take away some of the background from the introduction I think your paper will be more effective.

take charge (of something):  to get control over something.

I wish someone would take charge of ordering supplies for the company because we’re always out of something when we need it.
When the new manager took charge of the department everyone was forced to be on time in the morning.

take effect:  to begin working.

It will take six months for the new tax increases to take affect so we hope to move the company to a new state before then.
Take two pills an hour before you go to sleep so they’ll take effect by the time you get in bed.

take forever:  to happen slowly or require a long time to do something.

Let’s go somewhere else—it takes forever to get served at this restaurant on Friday nights.
I thought it would take forever to get my driver’s license renewed but the whole process only took 20 minutes.


take hold:  to become established.

It didn’t take long for a more professional atmosphere to take hold after they instituted a dress code and tracked working hours.
I really hope smoking bans in public places will take hold in the poorer countries in the years ahead.

take it easy:  1) to rest and relax;  2) to not become angry, agitated or upset about something.

It was hard to take it easy at the beach because my husband’s office kept calling him with various “emergencies.”
I took it easy this weekend and caught up on sleep.
Take it easy—I know it’s not the best place but I already found us a new hotel to stay tomorrow night.

take it or leave it:  1) either accept or refuse something without changes or discussion;  2) to have a neutral feeling about something.

That’s my final price—take it or leave it.
When I asked the landlord to paint the apartment she said it’s for rent as is and we can take it or leave it.
My wife really wants to live in the suburbs but I could take it or leave it.


take off:  1) to leave the ground and fly;  2) to leave or depart quickly;  3) to become successful very quickly.

You just missed it—the aircraft took off two minutes ago.
I’m always anxious watching the space shuttle take off after that explosion years ago.
Sorry to take off so soon but my wife’s waiting at home for me.
I cannot believe your friend took off without even thanking us for dinner!
Sales took off after my jewelry was featured in a national magazine.
It seems like sudden success to everyone but I wrote for years before my blog took off.

take (something) off:  to not work for a period of time.

This week has been hell because my boss and the receptionist took the week off and I was left to do everything.
I decided to take the day off and run some errands.
Could I take next Friday off?  I need to see the dentist.

take off after someone:  to chase or follow someone who just left a place.

I took off after the woman who was in front of me at the grocery store because she forgot to take her credit card with her.
My three-year-old takes off after me anytime I leave one room and go to another.

take on someone (take someone on):  1) to fight or compete against someone;  2) to hire someone for a job.

Roger Federer is taking on Novak Djokovic in the next round of the French Open tennis tournament.
The heavyweight champion said he will take on any challenger who wants to fight him.
We took on two new teachers so we could offer Japanese and Chinese classes.
We couldn’t afford to take on another administrative assistant but sometimes we use temporary employees when we’re very busy.

take on something (take something on):  1) to accept something;  2) to fight against something.

Our grandma took on all the responsibilities at our house when my mom returned to work.
I’m sorry but I can’t take on any more clients at this time.
We’re ready to take on these corporations if they don’t agree to use environmentally-friendly products.

take some doing:  to require a good amount of work and effort.

It will take some doing but this house will be worth a lot of money after the renovation.
Learning a new language takes some doing but anyone can do it.


take someone aside:  to bring someone to a different area to privately speak with them.

I tried all evening to take the artist aside but everyone was also trying to talk to her.
I was so happy when the team leader took me aside and said my project was outstanding.

take someone back (take back someone):  to resume a relationship with someone.

If your spouse hits you, don’t ever take him or her back without going through professional counseling together.
I took my girlfriend back two times but now I realize she’ll never change and we’re not good together.


take someone back to something:  to make someone remember something.

This song takes me right back to senior year in high school.
Seeing this little book again takes me back to when you were a baby.


take someone down (take down someone):  to remove someone from a position of power or control.

Whenever we take down a dictator either another one appears afterwards or there’s chaos.
The board of directors is trying to take down the CEO of the company.

take someone out somewhere:  to bring someone to a place for food or entertainment.

My son always takes us out for a nice meal on our anniversary.
My fiance took me out for pizza and bowling on our first date.


take someone up on something:  to accept someone’s offer or invitation.

I hope you’ll take me up on going out to have coffee one day.
I just might take you up on your offer to babysit next weekend.

take something as it comes:  to deal with something when it happens.

Try not to worry about possible problems—we’ll take any challenge as it comes.
I know this sounds basic but I just took each chapter as it came and I slowly finished writing the book.


take something away from someone / something:  to reduce the positive quality of someone or their work.

No one can take away your dignity if you don’t let them.
Even though you didn’t get selected, no one can take the experience away from you.


take something back (take back something):  to admit what you said was wrong.

I take back my earlier comments—you’re right, there were more jobs created under this administration.
If you don’t take back what you said about my friend I’m leaving right now.

take something / someone for granted:  to fail to appreciate someone or something; to expect something will happen automatically.

After I became sick, I never took my health for granted ever again.
Don’t take your most loyal fans for granted or your singing career will not last very long.

take something out on someone:  to express frustration, anger, etc. at someone who didn’t cause these negative feelings.

Every time my husband has a hard day at work he comes home and takes it out on me.
I’m tired of you taking your frustration out on me—why don’t you go to the gym and work out your stress before you come home?

take something over / take over (something):  to get control over something or be responsible for something.

The two companies merged after a hostile company take over.
Starting in March, my mother will take over babysitting our youngest child in the afternoon.
Can you take over the phones today for an hour while I go to lunch?


take something upon oneself to do something:  to voluntarily decide to accept responsibility for doing something without being asked to do it.

Why do you always take it upon yourself to volunteer for projects at the church?
I was thrilled when my daughter took it upon herself to help me by cooking dinner twice a week.

take to someone:  to start to like someone.

My dog takes to anyone who scratches her ears.
Luckily, my father-in-law took to me the first time we met.

take to something:  to start to enjoy doing something.

I never dreamed I’d take to skydiving but I love it.
My cat has taken to sleeping on the window sill in the mornings.


take up where someone left something off:  to continue doing something that someone else started.

It was difficult to take up the project where my predecessor left off because she didn’t leave any notes.
Julie, please take up reading where Jonathan left off.


TAKEN

taken aback:  to be surprised or confused about something.

I was taken aback when your mother asked if I’m having trouble getting pregnant.
We were all taken aback when my friend’s wife told us to all go home before dessert was served.


TAKES

(have got) what it takes:  to have everything that’s needed or required.

If you knew what it really takes to be a model you wouldn’t want to do the work.
He had everything it takes to make it as a champion except 100% self-confidence.

something takes the cake:  an extreme example of something.

I thought my brother had a large comic book collection but yours takes the cake.
Our previous hotel was very nice but this resort really takes the cake!

TAKING

for the taking:  easily available.

I just went to the kitchen and there are free chocolates for the taking.
If you’re looking for work for the summer there are a lot of jobs for the taking at the new outlet mall.

TALK

talk back:  to rudely reply.

If my children ever talked back to me like that they’d be grounded for weeks.
My son got detention for talking back to his teacher again.


talk down to someone:  to speak to someone as if they are not intelligent or inferior.

Don’t talk down to them just because they’re high school students or they’ll hate your speech.
My doctor talked down to me at the first appointment but was respectful when my father came with me to my second visit.

talk someone into something:  to persuade someone to do something.

I wish I had gone with Sandy to buy her car—the salesperson talked her into purchasing the most expensive model.
Please stop asking—you’re not going to talk me into letting you go out with your friends tonight.

talk someone out of something:  to persuade someone not to do something.

Hello, I’m at the shopping mall looking at the cutest $500 purse and I need you to talk me out of buying it.
I think we managed to talk her out of accepting that job but let’s hope she doesn’t change her mind.

talk someone through something:  to explain something in detail or explain how to do something step-by-step.

Could you please talk me through your CV since you graduated from college?
Their customer service is excellent—they talked to me through the entire installation.

talk out of both sides of one’s mouth:  to say different things about the same topic to different people.

If that’s what he really said then he’s talking out of both sides of his mouth.
I thought Sheila was my friend but I discovered she was talking out of both sides of her mouth.

take notice (of someone / something):  to give attention to something.

A year ago I started to take notice of what the successful salespeople were doing and now I’m one of the top sellers for my company.
Now that my daughter has started to wear makeup and style her hair, the boys have definitely begun to take notice.

talk some sense into someone:  to try to help someone to see a situation more realistically.

Please try to talk some sense into him—he wants to quit college with only one semester left.
I’m glad my parents talked some sense into me when I was thinking of spending my savings on a Porsche Carrera.

talk shop:  to talk about work when you’re not at work.

I hate going out to dinner with my husband and his colleagues because they always talk shop.
It’s happy hour! We’re supposed to be happy so stop talking shop.

TANGENT

(off) on a tangent:  to suddenly do or talk about something completely different.

I hate her lectures because she continually goes off on tangents which are boring and distracting.
I’m sorry to interrupt but you’re going on a tangent and I’d like to finish the agenda items before we adjourn the meeting.


TANGLED

tangled up with / in something:  to be involved with something that is hard to get out of.

I got tangled up with a bad group of kids when I was in high school and finally I had to switch schools because they wouldn't leave me alone.
Don’t get tangled up in any new projects this semester because you’ve got your college entrance exams to take.


TANTRUM

throw a (temper) tantrum:  to become angry, upset and argumentative.

My husband throws a temper tantrum every time I ask him to carpool the kids to soccer practice.
Seriously, if you keep throwing temper tantrums for little things like that you won’t have a boyfriend to complain about.

TAPER

taper off:  to gradually lessen.

As you start to recover, we’ll taper off the pain medication.
Lots of people always join the gym in January but the number of new enrollments tapers off in mid-February.

TARGET

(right) on target:  accurate, correct, according to plan.

Our sales figures are on target  for a 40% increase in yearly profits.
You could tell his speech was right on target by the number of tweets, Facebook likes and positive comments on our blog.

TASTE

with a bad taste in one’s mouth:  having an unpleasant memory of something.

It left a bad taste in my mouth when my friend complained for an hour about her dog but didn’t ask how my sick mother was feeling.
Every time I see my aunt spank my cousins it leaves a bad taste in my mouth.


THINK

think outside the box:  to think creatively to find new ways of doing things or solving problems.  Example:  In our training we learned some techniques to try to think outside the box including drawing, solving problems by working backwards and talking to our kids about things they'd create to solve problems... read more


think on one's feet:  to be able to think and handle a situation quickly.  Example:  When I spilled coffee all over my blouse before my speech, I was able to think on my feet and make a new "top" using my colleague's large scarf. Luckily, it looked perfectly normal under my suit jacket... read more.



THIRD

third time's the charm / third time lucky:  the third time you try to do something you succeed.

I applied for a job with the United Nations three years in a row and finally got offered a job. As they say third time's the charm!
Most people give up the first time they fail. Too bad they forget the third time's the charm.
Even though I've already failed the exam twice before I continue to remind myself that I'll be third time lucky.

TIE

tie the knot:  to marry.

Congratulations on your engagement! When are you tying the knot?
We tied the knot in front of our immediate family and a small group of friends on the beach in the Barbados.


TIME

time flies (time flies when you're having fun):  time goes by very quickly.

You're 25 years old! It seems like yesterday you were learning to drive. My does time fly!
There are still five weeks before Christmas but I know time flies so I should really start shopping for gifts this weekend.
Whenever I go on holiday I notice how time flies when you're having fun.


race against time:  a situation where someone has to finish something quickly, in a short or limited amount of time.

Why don't people immediately pull their cars over to the side of the road when they see an ambulance behind them racing against time?
I hated working for my last boss because every project was a race against time.  It was so stressful!

TON

a ton of (tons of):  a lot of something; a very large amount of something.

I got a ton of mosquito bites when we went hiking yesterday.
All I care about is getting tons of sleep this weekend!  I'm exhausted.
My kitchen has a ton of ants so I'm calling the exterminator.



TONGUE

cat / cat's got someone's tongue:  an expression that is used when someone is quiet and isn't talking or responding when you expect them to.

My five-year-old talks all the time—except when we see my friends or coworkers. Then the cat's got her tongue and she can't even say hello.
I feel like the cat's got my tongue every time the director calls on me at meetings and sometimes I can only shrug my shoulders like I have nothing to say.
Answer me! What's the matter? Cat got your tongue?

TRACK

on the right track (on track):  doing something or thinking in a way that will lead to success.

I just had my performance review and my boss said I'm on the right track for a promotion next year.
"Help! I can't finish this algebra equation!" "Calm down and keep thinking son, you're on the right track."
I think we're on track to complete the report by tomorrow afternoon. Could you take a moment on Thursday to proofread and edit it?


TRAIL

(leave) a paper trail:  (to leave) a series of written documents that show what someone did or how something happened.

My kids left a paper trail of empty candy wrappers so I knew they'd been into their Halloween candy.
Luckily, my attorney told me several months ago to leave a paper trail just in case they tried to fire me so I've got everything on record.

UNACCUSTOMED

unaccustomed to someone / something:  not used to something.

I moved here three years ago and I’m still unaccustomed to this cold weather.
I’m unaccustomed to hearing women using bad language.

UNDER

under arrest:  when the police take someone into custody (arrests them) and takes them to the police station.

The police chased the criminals for five blocks before they captured them and placed them under arrest.
The trial will be difficult because the policeman did not advise the defendant of his Miranda rights after he put him under arrest.


under certain circumstances:  in certain situations.

Under certain circumstances you can attend the training for free.
It’s possible to see the mountains from here under certain circumstances.

under scrutiny:  being closely watched, examined or investigated.

After I was caught smoking, my parents of put me under a lot more scrutiny.
The police had three people under close scrutiny for the theft of the art gallery’s paintings.

under construction:  being built.

This website is still under construction.
There’s a lot of traffic on the freeway because the bridge is under construction.

under cover:  hidden and being done secretly (especially used with police and law enforcement).

See that woman who looks like a prostitute? She’s really a police officer working under cover.
Many security guards at the shopping mall work under cover.

under fire:  being attacked by firearms or words.

When I met my boyfriend’s parents they had me under fire the entire evening.
The robbers were under fire for 20 minutes before they put down their weapons and surrendered to the police.

under oath:  having made a formal promise or taken an oath to say the truth.

The judge reminded the witness that he was under oath and should tell the truth.
You will go to jail if you lie under oath.

under one’s belt:  having the experience of doing something.

I felt a lot more confident after I got a year of teaching under my belt.
All applicants must have a college degree and at least one year of work experience under their belts to apply for this position.

under one’s breath:  speaking very quietly with a whisper (low voice).

Whenever I asked my kids to do their chores they complain under their breath.
This morning my father was grateful when I reminded him under my breath that it was my mother's birthday.

under one’s nose:  something easily seen or found.

She was looking for the perfect husband for several years when she realized her dream man—her next door neighbor—was under her nose the whole time.
I can’t find my sunglasses! They’re right under your nose; well actually, on top of your head!

under pressure:  experiencing a lot of stress and anxiety.

Our manager is under a lot of pressure since the new director doubled our sales target.
Most high school seniors are under pressure because they have to do well in school to get into a good college.

under the circumstances:  because of a certain condition, situation or circumstance.

I heard your husband’s brother recently died and I’m sure that must be difficult. Yes, it is but under the circumstances he’s actually doing very well.
Usually, you need an appointment to see the doctor but under the circumstances, he's agreed to see you before your flight leaves today. 

under the influence (of someone or something):  experiencing the effects of drugs, alcohol or the control of a powerful person.

Too many young pop singers and actors are arrested for driving under the influence these days.
It’s important to monitor who your children’s friends are so that they don’t become under the influence of bad kids.

under the table:  in secret (often doing something illegal).

Unfortunately, politicians sometimes award contracts to companies under the table.
When we got to the restaurant there was a long line, so I slipped a $20 bill to the hostess under the table and we were seated at a table 10 minutes later.

under the weather:  feeling sick, especially sick with the flu or a common cold.

I called in sick to work today because I was feeling under the weather.
No, it’s nothing serious I just feel under the weather today.

UNTIL

until all hours:  until very late.

We were up until all hours last night finishing the report before the deadline.
Our neighbors are so annoying, they play music really loud until all hours during the week.


until hell freezes over:  forever.

Those two will hate each other until hell freezes over.
I’m sure politicians will be liars until hell freezes over.

until someone is blue in the face:  talking for a very long time.

I explained how to operate the machine until I was blue in the face.
I yelled at my son for not coming home last night until I was blue in the face.

UNISON

in unison:  together at the same time.

The children’s choir wasn’t very good today—they were hardly in unison.
When I asked my kids if they wanted to go to the zoo, they screamed “yes” in unison.

UNTHINKABLE

do the unthinkable:  to do something that’s not expected.

When I woke up this morning I discovered my husband had done the unthinkable; the dishes were washed, the floor had been cleaned and the children’s lunches were packed.
When people are very drunk they sometimes do the unthinkable.

UP

not up to something:  don’t feel like doing something.

If you’re not up to going out tonight, let’s order a pizza and watch TV.
I’m not up to exercising today but I’m definitely going tomorrow no matter what.


right up there with someone / something:  is good / bad as someone/something else.

To me, doing homework is right up there with having a tooth pulled by the dentist.
Did you see her new ranking? She’s right up there with the top tennis players now.

up against someone / something:  in opposition with someone / something.

In her next match, she’s up against a much more difficult player.
I can’t go out tonight because I’m up against a tough deadline and have to work.

up and around / about:  out of bed after illness and moving again.

After the surgery, she was up and about after just a week.
It’s so nice to be up and around after being in bed with the flu for a week.

up and coming:  newly starting to be popular or successful.

Listen to this up-and-coming singer, she’s fantastic.
I read Sandy's blog because she really knows all the up and coming fashion designers.

up and running:  functioning, working properly.

Luckily, the technician got the Internet up and running again after 20 minutes.
She had hoped to have the new department up and running by the new year, but everything was behind schedule.

up for something:  enthusiastic or interested about something.

Are you up for going skiing this weekend?
If anyone’s up for a movie tonight, I’m going to see the latest installment of the Spider-man series.

up for grabs:  possible for anyone to have.

The director just announced this month’s contest and a new MacBook is up for grabs.
There are some gently-used ski jackets up for grabs in the staff lounge if anyone is interested.

up front:  clear and honest about something.

I wish you had been up front about how big your house was because I won’t be able to finish the painting job by the date you wanted.
I want to be up front about the amount of travel involved in this job:  you’ll be expected to travel at least one week every month.

up in arms:  upset, angry.

The entire team was up in arms when the coach said they would have to practice an extra 30 minutes each day.
I’m up in arms about the new fees my bank is going to start charging.

up in the air:  not decided about something, unsettled.

Our plans for the New Year’s are still up in the air but I’ll let you know what we decide in case you want to join us.
The person will select to replace the cleaner is still up in the air but we have a good list of candidates to choose from.

up in years:  old, elderly.

She’s up in years now but everyone thinks she’s 20 years younger than she is.
When I get up in years I want to move somewhere where there’s a warm climate.

up one’s alley:  an activity someone likes and is good at.

I hate fixing things but luckily home repair is up my wife’s alley.
Cooking is up her alley so she decided to quit her job and open a catering business.

up the creek:  in trouble or a difficult situation.

I’m up the creek!  My credit card bill is due in two days but I don’t get paid until next week.
We missed our flight and now were up the creek because there are no available seats on any flights until next Tuesday.

up to someone:  to be responsible for doing something.

It's not important what I think; the decision is up to my boss.
If you want to lose weight, it’s up to you to eat better and start exercising.

up to something:  secretly doing or planning something.

Whenever it’s quiet at home I know my kids are up to something.
When no one wished me a happy birthday all morning I knew my team was up to something.
up-to-date:  to the latest standards.﻿

These figures don’t look right. Can you make sure they are up-to-date?
It’s important to keep your software up-to-date so that you are protected against new viruses.


up to it:  having the desire, interest or capability to do something.

I really should do some financial planning but I’m not up to it.
I just asked Suzanne to come with us to the shopping mall but she’s not up to it.

up to no good:  doing something wrong or bad.

My puppy is always up to no good so I have to watch her very carefully.
My husband has been coming home very late and I’m worried he’s up to no good.


up to one’s eyeballs:  a lot of something undesirable... read more

During tax season, accountants are up to their eyeballs with work.
I’m up to my eyeballs in debt and need to stop using my credit cards.


up-to-the-minute:  the most recent or latest.

At Channel 5 news, we deliver up-to-the-minute reports about traffic, weather and news that’s important to you.
Check the leader board for up-to-the-minute results in the tournament.

up until:  until, to a certain time.

I was up until 2 AM finishing my homework last night so I'm exhausted.
Up until we got married my husband was a super loving guy.

UPPER

have the upper hand:  having power, control or advantage.

Children who come from wealthy families have the upper hand when applying to college.
My dogs are always fighting but this one has the upper hand because he’s stronger and faster.

UPS

ups and downs:  good and bad things;  both good and bad times.

Even the best marriages have their ups and downs.
I really liked his talk because he discussed both the ups and downs of being a famous actor.

UPSIDE

upside down:  with the top side facing downward;  changing something completely.

Her life turned upside down after having twins.
If you hang those roses upside down, they’ll dry out in a perfect bouquet.

UPTIGHT

be uptight:  worried and anxious.

My last girlfriend was gorgeous but she was so uptight,  while my current girlfriend is very average looking but completely confident about her looks.
My mother is very uptight  about my grades at school.

USE

use every trick in the book:  try everything or every possible method.

The match was so difficult she had to use every trick in the book to beat her opponent.
I’m not going to stop until I’ve used every trick in the book.

it’s no use / there’s no use:  there’s no reason to do or try something.

I’ve tried to talk to her but it’s no use—she’s inconsolable that he broke up with her.
There’s no use begging me to help because registration ended yesterday and the class is already full.

use up:  to finish all of something until nothing remains.

Help! Someone used up all the toilet paper and didn’t replace the roll with a new one.
I'm exhausted; I used up all my energy mowing the lawn this afternoon.

USED

used to (do something):  had the habit of doing something in the past.

I used to hate spinach, but now it’s one of my favorite vegetables.
When I was a kid I used to live in Nigeria for five years because my father worked for an oil company.

used to (doing) something:  familiar with something;  accustomed to something.

I know you’re used to eating sugary foods but you’re going to have to change your diet if you want to get well.
Once you get used to using this software, you’re going to love it.

USUAL

as usual:  as expected, as normally happens.

If he’s late as usual,  this time I’m not going to wait for him.
Congratulations! Your performance was excellent as usual.

VACUUM

in a vacuum:  not connected to other people or events.  Example:  If you write this report in a vacuum you’re going to have a very limited view of the situation... read more



VAIN

in vain:  without success.  Example:  I rushed to the airport to catch my flight but arrived in vain as the flight was canceled... read more


VANISH

vanish into thin air:  to completely disappear.  Example:  I turned my back for one moment at the park and in that time my dog had vanished into thin air... read more


VENGEANCE

with a vengeance:  with a lot of energy or force.  Example:  After my wife found out someone stole money from her wallet, she came out of the kitchen with a vengeance to ask who took the money... read more


VERGE

on the verge:  close to doing or experiencing something.  Example:  I was on the verge of accusing my roommate of stealing my money from the jar in the kitchen when I remembered I’d used it to pay the pizza delivery man... read more


VERY

very last:  the final part of something.  Example:  We arrived late but were able to see the very last set of the tennis match... read more


very thing:  the exact thing needed.  Example:  I was skeptical, but the vitamins the nutritionist recommended were the very thing I needed to get well... read more


VICINITY

in the vicinity:  an approximate amount, nearly.  Example:  To purchase the home, you’ll need in the vicinity of $50,000 cash as a down payment...  read more


VICIOUS

vicious circle:  a set of repeating events and factors that negatively affect the next event.  Example:  Extreme dieting always causes a vicious circle where the dieter initially loses a lot of weight but then gains back more weight than when they first started the diet... read more


VIEW

in view of something:  in consideration of something; related to something.  Example:  In view of my fluency in three languages, I think your offer should be increased to $65,000... read more


on view:  on display where everyone can see something.  Example:  Did you see the art exhibit? There are many famous impressionist paintings on view... read more



bird’s-eye view:  as seen from above; a broad view of a situation.   Example:  I recommend that you go up to the top floor so you can get a bird’s-eye view of the city... read more



take a dim view:  to not approve of something; to see something negatively.  Example:  College admission officers normally take a dim view of students who don’t list many extra-curricular activities on their applications... read more


VIRTUE

by virtue of something:  because of something.  Example:  She got promoted by virtue of her experience, not because of her great looks... read more


VISIT

pay a visit to someone / something (pay someone / something a visit):  to go see someone or something.  Example:  I haven’t heard from my mother in two weeks so I’m going to pay her a visit and make sure she’s okay... read more


VOICE

a lone voice in the wilderness:  someone who says something that’s not popular; expressing an unpopular opinion.  Example:  At the management meeting, my suggestion to give everyone a small bonus was a lone voice in the wilderness... read more


VOID

fill a (the) void:  to provide or replace something that’s needed.  Example:  She’s been drinking to try to fill the void after her husband left her with two young kids... read more



VOLUMES

speaks volumes:  to express something clearly, to be a clear example of something.  Example:  The dirty looks and silence between them speaks volumes about their relationship... read more


VOUCH

vouch for something:  to support the truth of something.  Example:   Even though you didn’t see her at her desk, I can vouch that she arrived on time yesterday and went straight to the manager's meeting... read more


VOTE

vote something down (vote down something):  to reject something or defeat a vote for something.  Example:  I suggested we hire a new receptionist instead of having an answering service, but management voted the idea down... read more

WADE

wade through something:  1) to read a large volume of material or detailed information;  2) to pass through a large group of people.

We’ve got to wade through 650 job applications we received for the program manager vacancy.
My friends were right in front of the stage at the concert and I tried to join them but I couldn’t wade through all the people.


WAGON

(fall) off the wagon:  drinking alcohol again after having stopped space (this term is usually used for people who have a problem with alcohol).

Sadly, my father fell off the wagon and we’re trying to persuade him to go back to rehab.
Your office called to see if something happened because you didn’t go to work today—are you off the wagon again?

on the wagon:  not drinking after having been drinking regularly (this term is generally used for people who have problems with alcohol).

We’re all relieved my son is finally on the wagon and hope he can stay on it.
I’m back on the wagon after getting arrested for drunk driving—it helped me finally realize I have a serious problem.

WAIT

wait and see:  to wait over a period of time for news or results about something.

I’ve submitted my novel to 20 publishers and now all I can do is wait and see.
Just wait and see—you’re going to love your job in a few weeks when you get used to it.

wait on someone:  to serve someone.

When my kids became teenagers I stopped waiting on them and they quickly learned how to help themselves.
“Would you like to try on those shoes?” “Thank you but another salesperson is waiting on us.”

wait out something (wait something out):  to let time pass until something happens or ends.

The authorities have ordered all residents to evacuate—no one is allowed to wait the storm out.
I’ve tried to wait out the thunderstorm but after 20 minutes I had no choice but to run to my car and I got soaking wet.
There’s nothing the doctor can do—it’s the flu and I’ve just got to rest and wait it out.

wait on someone hand and foot:  to do many different things to serve someone.

After my mom had a stroke she needed someone to wait on her hand and foot.
Women who earn money usually are not trapped at home having to wait on their husbands hand and foot.

wait tables:  to serve customers as a waiter/waitress in a restaurant.

Waiting tables is a popular job for students and artists.
I really don’t recommend waiting tables—I seriously injured my back carrying heavy trays of food when I was a waiter.

WAKE

in the wake of something:  happening after or as a result of something.

In the wake of rioting after championship games, the police have increased security for the Super Bowl.
My mother has been living with us in the wake of my father’s death.

wake up to something:  to become aware and understand something important.

One day you’re going to wake up to the fact that you’re worrying about your daughter doesn’t help her but it does hurt you.
When he really wakes up to understanding how much he hurt us then maybe I’ll give him a second chance.


wake up and smell the coffee:  to become aware of and do something about a situation. Example:  When my credit card company raised the interest rate to 24.99%, I woke up and smelled the coffee and paid the balance off as quickly as I could... read more


WALK

take a walk:  to leave, go away.

When the customer wouldn’t stop yelling, my manager told him to take a walk or he’d call the police.
I’d rather take a walk than stay in an abusive relationship.


walk all over someone / something:  to treat someone badly and without respect.

My sister let her kids walk all over her for years but she’s finally saying “no” to them.
Say something! Don’t let your roommate walk all over you.

walk off with something:  to leave with something that you didn’t have permission to take.

I had a party Saturday night and someone walked off with my mom’s gold bracelet.
Rats! That customer just walked off with my pen.

walk out on someone / something:  to suddenly end or abandon a relationship.

The cleaning staff walked out on their jobs during our stay so our hotel room was only cleaned once all week.
My sister was so scared of her boyfriend she just walked out on him, only taking a few clothes with her.

walk the walk:  to show something by your actions (and not just by your words).

We always give the applicants a writing test to make sure they can walk the walk.
He was an excellent player in high school but he never walked the walk in college.

walk (someone) through something:  to explain step-by-step or in detail how to do something. 

Sorry but I’m terrible with computers. Can you walk me through installation and activation?
On your first day we’ll walk you through how to open and close the store.

walk on eggshells:   to be extremely careful around someone in order not to upset them.

When I visit my parents I have to walk on eggshells so now I hardly visit them.
Everyone is walking on eggshells at my firm because the owner is visiting our office this week.


WALL

drive someone up the wall:  to really bother or annoy someone.

My secretary pops her chewing gum loudly all day long and it absolutely drives me up the wall.
Please don’t play your music so loud, you know that drives your father up the wall.

off the wall:   strange or unusual.

As Michael Jackson sang, “live a life off the wall… and just enjoy yourself.”
You’ve got to see how she decorated her apartment—it’s really off the wall.

a fly on the wall:  to be able to secretly hear and observe something.

My manager just got called into the director’s office—oh, how I’d love to be a fly on the wall!
I’d like to be a fly on the wall when the committee reviews our applications.

(with) one’s back against the wall:  in a difficult situation without many options.

I wish I could help you, but my back is against the wall because I don’t get paid for two more weeks.
After failing three quizzes, my back is against the wall and I’ve got to pass all of the rest of them.

WANT

want for something:  to not have something you need.

My parents were poor but we never wanted for love.
When I volunteered in Africa I realized I really didn’t want for anything.

WARD

ward off someone / something (ward someone / something off):  to try to keep someone / something harmful away.

We keep the lights on our porch at night to ward off burglars.
This ointment is fantastic for warding off mosquitoes.


WARM

warm up to (someone / something):  to begin to like someone / something.

My mother is so afraid of everything she’s just beginning to warm up to using the microwave.
Since our baby was born my father is finally starting to warm up to my husband.

WARTS

warts and all:  including bad qualities, habits, etc.

My son is a slob but I love him warts and all.
The key to a successful marriage is excepting your spouse warts and all.

WASH

wash down something (wash something down):  to drink a liquid to help swallow something.

Could I have a glass of water so I can wash down these pills?
We washed down my birthday cake with a bottle of champagne.

wash out (something) (wash something out):  to cancel an event because of rain.

Sadly, we went all the way to Paris for the French Open but the matches were washed out the day we had tickets.
Let’s have the picnic in July so it won’t get washed out this year.

wash up:  to wash or clean your hands.

I’m shocked at how many people don’t wash up before eating at restaurants.
Kids please turn off the TV and wash up for dinner.

WASTE

go to waste:  to not be used.

When the Native American Indians killed a buffalo absolutely nothing went to waste.
Since we moved into an apartment and have a small refrigerator we can’t buy a lot of food, so now nothing goes to waste.

waste away:  to slowly become thin and weak.

After my grandma died, my grandfather didn’t want to eat and began to waste away.
After I got cancer I started wasting away until I began drinking these high-calorie nutritious shakes.

waste one’s breath:  to say something that will probably be ignored.

You could tell her that her hairstyle looks ridiculous but you’d just be wasting your breath.
I don’t waste my breath asking my kids to get off the Internet—instead I just disconnect it each night at 8 PM.

WATCH

keep a close watch on / over someone / something:  to carefully follow or protect someone / something.

Could you please water my plants and keep a close watch on my house while I am away?
Something is strange—I’m going to keep a close watch over my 13-year-old from now on.

watch out:  be aware and careful.

Watch out for that bucket of water behind you — I don’t want you to fall over it.
Whenever we drive though this wooded area I have to watch out for animals running into the road.


watch out for someone / something: 1) to carefully be aware in order to avoid a problem; 2) to look carefully to try to make sure someone else is safe and okay.

Our older brother always watches out for us at school to make sure no one bothers us.
Watch out for pickpockets, especially when you travel near train stations.

watch over someone / something:  protect someone / something by being alert for any problems or danger.

Could you watch over my backpack while I run to the bathroom?
I prefer to live in a gated community with security guards watching over us.


WATER(S)

keep one's head above water:  1) to have just enough to live or survive (especially having enough money);  2) to manage to do all of your work... read more

Even though I'm working two different jobs it's hard for me to keep my head above water.
During the holiday season it is really difficult for us to keep our heads above water with all of the last-minute orders and inquiries.


in hot water:  to be in a difficult situation for doing something wrong.

I’m in hot water for skipping classes this morning.
You’ll be in hot water if anyone notices you’re watching movies at work.

not hold water:  to not seem true or reasonable.

Your excuse that you didn’t get my email does not hold water because Julie said your forwarded it to her.
This weak apology is not going to hold water with our customers.

water down something (water something down):  to make something weaker.

We stopped going to that bar because they were watering down their cocktails.
Our legal department said we need to water the statement down or risk getting sued.

water under the bridge:  it’s not possible to change something that’s already happened.

I wish I hadn’t sold the watch my father gave me but now it’s water under the bridge.
We both said terrible things but it’s water under the bridge—let’s learn from this and move on.

muddy the waters:  to make things more complicated or confusing.

Wait a while. If you release another statement now you’ll only muddy the waters.
Unfortunately, the results of this new survey really muddy the waters.

test the waters:  to try something new (especially to see what will happen or how others will react).

I’m testing the waters to see if having a photo on my CV makes any difference.
Before you quit your job and start a consulting business I recommend you test the waters with one or two clients.

WAVELENGTH

on the same wavelength:  agreeing or having the same opinion.

My business partner and I were on the same wavelength when we first started but now we have very different ideas about the company.
Amazingly, we were all on the same wavelength at today’s meeting.

WAVES

make waves:  to shock or upset people by doing something different.

After Madonna and Lady Gaga, it’s pretty hard to make waves in music anymore.
When you go overseas next semester try not to make waves—the world is a dangerous place these days.

WAY

bluff one’s way:  to pretend to be something you are not to achieve something.

I forgot to bring my ID but I was able to bluff my way past security.
I’ve bluffed my way through the interview but I’m going to get fired because I don’t have the skills to do this job.

by the way:  an expression used in a conversation to indicate there is some additional information you want to say.

By the way, did you hear that my sister will be home for the holidays?
I really love your new haircut by the way.

clear the way (for someone / something):  to do something that makes it easier for something else to follow.

When the Civil Rights Act was passed it cleared the way for all minorities to get better jobs and education.
Whenever a woman breaks into the top level of any field it clears the way for others to follow.

either way:  whatever happens (no matter which option you decide).

Both dresses are beautiful so either way you look great.
We haven’t decided where we will stay yet but either way we're definitely going to the beach this weekend.

every which way:  in many different directions.

When the fire broke out the restaurant diners ran every which way, injuring several people.
We drove every which way and still couldn’t find the party so finally we gave up and went to a movie instead.

Thumbnail image of a cartoon of a woman with her dog. Click to go to webpage on this wear the pants idiom for additional examples.
WEAR

wear the pants:  to be the dominant partner in a relationship or marriage.  Example:  In conservative Christian marriages, the man wears the pants in the relationship.  read on...



WINDOW

window of opportunity:  a chance to do something that is only available for a short period of time... read on

When we arrived in Doha there was a window of opportunity to get on an earlier flight to Singapore but we couldn't get to the gate fast enough.
Over the next few months before you go to Europe watch for windows of opportunity to buy euros when the exchange rate drops.


WOLF

wolf in sheep's clothing:  someone or something that pretends to be good or friendly but is actually trying to cause damage, harm or cheat (take advantage of) you... read on

After my best friend at work stole my idea and got a promotion, I'm always careful to make sure the people around me are not wolves in sheep's clothing.
I learned those tiny packets of chips with only 100 calories were just wolves in sheep's clothing—the companies that make them know you'll always eat more than one!

WORD(S)

three little words:  these three short words are "I love you."

Finally, I was just about to say those three little words to my boyfriend when he told me he thought it would be better if we were just friends.
My boyfriend keeps complaining that I never say those three little words but they are big words to me! I like him a lot but I just don't fall in love very easily.


a man/woman of few words:  someone who does not talk a lot, only when there is something important to say.  Example:  My boss is a woman of few words but she's very effective at getting things done.  Read more...




WORM

(open / open up) a can of worms:  a situation or issue that becomes even more complicated as you try to deal with it or solve the problem.  Example:  I feel like bringing my girlfriend home for the holidays might open a can of worms but she really wants to go... read more


x marks the spot:  an “x” is used to show the exact location (spot) of something.  Example:  As you can see on the diagram, x marks the spot where the murder occurred... read more


Y Idioms
YEAR(S)

year after year:  every year for many years.  Example:  Year after year, my kids give me ugly ties as Christmas gifts... read more


year in, year out:  every year for many years.  Example:  He worked at the company year in, year out for decades before he was laid off... read more



(all) year round:  during the whole year, happening all year.  Example:  Most people only eat roast turkey and stuffing on Thanksgiving and Christmas but we keep it on the menu all year round at our restaurant... read more


in years:  in a long time.  Example:  I hadn’t seen my high school English teacher in years but she looks exactly the same... read more


getting on in years:  becoming old.  Example:  My mom is getting on in years so we’re building an extra room in our house for her.... read more


YELL

yell bloody murder:  to scream really loudly.  Example:  When the thief tried to grab my bag, I yelled bloody murder and he let go and ran away... read more


YES

yes man:   someone who always agrees with authority (always says “yes”).  Example:  My boss is a total yes man so now we have an impossible sales target from upper management... read more


YOU, YOU’RE, YOURSELF

you can say that again:  you strongly agree with something someone said.  Example:  "This pie is delicious." "You can say that again"... read more


you can’t take it with you:  enjoy life today because you can’t take your money or possessions with you when you die.  Example:  Why don’t you ever drive your sports car? You can’t take it with you, ya know... read more


you can’t teach an old dog new tricks:  the idea that older people can't learn new skills or learn how to do new things.  Example:  My grandfather has 5,000 followers on Twitter and Instagram—who says you can’t teach an old dog new tricks!.. read more


you get what to pay for:  the price of something usually equals its quality (especially cheap things are of low quality).  Example:  It’s true you get what you pay for—this $239 laptop is unbelievably slow... read more


you’re toast:  you’re in trouble.  Example:  You’re toast when your mom finds out you ruined her blouse... read more


by yourself:  all alone.  Example:  If you just want to be by yourself, why don’t you say so?.. read more


keep something to yourself:  Keeping or having something only for you.  Example:  If that’s what you really believe, I suggest you keep your opinions to yourself... read more


yours truly:  me, myself.  Example:  "Wow, who cooked all this good food?" "Yours truly"... read more


Z Idioms
ZERO

zero in on something:  to focus or pay attention to one particular thing.  Example:  I think you should zero in on chapter two because it’s the most relevant for your situation... read more


ZIP

zip one's lips:  to be silent; to not tell a secret (as if the lips were zipped with a zipper so the person cannot talk).  Example:  I’m going to resign in two weeks but zip your lips please!.. read more



ZONE

zone out:  to not pay attention to things happening around you.  Example:  As soon as my boyfriend talks about sports, I automatically zone out...read more


ZOOM

zoom in on something:  to examine or look at something more closely.  Example:  Zoom in on that part of the map; I think I recognize that area... read more


Have you signed-up for my free newsletter? I include an audio magazine article every month that's choc full of new vocabulary and idioms.

You can also find many idiom definitions with the different online learner's dictionaries.

